FEDERAL  TRADE  COMMISSION  REAUTHORIZATION 

S.  HRG.  110–1173 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON INTERSTATE COMMERCE, 

TRADE, AND TOURISM 

OF THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

SEPTEMBER  12,  2007 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

75–970 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2012 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

PAUL NAGLE,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  INTERSTATE  COMMERCE,  TRADE,  AND  TOURISM 

BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota, 

Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 

JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina,  Ranking 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on September 12, 2007  .....................................................................
Statement of Senator Dorgan  .................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Calhoun, Michael D., President, Center for Responsible Lending 

Cooper, Dr. Mark N., Director of Research, Consumer Federation of America 

Abrams, Martin E., Executive Director, Center for Information Policy Leader-
ship, Hunton & Williams LLP  ............................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
......................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
.
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Majoras, Hon. Deborah Platt, Chairman, Federal Trade Commission  ...............
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Murray, Chris, Senior Counsel, Consumers Union  ...............................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Schwartz, Ari, Deputy Director, Center for Democracy and Technology  ............
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

Page 
1 
1 

74 
75 
49 
51 
36 
38 
2 
4 
59 
61 
66 
67 

APPENDIX 

Response  to  written  questions  submitted  to  Michael  D.  Calhoun  by  Hon. 

Byron L. Dorgan  ................................................................................................... 120 

Response  to  written  questions  submitted  to  Hon.  Deborah  Platt  Majoras by: 

Hon. Byron L. Dorgan  ...................................................................................... 103 
Hon. Daniel K. Inouye  ...................................................................................... 101 
Hon. Olympia J. Snowe  .................................................................................... 113 

Stevens, Hon. Ted, U.S. Senator from New Jersey, prepared statement 

...........
101  .......................................................................................................

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

FEDERAL  TRADE  COMMISSION 

REAUTHORIZATION 

WEDNESDAY,  SEPTEMBER  12,  2007 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON INTERSTATE COMMERCE, TRADE, AND 
TOURISM, 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  9:35  a.m.  in  room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Byron  L.  Dorgan, 
Chairman of the Subcommittee, presiding. 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. BYRON L. DORGAN, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NORTH DAKOTA 

Senator  DORGAN.  The  Committee  will  come  to  order.  This  is  the 
Senate  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation, 
Interstate  Commerce,  Trade,  and  Tourism  Subcommittee,  hearing 
on the Federal Trade Commission reauthorization. 

I  regret  to  tell  you  that  last  evening,  about  8:30  in  the  evening, 
they  scheduled  three  votes,  starting  at  9:30  this  morning.  Because 
of that, the first vote is now underway; it’ll be followed by two ten- 
minute  votes.  My  expectation  is,  the  votes  will  be  completed  by 
10:15.  And  I  deeply  apologize  for  the  inconvenience  to  all  of  you, 
but,  because  of  that,  we  will  have  to  recess  until  10:15,  at  which 
time the hearing will begin. 

The Committee is in recess. 
[Recess.] 
Senator DORGAN. The Committee will come to order. 
First,  again—I  should  say,  again,  let  me  apologize  for  the  incon-
venience.  I  know  it  is  not  convenient  for  any  of  you  to  wait  for 
nearly  an  hour,  but  the  schedule  of  the  Senate  sometimes  isn’t  es-
tablished  for  our  convenience,  or  yours,  it’s  an  unusual  body,  and 
so, we are delayed today, but thank you very much for waiting, and 
thank you for being here. 

Chairman  Majoras,  thank  you  very  much  for  being  with  us 
today. We will have testimony from you, and then we will have tes-
timony from a second panel. 

The  second  panel  will  include  Dr.  Mark  Cooper,  from  the  Con-
sumer  Federation  of  America;  Mr.  Chris  Murray,  from  the  Con-
sumers  Union;  Mr.  Michael  Calhoun,  the  President  of  the  Center 
for Responsible Lending; Mr. Ari Schwartz, from the Center for De-
mocracy  and  Technology;  and  Mr.  Marty  Abrams,  from  the  Center 
for Information Policy Leadership. 
(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

2 

The  hearing  today  is  a  reauthorization  hearing  for  the  Federal 
Trade Commission, which is an independent Federal agency estab-
lished  in  1914.  This  is  an  agency  that  has  a  gray  beard,  it’s  been 
around  a  long,  long  time,  and  serves  a  very  useful  purpose.  Under 
the  Federal  Trade  Commission  Act  of  1914,  the  Commission  was 
established  to  protect  consumers.  The  mandate  has  two  different 
and distinct components—first, to protect consumers from unfair or 
deceptive  acts  or  practices  in  or  affecting  commerce;  and,  second, 
to  protect  consumers  from  unfair  methods  of  competition.  As  part 
of  this  authority,  the  agency  enforces  some  46  statutes  and  is  the 
only Federal agency with both consumer protection and competition 
jurisdiction in very broad sectors of the economy. 

The  Commission’s  consumer  protection  authority  is  provided 
under  the  FTC  Act;  and,  under  that  Act,  the  Commission  is 
charged with preventing a broad range of consumer abuses, includ-
ing deceptive or misleading advertising, telemarketing fraud, credit 
report errors, and false labeling. The Act also grants the FTC juris-
diction  over  unfair  methods  of  competition,  deceptive  acts  or  prac-
tices that unreasonably impede a consumer’s ability to make an in-
formed choice. 

I  don’t  need  to  remind  everyone  how  important  these  particular 
functions  are,  given  what  we  have  read  in  the  newspapers  in  the 
last several months. The issue of consumer safety is paramount in 
this galloping global economy and rules for that global economy are 
not  nearly  keeping  pace.  We  have  stories,  these  days  in  the  news-
papers,  about  danger  and  risk  to  American  consumers.  I  want  to 
talk  a  little  about  that  today.  It’s  a  very  important  function,  the 
function  of  ensuring  competition,  as  is  the  function  of  consumer 
protection.  We  need  to  reauthorize  the  Federal  Trade  Commission, 
and we will hope to do so with legislation that we move to the floor 
of the Senate very soon. 

The  Commission  itself  is  a  five-member  Commission  appointed 
by  the  President,  confirmed  by  the  Senate,  for  7-year  terms.  We 
have invited the Chairman of the Commission to be with us today. 
Let  me,  again,  say  thank  you  for  your  patience  and  ask  you  to 
proceed.  Your  entire  statement  will  be  made  a  part  of  the  record 
today, and we will ask you to summarize. 

Madam Chair, go ahead. 

STATEMENT OF HON. DEBORAH PLATT MAJORAS, CHAIRMAN, 

FEDERAL TRADE COMMISSION 

Ms.  MAJORAS.  Thank  you  very  much,  Chairman  Dorgan.  It’s  a 
great  pleasure  to  appear  before  you  today  to  describe  the  FTC’s 
broad  program  to  protect  consumers  in  today’s  dynamic  market-
place  through  vigorous  law  enforcement,  consumer  and  business 
education, competition advocacy, and market research. 

During the past 3 fiscal years, our consumer protection work has 
produced  more  than  250  court  orders  requiring  defendants  to  pay 
more than $1.2 billion in consumer redress, 47 court judgments for 
civil  penalties,  totaling  over  $38  million,  and  approximately  180 
new  Federal  court  complaints  aimed  at  stopping  unfair  and  decep-
tive conduct. At the same time, we’ve developed 250 consumer and 
business  education  campaigns  and  publications,  completed  54 
statutorily  mandated  rulemakings  and  reports,  hosted  48  public 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

3 

conferences  and  workshops,  and  issued  40  reports  on  issues  of 
great significance to consumers. This active agenda continues. 

Protecting  the  privacy  and  identity  of  American  consumers  has 
become,  and  remains,  a  top  priority  in  this  information  age.  The 
FTC  has  brought  14  enforcement  actions  against  companies  for 
their failure to provide reasonable security for consumers’ data, ac-
tions that have helped set standards for industry, and more are in 
the pipeline. 

Last  year,  we  launched  a  nationwide  identity  theft  consumer 
education  campaign,  ‘‘Deter,  Detect,  Defend,’’  and  developed  a  new 
business  education  guide  on  data  security.  Over  the  past  2  years, 
we’ve  brought  nearly  a  dozen  enforcement  actions  against  pur-
veyors of spyware, and a steady stream of cases against spammers. 
We continue protecting Americans’ privacy through implementation 
and  enforcement  of  the  highly  successful  Do  Not  Call  Registry, 
which now contains more than 147 million telephone numbers, and 
enforcement  actions  against  telephone  pretexters  and  those  who 
violate the Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act. 

To protect consumers in the financial services marketplace, we’re 
focusing on enforcement efforts in the marketing of mortgage prod-
ucts,  particularly  in  the  subprime  market,  deception  in  the  credit 
area,  and  illegal  methods  used  in  debt  collection.  We’ve  attacked 
false  or  inadequate  disclosures  relating  to  gift  cards  and  rebate 
programs. Other areas of attack in our fraud program include busi-
ness-opportunity  and  work-at-home  scams,  various  forms  of  tele-
marketing fraud, and bogus health and weight-loss claims, and the 
latter rank very high on the agenda, because they have such poten-
tial to harm consumers who forego legitimate treatment options. 

We’ve  been  a  driving  force  in  the  recent  renewal  of  self-regula-
tion  in  the  advertising  of  food  to  children,  and  we  continue  our 
work  in  monitoring  self-regulation  among  marketers  of  video 
games,  music,  and  movies  with  violent  content,  as  well  as  alcohol. 
Indeed, as to the latter, this week we’ve been sponsoring ‘‘We Don’t 
Serve Teens Week,’’ blanketing the Nation through PSAs and a lot 
of  help  from  states  and  others,  with  the  admonition  not  to  provide 
alcohol  to  minors.  Thanks  to  Congress,  which  worked  with  us  to 
pass  the  U.S.  SAFE  WEB  Act  of  2006,  we  now  have  better  tools 
with which we are fighting cross-border fraud. 

We’re  equally  active  in  protecting  competition,  focusing  on  areas 
that  have  the  most  significant  impact  on  consumers;  namely, 
healthcare,  energy,  real  estate,  and  high-technology  industries.  So 
far, in this fiscal year, we’ve issued 31 second requests in mergers, 
we’ve  had  20  merger  cases  that  have  resulted  in  enforcement  ac-
tion or withdrawal of the merger, and we’ve brought 11 nonmerger 
cases.  In  healthcare,  for  example,  we’ve  achieved  substantial  relief 
over  the  last  year  before  allowing  mergers  in  the  areas  of  generic 
drugs,  over-the-counter  medications,  injectable  analgesics,  and 
other  medical  devices  and  diagnostic  services.  We’ve  challenged 
price-fixing  agreements  among  competing  physicians,  and  agree-
ments  between  drug  companies  that  delay  generic  entry.  We  are 
continuing  to  stand  up  against  reverse-payment  settlements,  in-
cluding  by  working  with  Congress  on  bipartisan  efforts  to  advance 
a workable legislative remedy. And the Commission recently issued 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

4 

an opinion ruling that Evanston Northwestern Healthcare Corpora-
tion’s acquisition of Highland Park Hospital was anticompetitive. 

So  far  in  2007,  the  Commission  has  challenged  three  mergers  in 
the energy industry: Western Refining’s acquisition of Giant Indus-
tries—unfortunately, we were unsuccessful in District Court; Equi-
table  Resources’  proposed  acquisition  of  the  People’s  Natural  Gas 
Company—that  is  still  in  litigation;  and  the  proposed  $22  billion 
deal  whereby  energy  firm  Kinder  Morgan  would  be  taken  private 
by  its  management,  and  a  group  of  investment  firms,  including 
Carlyle Group and Riverstone Holdings. 

We also charged the American Petroleum Company with illegally 
conspiring  with  competitors  to  restrict  the  importation  and  sale  of 
motor  oil  lubricants  in  Puerto  Rico.  And  other  industries  in  which 
we’ve brought significant actions include real estate, grocery stores, 
and funeral homes, and related products and services. 

Complementing  these  antitrust  enforcement  efforts  are  our  com-
petition advocacy efforts, our market research, which has produced 
reports  on  IP  issues,  municipal  provision  of  wireless  Internet, 
broadband policy, and competition in real estate, and our new con-
sumer education campaign. 

Mr.  Chairman,  the  more  than  1,000  employees  of  the  FTC  re-
main focused on our critical mission to protect consumers and com-
petition.  We  always  appreciate  your  support,  and  look  forward  to 
continuing  to  work  together  to  further  the  interests  of  American 
consumers. 

Thank  you  for  holding  this  hearing.  I’d  like  to  thank  my  fellow 
commissioners  who  are  with  me  today,  and  some  of  our  staff,  and 
I also would like to thank those on the second panel, who obviously 
play a very important role in the work that we do. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Ms. Majoras follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DEBORAH PLATT MAJORAS, CHAIRMAN, 

FEDERAL TRADE COMMISSION 

I. Introduction 

Chairman Dorgan, Ranking Member DeMint, and Members of the Subcommittee, 
I am Deborah Platt Majoras, Chairman of the Federal Trade Commission (‘‘Commis-
sion’’ or ‘‘FTC’’). I am pleased to come before you today at this reauthorization hear-
ing.1 

The  FTC  is  the  only  Federal  agency  with  both  consumer  protection  and  competi-
tion  jurisdiction  in  broad  sectors  of  the  economy.2 The  agency  enforces  laws  that 
prohibit  business  practices  that  are  harmful  to  consumers  because  they  are  anti-
competitive,  deceptive,  or  unfair,  and  promotes  informed  consumer  choice  and  un-
derstanding of the competitive process. 

The  FTC  has  pursued  a  vigorous  and  effective  law  enforcement  program  in  a  dy-
namic  marketplace  that  is  increasingly  global  and  characterized  by  changing  tech-
nologies.  Through  the  efforts  of  a  dedicated,  professional  staff,  the  FTC  continues 
to handle a growing workload. 

The agency’s consumer protection work has focused on data security and identity 
theft,  technology  risks  to  consumers  such  as  spam  and  spyware,  fraud  in  the  mar-
keting  of  health  care  products,  deceptive  financial  practices  in  the  subprime  mort-
gage  and  credit  repair  industries,  telemarketing  fraud,  and  Do  Not  Call  enforce-
ment. During the past three fiscal years, the FTC has obtained more then 250 court 
orders  requiring  defendants  to  pay  more  than  $1.2  billion  in  consumer  redress,  ob-
tained  47  court  judgments  for  civil  penalties  in  an  amount  over  $38  million,  and 
filed approximately 180 new complaints in Federal district court to stop unfair and 
deceptive  practices.  It  also  completed  54  statutorily-mandated  rulemakings  and  re-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

5 

ports,  hosted  48  conferences  and  workshops,  issued  40  reports  on  topics  significant 
to consumers, and developed 250 consumer and business education campaigns. 

The  Commission’s  competition  mission  has  worked  to  strengthen  free  and  open 
markets by removing the obstacles that impede competition and prevent its benefits 
from flowing to consumers. To accomplish this, the FTC has focused its enforcement 
efforts on sectors of the economy that have a significant impact on consumers, such 
as  health  care  and  pharmaceuticals,  energy,  technology,  and  real  estate.  So  far  in 
Fiscal  Year  2007,  there  have  been  20  merger  cases  that  have  resulted  in  enforce-
ment  action  or  withdrawal—including  three  litigated  preliminary  injunction  ac-
tions—and 11 nonmerger enforcement actions.3 

Our  testimony  today  summarizes  some  of  the  major  activities  of  the  recent  past 
and describes some of our planned future initiatives. It also identifies certain legis-
lative recommendations that the Commission believes will allow us to better protect 
U.S. consumers. These are: 

1.  to  stop  brand  name  drug  companies  from  paying  generic  companies  not  to 
compete at the expense of consumers; 
2. to repeal the telecommunications common carrier exemption; and 
3.to ensure that the Commission has authority to impose civil penalties in cases 
in  which  the  Commission’s  traditional  equitable  remedies  are  inadequate,  such 
as spyware and data security cases.4 

II. Consumer Protection 

As  the  Nation’s  consumer  protection  agency,  the  FTC  has  a  broad  mandate.  This 
year,  it  devoted  significant  resources  to  the  issues  of  data  security  and  identity 
theft, technology risks to consumers, fraud in the marketing of the health care prod-
ucts,  financial  practices,  telemarketing  fraud,  and  Do  Not  Call  enforcement.5 The 
Commission plans to continue our important work in these areas in 2008. This testi-
mony highlights key issues and initiatives for the agency’s consumer protection mis-
sion, as well as the methods the FTC will use to address them. 
A. Data Security and Identity Theft 

In  1998,  Congress  passed  the  Identity  Theft  Assumption  and  Deterrence  Act 
(‘‘Identity  Theft  Act’’),  which  assigned  the  FTC  a  unique  role  in  combating  identity 
theft  and  coordinating  government  efforts.6 This  role  includes  collecting  consumer 
complaints;  implementing  the  Identity  Theft  Data  Clearinghouse,  a  centralized 
database of victim complaints used by 1,600 law enforcement agencies; assisting vic-
tims  and  consumers  by  providing  information  and  education;  and  educating  busi-
nesses  on  sound  security  practices.  The  FTC  continues  to  focus  on  combating  iden-
tity  theft  primarily  through  law  enforcement,  implementation  of  the  recommenda-
tions  of  the  President’s  Identity  Theft  Task  Force,  and  education  both  to  help  con-
sumers avoid identity theft and to assist the millions of Americans who are victim-
ized each year. 
1. Law Enforcement 

Although  the  FTC,  a  civil  enforcement  agency,  cannot  enforce  criminal  identity 
theft laws, it can take law enforcement action against businesses that fail to imple-
ment reasonable safeguards to protect sensitive consumer information from identity 
thieves.  Over  the  past  few  years,  the  FTC  has  brought  14  enforcement  actions 
against  businesses,  including  BJ’s  Wholesale  Club,  ChoicePoint,  CardSystems  Solu-
tions,  and  DSW  Shoe  Warehouse,  for  their  alleged  failures  to  provide  reasonable 
data security. In these and other cases, the FTC has alleged, for example, that com-
panies  discarded  files  containing  consumer  home  loan  applications  in  an  unsecured 
dumpster;  stored  sensitive  information  in  multiple  files  when  there  was  no  longer 
a business need to keep the information, or in unencrypted files that could be easily 
accessed  using  commonly-known  used  IDs  and  passwords;  failed  to  implement  sim-
ple,  low-cost,  and  readily  available  defenses  to  well-known  web-based  hacker  at-
tacks;  failed  to  use  readily  available  security  measures  to  prevent  unauthorized 
wireless  connections  to  their  networks;  and  sold  sensitive  consumer  information  to 
identity thieves posing as the company’s clients. The Commission continues to mon-
itor the marketplace to encourage companies to implement and maintain reasonable 
safeguards  to  protect  sensitive  consumer  information.  In  appropriate  cases,  the 
Commission will bring enforcement actions. 
2. Identity Theft Task Force 

On  May  10,  2006,  the  President  established  an  Identity  Theft  Task  Force,  which 
I  co-chair,  and  which  comprises  17  Federal  agencies  with  the  mission  of  developing 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

6 

a comprehensive national strategy to combat identity theft.7 In April 2007, the Task 
Force published its strategic plan for combating identity theft.8 

In  the  Strategic  Plan,  the  Task  Force  recommends  dozens  of  initiatives  directed 
at reducing the incidence and impact of identity theft. To prevent identity theft, the 
Plan recommends that governments, businesses, and consumers improve data secu-
rity.  It  recommends  that  Federal  agencies  and  departments  improve  their  internal 
data  security  processes;  develop  breach  notification  systems;  and  reduce  unneces-
sary  uses  of  Social  Security  numbers,  which  are  often  the  key  item  of  information 
that identity thieves need. For the private sector, the Task Force proposes that Con-
gress  establish  national  standards  for  data  security  and  breach  notification  that 
would preempt the numerous state laws on these issues. The Plan also recommends 
the  dissemination  of  additional  guidance  to  the  private  sector  for  safeguarding  sen-
sitive consumer data; continued law enforcement against entities that fail to imple-
ment appropriate security; a multi-year consumer awareness campaign to encourage 
consumers to take steps to safeguard their personal information and minimize their 
risk of identity theft; a comprehensive assessment of the private sector’s uses of So-
cial  Security  numbers;  and  workshops  on  developing  more  reliable  methods  of  au-
thenticating the identities of individuals to prevent thieves who obtain consumer in-
formation from using it to open accounts in the consumer’s name. 

To  assist  victims  in  the  recovery  process,  the  Plan  recommends  development  of 
easy-touse  reference  materials  for  law  enforcement,  often  the  first  responders  to 
identity theft; implementation of a standard police report, often a key document for 
victim  recovery;  nationwide  training  for  victim  assistance  counselors;  and  develop-
ment of an Identity Theft Victim Statement of Rights. And finally, the Plan includes 
a host of recommendations for strengthening law enforcement’s ability to detect and 
punish identity thieves. 

Many  of  the  Task  Force  recommendations  have  already  been  implemented  or  are 
in  the  process  of  being  implemented.  For  example,  the  Office  of  Management  and 
Budget  has  issued  data  security  and  breach  management  guidance  for  government 
agencies.9 The  FTC  has  developed  and  distributed  detailed  data  security  guidance 
for  businesses,10 is  planning  regional  data  security  conferences,  has  conducted  a 
public  workshop  on  consumer  authentication,11 has  published  an  identity  theft  vic-
tim  statement  of  rights  on  its  website  and  at  www.idtheft.gov,  and  is  leading  the 
interagency study of the private sector usage of Social Security numbers.12 The De-
partment of Justice has forwarded to Congress a set of legislative recommendations 
that  seek  to  close  existing  loopholes  for  the  prosecution  of  some  types  of  identity 
theft,13 and  is  developing  and  presenting  expanded  training  for  their  prosecutors 
and, in partnership with the FTC, for state and local law enforcement. 
3. Education 

The  FTC  continues  to  educate  consumers  on  how  to  avoid  becoming  victims  of 
identity  theft,  and  last  year  launched  a  nationwide  identity  theft  education  pro-
gram.14 This program—Deter, Detect, Defend—has been very popular. The FTC has 
distributed  over  2.6  million  brochures,  has  recorded  more  than  3.2  million  visits  to 
the program’s website, and has disseminated 55,000 kits, which can be used by em-
ployers,  community  groups,  Members  of  Congress,  and  others  to  educate  their  con-
stituencies. 

The  FTC  also  sponsors  an  innovative  multimedia  website,  OnGuard  Online,  de-
signed  to  educate  consumers  about  basic  computer  security.15 The  website  provides 
information on such as phishing, spyware, and spam. Since its launch in late 2005, 
OnGuard Online has attracted more than 3.5 million visits. 

The  Commission  directs  its  outreach  to  businesses  as  well.  This  April,  the  Com-
mission  released  a  new  business  education  guide  on  data  security.16 The  Commis-
sion  anticipates  that  the  brochure  will  prove  to  be  a  useful  tool  in  alerting  busi-
nesses  to  the  importance  of  data  security  issues  and  give  them  a  solid  foundation 
on how to address them. 
B. Technology 

Although  technology  can  play  a  key  role  in  combating  identity  theft  and  improv-
ing  consumers’  lives,  it  also  can  create  new  consumer  protection  challenges.  The 
Commission  has  worked  aggressively  to  protect  consumers  from  technological 
threats  such  as  spam  and  spyware.  In  addition,  the  agency  has  focused  on  identi-
fying  new  issues  related  to  technology  in  order  to  better  protect  consumers  in  the 
future. 

To enhance consumer protections in cases involving spyware, as well as those in-
volving  data  security,  the  Commission  continues  to  support  provisions  in  pending 
bills that give the FTC civil penalty authority. Civil penalties are important in areas 
where the Commission’s traditional equitable remedies, including consumer restitu-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

7 

tion  and  disgorgement,  may  be  impracticable  or  not  optimally  effective  in  deterring 
unlawful  acts.  Restitution  is  often  impracticable  in  these  cases  because  consumers 
suffer injury that is either non-economic in nature or difficult to quantify. Likewise, 
disgorgement  may  be  unavailable  because  the  defendant  has  not  profited  from  its 
unlawful  acts.  As  such,  the  Commission  reiterates  its  support  for  civil  penalty  au-
thority in these areas and looks forward to continuing to work with this Committee 
to improve the Commission’s ability to protect consumers. 
1. Spam 

Since 1997, when the FTC brought its first case involving spam, the Commission 
has aggressively pursued deceptive and unfair practices involving these e-mail mes-
sages  through  90  law  enforcement  actions  against  143  individuals  and  100  compa-
nies, 26 of which were filed after Congress enacted the CAN–SPAM Act. These cases 
have  focused  on  the  core  protections  that  the  CAN–SPAM  Act  provides  to  con-
sumers: opt-out mechanisms that function; message headers that are non-deceptive; 
and  warnings,  as  appropriate,  that  sexually-explicit  content  is  included.  Through 
these 26 actions, the Commission has succeeded in obtaining strong injunctions and 
significant  monetary  relief.  To  date  in  the  FTC’s  CAN–SPAM  cases,  Federal  courts 
have  awarded  the  Commission  more  than  $10  million  in  disgorgement  or  redress 
and in excess of $2.6 million in civil penalties. 

The  FTC  continues  to  devote  significant  resources  to  fight  spam.  In  June  2007, 
the  Commission  hosted  a  ‘‘Spam  Summit’’  to  explore  the  next  generation  of  threats 
and  solutions  in  the  spam  arena.  The  Summit  panelists,  nearly  50  in  number,  all 
confirmed that spam is being used increasingly as a vehicle for more pernicious con-
duct,  such  as  sending  phishing  e-mails,  viruses,  and  spyware.  This  malicious  spam 
goes  beyond  mere  annoyance  to  consumers—it  can  be  criminal,  resulting  in  signifi-
cant  harm  by  shutting  down  consumers’  computers,  enabling  keystroke  loggers  to 
steal identities, and undermining the stability of the Internet. Due to strong spam- 
filtering, however, much of this spam is not reaching consumers’ inboxes. The panel-
ists  also  confirmed  that  malicious  spam  is  a  technological  problem,  driven  largely 
by ‘‘botnets’’ (networks of hijacked personal computers that spammers use to conceal 
their  identities)  and  the  exploitation  of  computer  security  vulnerabilities  that  allow 
spammers  to  operate  anonymously.  Industry  is  taking  a  leading  role  in  developing 
technological  tools,  such  as  domain-level  e-mail  authentication,  to  ‘‘uncloak’’  these 
anonymous  spammers,  and  the  Commission  is  encouraged  by  reported  increases  in 
the  adoption  rates  for  e-mail  authentication.  Panelists  also  agreed  that  there  is  no 
single solution to the spam problem and encouraged key stakeholders to collaborate 
in  the  fight  against  spam.  To  that  end,  the  Commission  looks  forward  to  continued 
collaboration  with  consumer  groups,  industry  members,  international  bodies,  Mem-
bers of Congress, and criminal law enforcement authorities. 
2. Spyware 

The  Commission  has  brought  eleven  spyware  enforcement  actions  in  the  past  2 
years.  These  actions  have  reaffirmed  three  key  principles:  First,  a  consumer’s  com-
puter belongs to him or her, not the software distributor. Second, buried disclosures 
do not work, just as they have never worked in more traditional areas of commerce. 
And  third,  if  a  distributor  puts  a  program  on  a  consumer’s  computer  that  the  con-
sumer does not want, the consumer must be able to uninstall or disable it. 

The  Commission’s  most  recent  settlement  with  Direct  Revenue,  a  distributor  of 
adware, illustrates these principles.17 According to the FTC’s complaint, Direct Rev-
enue,  directly  and  through  its  affiliates,  offered  consumers  free  content  and  soft-
ware, such as screen savers, games, and utilities, without disclosing adequately that 
downloading  these  items  would  result  in  the  installation  of  adware.  The  installed 
adware  monitored  the  online  behavior  of  consumers  and  then  used  the  results  of 
this  monitoring  to  display  a  substantial  number  of  pop-up  ads  on  their  computers. 
Moreover,  it  was  almost  impossible  for  consumers  to  identify,  locate,  and  remove 
this unwanted adware. Among other things, the FTC’s complaint alleged that Direct 
Revenue used deception to induce the installation of the adware and that it was un-
fair  for  the  company  to  make  it  unreasonably  difficult  to  uninstall  the  adware.  To 
resolve these allegations, Direct Revenue agreed to provide clear and prominent dis-
closures  of  what  it  is  installing,  obtain  express  consent  prior  to  installation,  clearly 
label  its  ads,  provide  a  reasonable  means  of  uninstalling  software,  and  monitor  its 
affiliates  to  assure  that  they  (and  any  subaffiliates)  comply  with  the  FTC’s  order. 
In  addition,  Direct  Revenue  agreed  to  disgorge  $1.5  million  to  the  U.S.  Treasury. 
The  Commission  will  continue  to  monitor  this  area  and  bring  law  enforcement  ac-
tions when warranted. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

8 

3. The Tech-Ade Workshop 

The  FTC  is  committed  to  understanding  the  implications  of  the  development  of 
technology  on  privacy  and  consumer  protection—as,  or  even  before,  these  develop-
ments happen. Last November, the FTC convened public hearings on the subject of 
Protecting  Consumers  in  the  Next  Tech-Ade.18 The  FTC  heard  from  more  than  100 
of  the  best  and  brightest  people  in  the  tech  world  about  new  technologies  on  the 
horizon  and  their  potential  effects  on  consumers.  The  staff  has  incorporated  what 
it  has  learned  at  the  hearings  into  its  enforcement  and  policy  planning,  will  issue 
a  report  shortly,  and  will  follow-up  the  hearings  with  a  series  of  ‘‘town  hall’’  meet-
ings. The first such ‘‘town hall’’ meeting will take place on November 1–2 in Wash-
ington,  D.C.  and  will  address  the  issue  of  online  behavioral  marketing.  Behavioral 
marketing  involves  the  collection  of  information  about  a  consumer’s  activities  on-
line—including  the  searches  the  consumer  has  conducted,  the  web  pages  visited, 
and  the  content  the  consumer  has  viewed.  The  information  is  then  used  to  target 
advertising to the consumer that is intended to reflect the consumer’s interests, and 
thus increase the effectiveness of the advertising. The FTC will examine how behav-
ioral  marketing  works,  what  types  of  data  are  collected,  how  such  data  are  used, 
whether  such  data  are  sold  or  shared,  and  what  information  is  conveyed  to  con-
sumers about its use. 
4. Repeal of the Common Carrier Exemption 

To  address  the  consumer  protection  challenges  posed  by  technology  convergence, 
the Commission continues to support the repeal of the telecommunications common 
carrier exemption. 

Currently,  the  FTC  Act  exempts  common  carriers  subject  to  the  Communications 
Act from its prohibitions on unfair and deceptive acts or practices and unfair meth-
ods  of  competition.19 This  exemption  dates  from  a  period  when  telecommunications 
were  provided  by  government-authorized,  highly  regulated  monopolies.  The  exemp-
tion  is  now  outdated.  Congress  and  the  Federal  Communications  Commission 
(‘‘FCC’’) have dismantled much of the economic regulatory apparatus formerly appli-
cable  to  the  industry,  and  in  the  current  world,  firms  are  expected  to  compete  in 
providing telecommunications services. 

Technological  advances  have  blurred  the  traditional  boundaries  between  tele-
communications,  entertainment,  and  information.  As  the  telecommunications  and 
Internet  industries  continue  to  converge,  the  common  carrier  exemption  is  likely  to 
frustrate the FTC’s ability to stop deceptive and unfair acts and practices and unfair 
methods of competition with respect to interconnected communications, information, 
entertainment, and payment services. 

The FTC has extensive expertise with advertising, marketing, and billing and col-
lection, areas in which issues have emerged in the telecommunications industry. In 
addition,  the  FTC  has  powerful  procedural  and  remedial  tools  that  could  be  used 
effectively to address developing problems in the telecommunications industry if the 
FTC were authorized to reach them. 
C. Health 

Of  course  not  all  fraud  is  technology-related.  Fraud  in  the  marketing  of  health 
care  products,  for  example,  can  still  be  found  in  the  offline  world  as  in  the  online 
world.  Too  often,  consumers  fall  prey  to  fraudulent  health  marketing  because  they 
are  desperate  for  help.  Fifty  million  Americans  suffer  from  a  chronic  pain  condi-
tion 20 and have found no effective cure or treatment. Seventy million Americans are 
trying  to  lose  weight.21 The  FTC  continues  to  take  action  against  companies  that 
take advantage of these consumers. 

From  April  2006  through  August  2007,  the  FTC  initiated  or  resolved  19  law  en-
forcement actions involving 31 products making allegedly deceptive health claims.22 
For  example,  in  September  2006,  a  Federal  district  court  found  that  defendants’ 
claims  for  their  purported  pain  relief  ionized  bracelets  were  false  and  unsubstan-
tiated,  and  required  the  individual  and  corporate  defendants  to  pay  up  to  $87  mil-
lion in refunds to consumers. 

In  January  2007,  the  Commission  announced  separate  cases  against  the  market-
ers  of  four  extensively  advertised  products—Xenadrine  EFX,  CortiSlim,  TrimSpa, 
and  One-A-Day  WeightSmart.  Marketers  for  these  products  settled  charges  that 
they had made false or unsubstantiated weight-loss or weight-control claims. In set-
tling,  the  marketers  surrendered  cash  and  other  assets  collectively  worth  at  least 
$25 million and agreed to limit their future advertising claims.23 

Another important issue on the Commission’s health agenda is childhood obesity. 
In the Summer of 2005, the Commission and the Department of Health and Human 
Services held a joint workshop on the issue of childhood obesity.24 The Commission’s 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

April  2006  report  on  the  workshop  urged  industry  to  consider  a  wide  range  of  op-
tions as to how self-regulation could assist in combating childhood obesity.25 

9 

A  number  of  companies  took  the  FTC’s  recommendations  seriously.  On  October 
16,  2006,  for  example,  the  Walt  Disney  Company  announced  new  food  guidelines 
aimed  at  giving  parents  and  children  healthier  eating  options.26 And  in  November 
2006, the Children’s Advertising Review Unit, or ‘‘CARU,’’ which is administered by 
the  Council  of  Better  Business  Bureaus,  announced  a  new  self-regulatory  adver-
tising initiative designed to use advertising to help promote healthy dietary choices 
and healthy lifestyles among American children.27 Eleven leading food manufactur-
ers—including  McDonalds,  The  Hershey  Company,  Kraft  Foods,  and  General 
Mills—are participants in this initiative. On July 18, 2007, at a forum on childhood 
obesity  hosted  by  the  FTC  and  the  Department  of  Health  and  Human  Services 
(‘‘HHS’’), these companies released the details of their pledges to voluntarily restrict 
their advertising to children under 12 on television, radio, print, and Internet. Each 
of  the  companies  committed  either  to  limiting  100  percent  of  their  advertising  di-
rected  to  children  to  food  products  that  meet  certain  nutrition  criteria  or  to  refrain 
from  advertising  to  children.28 Nutritional  standards  vary  by  company,  but  all  are 
required  to  be  consistent  with  established  scientific  and/or  government  standards. 
As  part  of  the  initiative,  the  companies  also  committed  to  restricting  their  use  of 
third-party  licensed  characters  to  products  that  meet  these  nutritional  criteria  and 
to websites promoting healthy lifestyles. 

At the July 18 FTC–HHS forum, select food and media companies reported on the 
progress  they  have  made  to  date  in  adopting  nutritional  standards  for  advertising 
to children and reformulating products to offer children products that comport with 
these  nutritional  standards.  The  FTC  also  reported  on  its  own  research.  The  FTC’s 
Bureau  of  Economics  discussed  the  results  of  a  study  of  children’s  exposure  to  food 
advertising  on  TV,  released  in  June  2007.  The  study  compared  children’s  exposure 
to advertising on television in 1977 and 2004. The study concluded that today’s chil-
dren  see  more  promotional  advertisements  for  other  programming,  but  fewer  paid 
ads  and  fewer  minutes  of  advertising  on  television.  The  study  also  found  that  chil-
dren are not exposed to more food ads on television than they were in the past, al-
though their ad exposure is more concentrated on children’s programming. 

The  FTC  also  updated  the  audience  on  its  efforts  to  conduct  a  more  comprehen-
sive  study  of  food  industry  marketing  expenditures  and  activities  targeted  toward 
children  and  adolescents.  Through  this  effort,  the  FTC  is  exploring  not  only  tradi-
tional  TV,  print,  and  radio  advertising,  but  all  of  the  many  other  ways  that  the  in-
dustry  reaches  children—through  in-store  promotions,  events,  packaging,  the  Inter-
net,  and  product  placement  in  video  games,  movies,  and  television  programs.  The 
Commission hopes to get a more complete picture of marketing techniques for which 
publicly  available  data  have  so  far  been  lacking.  The  Commission  will  submit  the 
aggregated data about children’s food marketing in a report to Congress, as directed 
in  the  conference  report  on  its  2006  appropriations  legislation.  This  endeavor  will 
be  an  important  tool  for  tracking  the  marketplace’s  response  to  childhood  obesity 
and identifying where more action is needed. 
D. Financial Practices 

As  with  health  issues,  financial  issues  impact  all  consumers—whether  they  are 
purchasing a home, trying to establish credit or improve their credit rating, or man-
aging  rising  debt.  Thus,  protecting  consumers  in  the  financial  services  marketplace 
is  a  critical  part  of  the  FTC’s  consumer  protection  mission.  The  FTC  has  focused 
recent  efforts  in  this  area  on  subprime  mortgage  lending,  payment  cards,  debt  col-
lection practices, and credit and debt counseling services.29 
1. Mortgage Lending and Servicing 

In  the  last  decade,  the  agency  has  brought  twenty-one  actions  against  companies 
and  principals  in  the  mortgage  lending  industry,  focusing  in  particular  on  the 
subprime  market.30 Several  of  these  cases  have  resulted  in  large  monetary  judg-
ments, with courts ordering that more than $320 million be returned to consumers. 
Most  recently,  in  2006,  the  Commission  filed  suit  against  a  mortgage  broker  for 
deceiving Hispanic consumers who sought to refinance their homes. The FTC’s com-
plaint  alleged  that  the  broker  misrepresented  numerous  key  loan  terms.31 The  al-
leged  conduct  was  egregious  because  the  FTC  claimed  that  the  lender  conducted 
business  with  its  clients  almost  entirely  in  Spanish,  and  then  provided  loan  docu-
ments  in  English  at  closing  containing  the  less  favorable  terms.  To  settle  the  suit, 
the broker paid consumer redress and agreed to a permanent injunction prohibiting 
it from misrepresenting loan terms.32 

The  Commission  also  has  challenged  deceptive  and  unfair  practices  in  the  serv-
icing  of  mortgage  loans.33 For  example,  in  November  2003,  the  Commission,  along 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

10 

with  the  Department  of  Housing  and  Urban  Development  (‘‘HUD’’),  announced  a 
settlement  with  Fairbanks  Capital  Corp.  and  its  parent  company.  Fairbanks  (now 
called  Select  Portfolio  Servicing,  Inc.)  had  been  one  of  the  country’s  largest  third- 
party subprime loan servicers—it did not originate any loans, but collected and proc-
essed payments on behalf of the holders of the mortgage notes. The Commission al-
leged  that  Fairbanks  failed  to  post  consumers’  payments  upon  receipt,  charged  for 
unnecessary  insurance,  and  imposed  other  unauthorized  fees.  The  complaint  also 
charged Fairbanks with violating Federal laws by using dishonest or abusive tactics 
to  collect  debts,  and  by  reporting  to  credit  bureaus  consumer  payment  information 
that  it  knew  to  be  inaccurate.  To  resolve  these  charges,  Fairbanks  and  its  former 
chief executive officer paid over $40 million in consumer redress, agreed to halt the 
alleged  illegal  practices,  and  implemented  significant  changes  to  company  business 
practices  to  prevent  future  violations.34 Just  last  month,  the  FTC  announced  a 
modified  settlement  with  the  company,  which  provided  substantial  benefits  to  con-
sumers  beyond  those  in  the  original  settlement,  including  account  adjustments  and 
reimbursements or refunds of fees paid in certain circumstances.35 

To  leverage  resources  in  the  Commission’s  work  on  subprime  mortgage  lending, 
this  summer  it  announced  that  it  will  cooperate  in  an  innovative  pilot  project  with 
Federal banking agencies and state regulators to conduct targeted consumer-protec-
tion compliance reviews of selected non-depository lenders with significant subprime 
mortgage operations. The agencies will share information about the reviews and in-
vestigations, take action as appropriate, collaborate on the lessons learned, and seek 
ways  to  better  cooperate  in  ensuring  effective  and  consistent  reviews  of  these  insti-
tutions. 

Finally,  the  Commission’s  Bureau  of  Economics  recently  announced  results  of  a 
study that confirms the need to improve mortgage disclosures.36 The research found: 
(1)  the  current  federally  required  disclosures  fail  to  convey  key  mortgage  costs  to 
many  consumers;  (2)  better  disclosures  can  significantly  improve  consumer  recogni-
tion of mortgage costs; (3) both prime and subprime borrowers failed to understand 
key  loan  terms  when  viewing  the  current  disclosures,  and  both  benefited  from  im-
proved  disclosures;  and  (4)  improved  disclosures  provided  the  greatest  benefit  for 
more  complex  loans,  for  which  both  prime  and  subprime  borrowers  had  the  most 
difficulty understanding loan terms. The Commission is working with Federal regu-
lators on next steps. 
2. Payment Cards 

The  Commission  continues  to  bring  law  enforcement  actions  against  marketers 
and  distributors  of  payment  cards  within  its  jurisdiction.  On  July  30,  the  Commis-
sion obtained a temporary restraining order prohibiting EDebitPay and related com-
panies  from  marketing  reloadable  prepaid  debit  cards 37 without  adequately  dis-
closing a processing and application fee of over $150. Moreover, the FTC alleges that 
some  consumers  who  did  not  apply  for  defendants’  prepaid  card  nevertheless  suf-
fered  unauthorized  debits  from  their  bank  accounts.  When  consumers  complained 
about  the  unauthorized  withdrawals,  defendants  allegedly  erected  formidable  bar-
riers to obtaining refunds, including misrepresenting that consumers could not con-
test the debits as unauthorized. 

The  Commission  has  also  been  examining  hidden  expiration  dates  and  dormancy 
fees on gift cards. This year, the Commission has announced two settlements in this 
area,  one  with  Kmart  Corporation  and  another  with  the  national  restaurant  com-
pany,  Darden  Restaurants.38 According  to  the  FTC’s  complaints,  both  Kmart  and 
Darden  promoted  their  gift  cards  as  equivalent  to  cash  but  failed  to  disclose  that 
fees  are  assessed  after  2  years  (initially  15  months,  in  Darden’s  case)  of  non-use. 
In  addition,  the  FTC  alleged  that  Kmart  affirmatively  misrepresented  that  its  card 
would never expire. Kmart and Darden have agreed to disclose the existence of any 
fees prominently in future advertising and on the front of the gift card. Both compa-
nies  have  also  agreed  to  provide  refunds  of  dormancy  fees  assessed  on  their  cards. 
Kmart will reimburse the dormancy fees for consumers who provide an affected gift 
card’s  number,  a  mailing  address,  and  a  telephone  number.  Darden  will  automati-
cally restore to each card any dormancy fees that were assessed. In 2006, both com-
panies voluntarily stopped charging dormancy fees on their gift cards. 
3. Debt Collection 

The FTC is tackling the problem of unlawful debt collection practices in two ways. 
First, the Commission engages in aggressive law enforcement. In nineteen lawsuits 
filed since 1998, the FTC has alleged that the defendants—including collection agen-
cies,  collection  law  firms,  companies  that  purchase  and  collect  delinquent  credit  ac-
counts, and credit issuers—used illegal debt collection practices.39 In one such case, 
announced  in  February  of  this  year,  the  Commission  charged  a  collection  agency, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

11 

Rawlins  &  Rivera,  Inc.,  and  its  principals  with  violating  Federal  law  by  falsely 
threatening  consumers  with  lawsuits,  seizure  of  property,  and  arrest.40 The  court 
has  granted  the  FTC’s  request  for  a  preliminary  injunction,41 and  the  litigation  is 
continuing.  In  another  case,  in  June  2007,  the  FTC  obtained  an  injunction  against 
defendants who victimized Spanish-speaking consumers by posing as debt collectors 
seeking payments consumers did not owe. 

Second,  given  the  rise  in  consumer  debt  levels,  as  well  as  consumer  complaints, 
it is time to take another look at the debt collection industry. This fall the FTC will 
hold  a  workshop  to  examine  debt  collection  practices  thirty  years  after  enactment 
of  the  Fair  Debt  Collection  Practices  Act.  The  Commission  will  examine  changes  in 
the industry and the related consumer protection issues, including whether the law 
has kept pace with developments. 
E. Telemarketing and Do Not Call 

Since the mid-1980s, the Commission has had a strong commitment to rooting out 
telemarketing fraud. From 1991 to the present, the FTC has brought more than 350 
telemarketing cases; 240 of these cases were brought after 1995, when the FTC pro-
mulgated  the  Telemarketing  Sales  Rule  (‘‘TSR’’).42 As  one  illustration  of  the  Com-
mission’s robust enforcement program, in July, the FTC halted the allegedly unlaw-
ful telemarketing operations of Suntasia Marketing 43 which, according to the FTC’s 
complaint, took millions of dollars directly out of consumers’ bank accounts without 
their knowledge or authorization. Suntasia allegedly tricked consumers into divulg-
ing  their  bank  account  numbers  by  pretending  to  be  affiliated  with  the  consumer’s 
bank and offering a purportedly ‘‘free gift’’ to consumers who accepted a ‘‘free trial’’ 
of  Suntasia’s  products.  The  complaint  alleges  that,  once  consumers  divulged  their 
bank  account  number,  Suntasia  debited  many  of  their  accounts.  At  the  FTC’s  re-
quest,  a  court  halted  the  scheme  and  froze  the  defendants’  assets  to  preserve  the 
Commission’s ability to distribute redress to injured consumers, should the Commis-
sion prevail in this litigation. 

The FTC also works closely with its Canadian counterparts to combat cross-border 
telemarketing fraud. One recent case resulted in a judgment of more than $8 million 
against Canadian telemarketers of advance fee credit cards.44 In this case, the FTC 
closely  coordinated  its  action  with  other  members  of  the  Toronto  Strategic  Partner-
ships, a group of Canadian, U.S., and U.K. law enforcers whose mission is to cooper-
ate in bringing telemarketing fraud cases. 

As a complement to its anti-fraud work in the telemarketing arena, the Commis-
sion  has  an  active  program  to  enforce  the  Do  Not  Call  provisions  of  the  TSR.  Con-
sumers have registered more than 147 million telephone numbers since the Do Not 
Call  Registry  became  operational  in  June  2003.  The  Do  Not  Call  provisions  have 
been  tremendously  successful  in  protecting  consumer’s  privacy  from  unwanted  tele-
marketing calls. Because currently consumers’ registrations expire after 5 years, the 
Commission plans a significant effort to educate consumers on the need to reregister 
their phone numbers. 

Most entities covered by the Do Not Call provisions comply, but for those who do 
not, tough enforcement is a high priority for the FTC. Twenty-seven of the Commis-
sion’s telemarketing cases have alleged Do Not Call violations, resulting in $8.8 mil-
lion in civil penalties and $8.6 million in redress or disgorgement ordered.45 

The Commission understands that this Committee has passed S. 781, the Do Not 
Call  Implementation  Act  (‘‘DNCIA’’).  The  Commission  supports  this  legislation  and 
appreciates  the  Committee’s  work  on  it.  The  Commission  believes  that  the  legisla-
tion,  if  enacted,  will  help  ensure  the  continued  success  of  the  National  Registry  by 
providing the Commission with a stable funding source for its TSR enforcement ac-
tivities.  We  also  believe  that  the  proposed  legislation  would  benefit  telemarketers, 
sellers, and service providers who access the Registry by providing them with a level 
fee structure. 
F. Media Violence 

The Commission has continued its efforts to monitor the marketing of violent en-
tertainment to children and to encourage industry self-regulation. Since it began ex-
amining the issue in 1999, the Commission has issued six reports on the marketing 
of violent entertainment products to children. In April 2007, the Commission issued 
its latest report, which concluded that the movie, music, and video game industries 
generally  comply  with  their  own  voluntary  standards  regarding  the  display  of  rat-
ings  and  labels.  Entertainment  industries,  however,  continue  to  market  some  R- 
rated  movies,  M-rated  video  games,  and  explicit-content  recordings  on  television 
shows  and  websites  with  substantial  teen  audiences.  In  addition,  the  FTC  found 
that  while  video  game  retailers  have  made  significant  progress  in  limiting  sales  of 
M-rated  games  to  children,  movie  and  music  retailers  have  made  only  modest 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

12 

progress  in  limiting  sales  of  R-rated  and  unrated  DVDs  and  explicit  content  music 
recordings to children. The report also provides the results of a Commission survey 
of parents and children on their awareness and use of the video game rating system. 
G. ‘‘Green’’ Marketing 

The  Commission  continues  to  monitor  marketplace  developments  to  identify  new 
consumer protection issues. In monitoring developments in the energy and environ-
mental areas, the Commission has observed that new ‘‘green’’ claims, such as claims 
for  carbon  reduction,  landfill  reduction,  and  sustainable  packaging  are  entering  the 
market  daily.  These  claims  can  be  extremely  useful  for  consumers;  however,  the 
complexity of the issues involved creates the potential for confusing, misleading, and 
fraudulent  claims.  Given  this  potential,  in  the  coming  months,  FTC  staff  plans  to 
conduct  research,  develop  consumer  and  business  outreach,  and  bring  appropriate 
enforcement  actions  in  this  area.  As  part  of  the  research  process,  the  Commission 
plans  to  host  a  series  of  public  workshops  to  seek  input  from  consumers,  industry 
representatives,  environmental  groups,  academics,  and  other  government  agencies 
on how to prevent fraud and deception in this marketplace, while at the same time 
encouraging innovation and competition on the basis of truthful claims. 
H. Aiding Criminal Enforcement 

This testimony has highlighted various deceptive and unfair practices pursued by 
the  Commission,  from  spam  to  spyware  to  health  fraud  to  telemarketing  fraud. 
These  frauds  that  the  FTC  pursues  civilly  are  also  often  criminal  violations.  The 
FTC’s  Criminal  Liaison  Unit,  or  ‘‘CLU,’’  has  stepped  up  cooperation  with  criminal 
authorities—an illustration of the FTC’s efforts to bring the collective powers of dif-
ferent government agencies to bear upon serious misconduct in many consumer pro-
tection areas. Since October 2006, based on CLU referrals to criminal agencies, 115 
FTC  defendants  or  their  associates  have  been  charged,  pled  guilty,  or  were  sen-
tenced in criminal cases. The FTC’s criminal referral program continues to be a high 
priority. 

III. Maintaining Competition 

In  addition  to  addressing  unfair  and  deceptive  conduct,  the  Commission  is 
charged with protecting consumers by protecting competition. The goal of the FTC’s 
competition mission is to strengthen free and open markets by removing the obsta-
cles that impede competition and prevent its benefits from flowing to consumers. To 
accomplish this, the FTC has focused its enforcement efforts on sectors of the econ-
omy that have a significant impact on consumers, such as health care, energy, tech-
nology, and real estate. 
A. Health Care 

The health care industry plays a crucial role in the U.S. economy in terms of con-
sumer spending and welfare, and thus, the FTC has dedicated substantial resources 
to  protecting  consumers  by  vigorously  reviewing  proposed  merger  transactions,  in-
vestigating potentially anticompetitive conduct that threatens consumer interests. 
1. Agreements that Delay Generic Entry 

The FTC continues to be vigilant in the detection and investigation of agreements 
between drug companies that delay generic entry, including investigating some pat-
ent  settlement  agreements  between  pharmaceutical  companies  that  are  required  to 
be  filed  with  the  Commission  under  the  Medicare  Prescription  Drug,  Improvement, 
and  Modernization  Act  of  2003.  In  these  ‘‘exclusion  payment  settlements’’  (or,  to 
some,  ‘‘reverse  payment  settlements’’),  the  brand-name  drug  firm  pays  its  potential 
generic  competitor  to  abandon  the  patent  challenge  and  delay  entering  the  market. 
Such  settlements  restrict  competition  at  the  expense  of  consumers,  whose  access  to 
lower-priced generic drugs is delayed, sometimes for many years. 

Recent  court  decisions,  however,  have  made  it  more  difficult  to  bring  antitrust 
cases  to  stop  exclusion  payment  settlements,  and  the  impact  of  those  court  rulings 
is  becoming  evident  in  the  marketplace.  These  developments  threaten  substantial 
harm to consumers and others who pay for prescription drugs. For that reason, the 
Commission  supports  a  legislative  solution  to  prohibit  these  anticompetitive  settle-
ments,  while  allowing  exceptions  for  those  agreements  that  do  not  harm  competi-
tion. 

In  addition,  in  November  2005,  in  the  case  of  FTC  v.  Warner  Chilcott  Holdings 
Company III, Ltd., the Commission filed a complaint in Federal district court seek-
ing  to  terminate  an  agreement  between  drug  manufacturers  Warner  Chilcott  and 
Barr  Laboratories  that  prevented  Barr  from  selling  a  lower-priced  generic  version 
of  Warner  Chilcott’s  Ovcon  35,  a  branded  oral  contraceptive.46 Under  threat  of  a 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

13 

preliminary injunction, in September 2006, Warner Chilcott waived the exclusionary 
provision in its agreement with Barr that prevented Barr from entering with its ge-
neric  version  of  Ovcon.  The  next  day,  Barr  announced  its  intention  to  start  selling 
a generic version of the product, and it now has done so, giving consumers the bene-
fits of price competition.47 
2. Pharmaceuticals, Medical Devices, and Diagnostic Systems 

The  Commission  is  active  in  enforcing  the  antitrust  laws  in  the  pharmaceutical, 
medical  devices,  and  diagnostic  systems  industries.  For  example,  the  Commission 
challenged the terms of Actavis Group hf.’s proposed acquisition of Abrika Pharma-
ceuticals,  Inc.,  alleging  that  the  transaction  would  create  a  monopoly  in  the  U.S. 
market  for  generic  isradipine  capsules,  a  drug  typically  prescribed  to  patients  to 
lower  their  blood  pressure  and  to  treat  hypertension,  ischemia,  and  depression. 
Under  a  consent  order  that  allowed  the  deal  to  proceed,  the  companies  divested  all 
rights and assets needed to make and market generic isradipine capsules to Cobalt 
Laboratories,  Inc.,  an  independent  competitor.48 The  FTC  also  challenged  Barr 
Pharmaceuticals’  proposed  acquisition  of  Pliva.49 In  settling  the  Commission’s 
charges  that  the  transaction  would  have  increased  concentration  and  led  to  higher 
prices,  Barr  was  required  to  sell  its  generic  antidepressant,  trazodone;  its  generic 
blood  pressure  medication,  triamterene/HCTZ;  either  Pliva’s  or  Barr’s  generic  drug 
for  use  in  treating  ruptured  blood  vessels  in  the  brain;  and  Pliva’s  branded  organ 
preservation  solution.  Last  year,  the  FTC  challenged  several  other  pharmaceutical 
mergers,  including:  Watson  Pharmaceuticals/Andrx  Corporation; 50 Teva  Pharma-
ceutical  Industries/IVAX  Corporation; 51 Johnson  &  Johnson’s  acquisition  of  Pfizer’s 
consumer  health  division; 52 and  Hospira,  Inc./Mayne  Pharma  Limited.53 Recent 
FTC  medical  devices  and  diagnostic  systems  cases  include:  the  FTC’s  challenge  of 
the proposed $27 billion acquisition of Guidant Corporation by Boston Scientific Cor-
poration,  in  which  the  FTC  required  the  divestiture  of  Guidant’s  vascular  business 
to an FTC-approved buyer; 54 and the FTC’s challenges of mergers affecting markets 
for  biopsy  systems  and  for  centrifugal  vacuum  evaporators  used  in  the  health  care 
industry.55 

FTC  staff  also  has  initiated  a  study  on  authorized  generic  drugs.56 The  study  is 
intended  to  help  the  agency  understand  the  circumstances  under  which  innovator 
companies launch authorized generics; to provide data and analysis of how competi-
tion between generics and authorized generics during the Hatch-Waxman Act’s 180- 
day  exclusivity  period  has  affected  short-run  price  competition  and  long-run  pros-
pects  for  generic  entry;  and  to  build  on  the  economic  literature  about  the  effect  of 
generic drug entry on prescription drug prices. 
3. Hospitals and Physicians 

The  Commission  has  worked  vigorously  to  preserve  competition  in  local  hospital 
markets.  Last  month,  the  Commission  ruled  that  Evanston  Northwestern 
Healthcare  Corporation’s  acquisition  of  Highland  Park  Hospital  was  anticompeti-
tive,57 upholding  an  October  2005  Initial  Decision  by  an  FTC  Administrative  Law 
Judge that the consummated acquisition of its important competitor, Highland Park 
Hospital, resulted in substantially higher prices and a substantial lessening of com-
petition for acute care inpatient hospital services in parts of Chicago’s northern sub-
urbs.58 Several other hospital mergers have been announced within the past several 
months, and the FTC has active investigations pending.59 

The  FTC  continues  to  investigate  and  challenge  unlawful  price  fixing  by  physi-
cians  and  other  health  care  providers  that  may  lead  to  higher  costs  for  consumers. 
In the past year, the FTC challenged the practices of four physician groups alleging 
that the competing providers jointly set their prices and collectively agreed to refuse 
to  deal  with  health  care  payers  that  did  not  meet  their  fee  demands.  The  FTC 
charges  against  these  groups  were  resolved  by  consent  orders.60 Further,  in  June, 
the  Commission  accepted  a  consent  order  in  South  Carolina  State  Board  of  Den-
tistry,61 resolving  charges  that  the  South  Carolina  State  Board  of  Dentistry  re-
strained  competition  in  the  provision  of  preventive  care  by  dental  hygienists,  lim-
iting access to care by children living in poverty. 
B. Energy 

Few issues are more important to American consumers and businesses than high 
energy  prices.  The  FTC  plays  a  key  role  in  maintaining  competition  and  protecting 
consumers in energy markets by challenging antitrust violations, conducting studies 
and analyses, and providing comments to other government agencies. 

So far in 2007, the Commission has challenged three mergers in the energy indus-
try.  This  past  spring,  the  Commission  challenged  Equitable  Resources  proposed  ac-
quisition  of  The  Peoples  Natural  Gas  Company,  a  subsidiary  of  Dominion  Re-
sources.62 Equitable  and  Dominion  Peoples  are  each  other’s  sole  competitors  in  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

14 

distribution of natural gas to nonresidential customers in certain areas of Allegheny 
County,  Pennsylvania,  which  includes  Pittsburgh.  In  March,  the  FTC  filed  an  ad-
ministrative  complaint  against  the  acquisition,  and  in  April  the  staff  sought  an  in-
junction  in  Federal  court.  Both  actions  alleged  that  the  proposed  transaction  would 
result in a monopoly for many customers who now benefit from competition between 
the two firms. The district court denied the FTC’s request for an injunction, assert-
ing that because the Pennsylvania Utility Commission has the power to approve the 
merger,  the  FTC  is  banned  from  taking  action  under  the  state  action  doctrine.  The 
Third  Circuit  has  issued  an  injunction  pending  appeal,  and  the  appeal  will  be  ar-
gued in early October. 

In  January  2007,  the  Commission  challenged  the  terms  of  a  proposed  $22  billion 
deal  whereby  energy  firm  Kinder  Morgan  would  be  taken  private  by  its  manage-
ment and a group of investment firms, including The Carlyle Group and Riverstone 
Holdings.63 The  Commission  alleged  in  its  complaint  that  Carlyle  and  Riverstone 
held significant positions in Magellan Midstream, a major competitor of Kinder Mor-
gan in the terminaling of gasoline and other light petroleum products in the south-
eastern  United  States,  and  that  the  proposed  transaction  would  threaten  competi-
tion in those markets. In settling the Commission’s charges, Carlyle and Riverstone 
agreed to turn their investment in Magellan passive and to restrict the flow of sen-
sitive information between Kinder Morgan and Magellan. 

In the most recent petroleum merger challenge, the Commission challenged West-
ern  Refining’s  acquisition  of  Giant  Industries  to  preserve  competition  in  the  bulk 
supply  of  light  petroleum  products  to  northern  New  Mexico,  an  area  of  the  country 
where  the  Commission  alleged  that  the  two  companies  are  direct  and  significant 
competitors.64 The Commission’s complaint for a preliminary injunction filed in Fed-
eral  court  and  its  subsequently  issued  administrative  complaint  alleged  that,  if  it 
were  not  acquired  by  Western,  Giant  would  soon  increase  the  supply  of  gasoline  to 
northern New Mexico, and that the transaction as proposed would prevent this. The 
U.S.  district  judge  in  New  Mexico  denied  the  Commission’s  request  for  a  prelimi-
nary injunction.65 

The  Commission  also  actively  monitors  energy  markets,  and  markets  for  related 
consumer  products,  for  anticompetitive  conduct.  In  June  2007,  the  Commission 
charged  the  American  Petroleum  Company,  Inc.  with  illegally  conspiring  with  its 
competitors  to  restrict  the  importation  and  sale  of  motor  oil  lubricants  in  Puerto 
Rico,  in  an  attempt  to  force  the  legislature  to  repeal  a  law  that  charged  importers 
and  others  within  the  distribution  chain  an  environmental  deposit  of  50  cents  for 
each  quart  of  lubricants  purchased.66 The  Commission’s  consent  order  bars  Amer-
ican Petroleum from engaging in such conduct in the future. 

On April 25, 2006, President Bush directed the DOJ to join the FTC and the De-
partment  of  Energy  to  inquire  into  ‘‘illegal  manipulation  or  cheating  related  to  the 
current  gasoline  prices.’’ 67 Accordingly,  staff  of  the  Commission  and  the  DOJ  Anti-
trust Division, with assistance from the Department of Energy’s Energy Information 
Administration,  conducted  an  economic  analysis  and  investigation  of  the  likely  fac-
tors that led to higher national average gasoline prices during the spring and sum-
mer  of  2006,  and  to  determine  whether  anticompetitive  conduct  may  have  oc-
curred.68 This  study  identified  six  major  factors  that  contributed  to  price  rises  dur-
ing  the  spring  and  summer  of  2006:  (1)  the  market  effects  of  the  summer  driving 
season;  (2)  an  increase  in  the  price  of  crude  oil;  (3)  an  increase  in  the  price  of  eth-
anol; (4) capacity issues related to the transition to ethanol from MTBE; (5) refinery 
outages;  and  (6)  increased  demand.  A  report  detailing  the  findings  was  sent  to  the 
President in August.69 

In May 2006, the FTC released a report titled Investigation of Gasoline Price Ma-
nipulation  and  Post-Katrina  Gasoline  Price  Increases.70 This  report  contained  the 
findings of a Congressionally-mandated Commission investigation into whether gas-
oline  prices  were  ‘‘artificially  manipulated  by  reducing  refinery  capacity  or  by  any 
other  form  of  market  manipulation  or  price  gouging  practices.’’  The  report  also  dis-
cusses gasoline pricing by refiners, large wholesalers, and retailers in the aftermath 
of  Hurricane  Katrina.  In  its  investigation,  the  FTC  examined  evidence  relating  to 
a broad range of possible forms of manipulation. It found no instances of illegal mar-
ket  manipulation  that  led  to  higher  prices  during  the  relevant  time  periods,  but 
found  fifteen  examples  of  pricing  at  the  refining,  wholesale,  or  retail  level  that  fit 
the legislation’s definition of evidence of ‘‘price gouging.’’ 71 Other factors such as re-
gional  or  local  market  trends,  however,  appeared  to  explain  these  firms’  prices  in 
nearly all cases.72 
C. Real Estate 

Purchasing or selling a home is one of the most significant financial transactions 
most consumers will ever make, and anticompetitive industry practices can raise the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

15 

prices of real estate services. In the past year, the agency has brought eight enforce-
ment actions against associations of competing realtors or brokers. The associations, 
which control multiple listing services, adopted rules that allegedly discouraged con-
sumers from entering into non-traditional listing contracts with real estate brokers. 
In  seven  of  these  matters,  the  Commission  accepted  settlements  prohibiting  mul-
tiple  listing  services  from  discriminating  against  non-traditional  listing  arrange-
ments.  The  eighth  matter,  RealComp,  is  currently  in  administrative  litigation;  a 
trial  was  held  in  June  and  closing  arguments  are  scheduled  for  September.73 The 
result of these actions will allow consumers more choice and ensure that consumers 
who choose to use discount real estate brokers will not be handicapped by rules pre-
venting other consumers from seeing their home listings on the Internet. 
D. Technology 

Technology  is  another  area  in  which  the  Commission  has  acted  to  protect  con-
sumers  by  safeguarding  competition.  In  February  2007,  the  Commission  issued  an 
opinion  and  final  order  on  remedies  in  the  legal  proceeding  against  computer  tech-
nology  developer  Rambus,  Inc.74 Previously,  in  July  2006,  the  Commission  had  de-
termined that Rambus unlawfully monopolized the markets for four computer mem-
ory  technologies  that  have  been  incorporated  into  industry  standards  for  dynamic 
random  access  memory  (DRAM)  chips.  DRAM  chips  are  widely  used  in  personal 
computers,  servers,  printers,  and  cameras.75 In  addition  to  barring  Rambus  from 
making  misrepresentations  or  omissions  to  standard-setting  organizations  again  in 
the  future,  the  February  2007  order,  among  other  things,  requires  Rambus  to  li-
cense  its  SDRAM  and  DDR  SDRAM  technology;  with  respect  to  uses  of  patented 
technologies after the effective date of the order, bars Rambus from collecting more 
than  the  specified  maximum  allowable  royalty  rates;  and  requires  Rambus  to  em-
ploy a Commission-approved compliance officer to ensure that Rambus’s patents and 
patent applications are disclosed to industry standard-setting bodies in which it par-
ticipates.76 Rambus has appealed the Commission’s rulings to the U.S. Court of Ap-
peals for the District of Columbia Circuit. 
E. Retail and Other Industries 

The FTC also guards against anticompetitive conduct in the retail sector. In June 
2007,  the  Commission  sought  a  preliminary  injunction  in  Federal  district  court 
blocking  Whole  Foods’  acquisition  of  its  chief  rival,  Wild  Oats  Markets,  Inc.77 The 
FTC charged that the proposed transaction would violate Federal antitrust laws by 
eliminating  the  substantial  competition  between  these  two  uniquely  close  competi-
tors  in  numerous  geographic  markets  across  the  country  in  the  operation  of  pre-
mium  natural  and  organic  supermarkets.  On  August  16,  2007,  a  judge  for  the  U.S. 
District  Court  of  the  District  of  Columbia  denied  the  FTC’s  motion  for  preliminary 
injunction, and on August 23, the Court of Appeals denied the FTC’s emergency mo-
tion  for  an  injunction  pending  appeal.78 The  matter  remains  in  administrative  liti-
gation. Also, this year in June, the FTC challenged Rite Aid Corporation’s proposed 
$3.5  billion  acquisition  of  the  Brooks  and  Eckerd  pharmacies  from  Canada’s  Jean 
Coutu Group (PJC), Inc.79 To remedy the alleged anticompetitive impact of the pro-
posed transaction, the Commission ordered Rite Aid and Jean Coutu to sell 23 phar-
macies  to  Commission-approved  buyers  to  preserve  the  competition  that  would  oth-
erwise be lost in the merger. 

In March 2007, the Commission announced a proposed order settling charges that 
the  Missouri  State  Board  of  Embalmers  and  Funeral  Directors  illegally  restrained 
competition  by  defining  the  practice  of  funeral  directing  to  include  selling  funeral 
merchandise  to  consumers  on  an  at-need  basis.80 The  Board’s  regulation  permitted 
only  licensed  funeral  directors  to  sell  caskets  to  consumers  on  an  at-need  basis, 
thereby restricting competition from other retailers. The Board ended the restriction 
last year and agreed that it will not prohibit or discourage the sale of caskets, serv-
ices, or other funeral merchandise by unlicensed persons, thereby settling the Com-
mission’s charges. 

The  Commission  also  has  sought  to  protect  customers  by  imposing  conditions  on 
mergers  involving  diverse  industries  such  as  launch  services; 81 the  manufacture  of 
ammunition  for  mortars  and  artillery; 82 the  Nation’s  two  largest  funeral  home  and 
cemetery chains; 83 and liquid oxygen and helium.84 
F. Guidance, Transparency, and Merger Review Process Improvements 

The  FTC  works  to  facilitate  cooperation  and  voluntary  compliance  with  the  law 
by  promoting  transparency  in  enforcement  standards,  policies,  and  decision-making 
processes. Last year, the FTC implemented two important reforms that streamlined 
the merger review process. In February 2006, the Commission announced the imple-
mentation  of  significant  merger  process  reforms  aimed  at  reducing  the  costs  borne 
by  both  the  FTC  and  merging  parties.85 In  June  2006,  the  FTC  and  the  DOJ  Anti-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

16 

trust  Division  implemented  an  electronic  filing  system  that  allows  merging  parties 
to  submit,  via  the  Internet,  premerger  notification  filings  required  by  the  Hart- 
Scott-Rodino Act.86 
G. Competition Advocacy 

The  Commission  frequently  provides  comments  to  Federal  and  state  legislatures 
and  government  agencies,  sharing  its  expertise  on  the  competitive  impact  of  pro-
posed  laws  and  regulations  when  they  explicitly  or  implicitly  impact  the  antitrust 
laws,  and  when  they  alter  the  competitive  environment  through  restrictions  on 
price, innovation, or entry conditions. Recent FTC advocacy efforts have contributed 
to  several  positive  outcomes  for  consumers.  In  the  past  year,  the  FTC  has  sought 
to  persuade  regulators  to  adopt  policies  that  do  not  unnecessarily  restrict  competi-
tion  in  the  areas  of  gasoline  sales,87 real  estate  brokerage,88 real  estate  legal  serv-
ices,89 attorney advertising,90 and pharmacy benefit managers.91 
H. Hearings, Reports, Conferences, and Workshops 

The  FTC’s  hearings,  conferences,  and  workshops  represent  a  unique  opportunity 
for  the  agency  to  develop  policy  and  research  tools  and  help  foster  a  deeper  under-
standing  of  the  complex  issues  involved  in  the  economic  and  legal  analysis  of  anti-
trust law. 

Beginning in June 2006 and continuing through May 2007, the FTC and the DOJ 
Antitrust Division held hearings to discuss the boundaries of permissible and imper-
missible  conduct  under  Section  2  of  the  Sherman  Act.92 The  primary  goal  of  the 
hearings was to examine whether and when specific types of single-firm conduct are 
procompetitive  or  benign  and  when  they  may  harm  competition.  The  Commission 
expects to issue a report with DOJ on the hearings. 

In  August  2006,  the  FTC  convened  the  Internet  Access  Task  Force  to  examine 
issues raised by converging technologies and regulatory developments, and to inform 
the  enforcement,  advocacy,  and  education  initiatives  of  the  Commission.  Under  the 
leadership of the Internet Access Task Force, the FTC recently addressed two issues 
of interest to policymakers. 

First,  in  October  2006,  the  FTC  released  a  staff  report,  Municipal  Provision  of 
Wireless  Internet.  The  report  identifies  the  potential  benefits  and  risks  to  competi-
tion  and  consumers  associated  with  municipal  provision  of  wireless  Internet  serv-
ice.93 Second, in June 2007, the FTC released a staff report, Broadband Connectivity 
Competition  Policy,  which  summarizes  the  Task  Force’s  findings  in  the  area  of 
broadband  Internet  access,  including  so-called  ‘‘network  neutrality.’’ 94 The  report 
proposes  guiding  principles  for  assessing  this  complex  issue,  and  makes  clear  that 
the  FTC  will  continue  to  vigorously  enforce  the  antitrust  and  consumer  protection 
laws and expend considerable efforts on consumer education, industry guidance, and 
competition advocacy in the important area of broadband Internet access. 

In April 2007, the Commission held a three-day conference on Energy Markets in 
the  21st  Century:  Competition  Policy  in  Perspective.95 The  conference  brought  to-
gether leading experts from government, the energy industry, consumer groups, and 
the academic community to participate on panels to examine such topics as: (1) the 
relationship  between  market  forces  and  government  policy  in  energy  markets;  (2) 
the dependence of the U.S. transportation sector on petroleum; (3) the effects of elec-
tric  power  industry  restructuring  on  competition  and  consumers;  (4)  what  energy 
producers  and  consumers  may  expect  in  the  way  of  technological  developments  in 
the industry; (5) the security of U.S. energy supplies; and (6) the government’s role 
in  maintaining  competition  and  protecting  energy  consumers.  The  Commission  ex-
pects to issue a report detailing the findings of this conference. 

Also in April of this year, the FTC and the DOJ issued a joint report, titled Anti-
trust Enforcement and Intellectual Property Rights: Promoting Innovation and Com-
petition,  to  inform  consumers,  businesses,  and  intellectual  property  rights  holders 
about  the  agencies’  competition  views  with  respect  to  a  wide  range  of  activities  in-
volving  intellectual  property.96 The  report  discusses  issues  including:  refusals  to  li-
cense patents, collaborative standard setting, patent pooling, intellectual property li-
censing,  the  tying  and  bundling  of  intellectual  property  rights,  and  methods  of  ex-
tending  market  power  conferred  by  a  patent  beyond  the  patent’s  expiration.  This 
second  report  on  antitrust  and  intellectual  property  joins  a  report  issued  in  2003 
following extensive hearings on this important topic. 

In May 2007, the Commission and the DOJ Antitrust Division released a joint re-
port,  Competition  in  the  Real  Estate  Brokerage  Industry.  The  purpose  of  the  report 
is to inform consumers and other industry participants about important competition 
issues  involving  residential  real  estate,  including  the  impact  of  the  Internet,  the 
competitive structure of the real estate brokerage industry, and obstacles to a more 
competitive environment.97 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

17 

I. Competition Education Initiatives 

The  FTC  is  committed  to  enhancing  consumer  confidence  in  the  marketplace 
through  enforcement  and  education.  This  year,  Commission  staff  launched  a  multi- 
dimensional outreach campaign, targeting new and bigger audiences, with the mes-
sage  that  antitrust  enforcement  helps  consumers  reap  the  benefits  of  competitive 
markets  by  keeping  prices  low  and  services  and  innovation  high,  as  well  as  by  en-
couraging  more  choices  in  the  marketplace.98 As  a  part  of  this  effort,  the  Commis-
sion’s  website,  www.ftc.gov,  continues  to  grow  in  size  and  scope  with  resources  on 
competition policy in a variety of vital industries. This year, the FTC launched new 
industry-specific  websites  for  Oil  and  Gas,99 Health  Care,100 Real  Estate,101 and 
Technology.102 These  minisites  serve  as  a  one-stop  shop  for  consumers  and  busi-
nesses  who  want  to  know  what  the  FTC  is  doing  to  promote  competition  in  these 
important  business  sectors.  In  the  past  year,  the  FTC  also  issued  practical  tips  for 
consumers on buying and selling real estate, funeral services, and generic drugs, as 
well as ‘‘plain language’’ columns on oil and gas availability and pricing. 

III. International 

The  FTC’s  Office  of  International  Affairs  (OIA),  created  in  January  2007,  brings 
together the international functions formerly handled in the Bureaus of Competition 
and  Consumer  Protection  and  the  Office  of  General  Counsel.  OIA  brings  increased 
prominence  to  the  FTC’s  international  work,  and  enhances  the  FTC’s  ability  to  co-
ordinate  its  enforcement  efforts  effectively  to  promote  sound  enforcement  and  con-
vergence  toward  best  practices  with  the  agency’s  counterpart  agencies  around  the 
world. 

The FTC has built a strong network of cooperative relationships with its counter-
parts  abroad,  and  plays  a  leading  role  in  key  multilateral  fora.  The  growth  of  com-
munication media and electronic commerce presents new challenges to law enforce-
ment—fraud and deception know no borders. The Commission works with other na-
tions to protect American consumers who can be harmed by anticompetitive conduct 
and frauds perpetrated outside the United States. The FTC also actively assists new 
democracies  moving  toward  market-based  economies  with  developing  and  imple-
menting competition and consumer protection laws and policies. 
A. Consumer Protection 

Globalization  and  rapid  changes  in  technology  have  accelerated  the  pace  of  new 
consumer  protection  challenges,  such  as  spam,  spyware,  telemarketing  fraud,  data 
security,  and  privacy,  that  cross  national  borders  and  raise  both  enforcement  and 
policy issues. The Internet and modern communications devices, such as Voice-over- 
Internet  Protocol,  have  provided  tremendous  benefits  to  consumers  but  also  have 
aided mass marketing fraud and raised fresh privacy concerns. The FTC has a com-
prehensive  international  consumer  protection  program  of  enforcement,  networking, 
and policy initiatives to address these new challenges. 

In the coming year, the FTC will continue to implement the U.S. SAFE WEB Act 
of  2006,  which  was  signed  into  law  last  December.  Thanks  to  the  actions  of  this 
Committee,  the  U.S.  SAFE  WEB  Act  provides  the  FTC  with  updated  tools  for  the 
21st  century.  It  allows  the  FTC  to  cooperate  more  fully  with  foreign  law  enforce-
ment  agencies  in  the  area  of  cross-border  fraud  and  other  practices  that  are  global 
and  harm  consumers,  such  as  fraudulent  spam,  spyware,  misleading  health  and 
safety advertising, privacy and security breaches, and telemarketing fraud. The FTC 
already has used the powers conferred by the Act to share information with foreign 
agencies in several investigations. The increasing use of these new tools will remove 
some of the key roadblocks to effective international enforcement cooperation. 

The FTC works directly with consumer protection and other law enforcement offi-
cials  in  foreign  countries  to  achieve  its  goals.  In  particular,  in  response  to  the 
amount  of  fraud  across  the  U.S.-Canadian  border,  the  FTC  continues  to  build  its 
relationship  with  its  Canadian  counterparts.  The  Commission  has  worked  hard  to 
expand  partnerships  with  Canadian  law  enforcement  entities  to  fight  cross-border 
mass marketing fraud targeting U.S. and Canadian consumers. 

Increased  globalization  also  requires  the  FTC  to  participate  actively  in  inter-
national  policy  efforts  to  develop  flexible,  market-oriented  standards,  backed  by  ag-
gressive  enforcement,  to  address  emerging  consumer  protection  issues.  In  2006,  for 
example,  the  FTC,  working  with  its  foreign  partners  through  the  Organization  for 
Economic  Cooperation  and  Development  (‘‘OECD’’)  and  through  the  London  Action 
Plan, the international spam enforcement network, called for increased cross-border 
law enforcement cooperation and increased public/private sector cooperation to com-
bat spam. Already in 2007, the FTC, working with its foreign partners through the 
OECD,  has  developed  a  framework  for  privacy  regulators  and  law  enforcement  au-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

18 

thorities  to  facilitate  cross-border  privacy  law  enforcement  cooperation  and  provide 
greater protection for consumers’ personal information. Most recently, in July 2007, 
the  FTC,  again  working  through  the  OECD,  agreed  with  its  partners  on  a  set  of 
principles  to  address  the  practical  and  legal  obstacles  that  many  consumers  face 
when  trying  to  resolve  disputes  with  businesses,  in  their  own  country  or  abroad, 
particularly in cross-border e-commerce transactions. 

The  FTC  will  continue  to  focus  the  international  community  on  the  importance 
of enforcement as a key component of privacy protection in the OECD, the Asia Pa-
cific Economic Cooperation (‘‘APEC’’), and other multilateral organizations. The FTC 
also  continues  to  participate  actively  in  APEC’s  Electronic  Commerce  Steering 
Group and several OECD committees, including the Committee on Consumer Policy, 
and in the International Consumer Protection Enforcement Network (‘‘ICPEN’’). The 
FTC supported ICPEN’s operations this year by hosting its Secretariat. 
B. Competition 

The FTC’s cooperation with competition agencies around the world is a vital com-
ponent of our enforcement and policy programs, facilitating our ability to collaborate 
on  cross-border  cases,  and  promoting  convergence  toward  sound,  consumer  welfare- 
based competition policies. 

FTC staff routinely coordinate with colleagues in foreign agencies on mergers and 
anticompetitive  conduct  cases  of  mutual  concern.  The  FTC  promotes  policy  conver-
gence  through  formal  and  informal  working  arrangements  with  other  agencies, 
many of which seek the FTC’s views when developing new policy initiatives. For ex-
ample, during the past year, the FTC consulted with the European Commission re-
garding  its  review  of  policies  on  abuse  of  dominance,  non-horizontal  mergers,  and 
merger  remedies,  with  the  Canadian  Competition  Bureau  on  merger  remedies  and 
health  care  issues,  and  with  the  Japan  Fair  Trade  Commission  on  revisions  to  its 
Guidelines on Patent and Know-how Licensing Agreements under the Antimonopoly 
Act.  We  are  closely  following  competition  developments  in  China  and  have  held 
high-level  meetings  with  the  drafters  of  the  antimonopoly  law  and  with  officials  in 
China’s  Ministry  of  Commerce  responsible  for  their  pre-merger  notification  guide-
lines, and conducted a multi-day, hands-on seminar on merger process and analysis 
for Chinese officials. The FTC continues to play a lead role with respect to market- 
based competition and innovation issues in the U.S.-China Strategic Economic Dia-
logue, including participation in the May 22–23 summit meeting in Washington. We 
have just held our annual bilateral meetings with the Japanese Fair Trade Commis-
sion, we participated in consultations in Washington and in foreign capitals with top 
officials of, among others, the Korean Fair Trade Commission and Mexican Federal 
Competition Commissions, and we will soon hold our annual consultations with the 
European Commission’s Directorate General for Competition. 

The  FTC  plays  a  lead  role  in  key  multilateral  fora  that  provide  important  oppor-
tunities  for  competition  agencies  to  promote  cooperation  and  convergence.  In  the 
International  Competition  Network,  the  FTC  serves  on  the  Steering  Group,  and 
FTC  officials  hold  leadership  positions  in  working  groups  on  unilateral  conduct, 
mergers, and competition policy implementation. We are also active in the competi-
tion work of the OECD, UNCTAD, and APEC. The FTC participates in U.S. delega-
tions  that  negotiate  competition  chapters  of  proposed  free  trade  agreements,  such 
as with Korea, Thailand, and Malaysia. 

As  competition  enforcement  has  proliferated  worldwide,  the  FTC’s  international 
competition program has promoted sound, coherent, and fair application of competi-
tion laws, to the benefit of American businesses and consumers. 
C. International Technical Assistance 

The  FTC  assists  developing  nations  that  are  moving  toward  market-based  econo-
mies  to  develop  and  implement  sound  competition  and  consumer  protection  laws 
and  policies.  Our  program  is  funded  mainly  by  the  United  States  Agency  for  Inter-
national  Development  (‘‘USAID’’)  and  conducted  in  cooperation  with  the  DOJ  Anti-
trust  Division.  In  2007,  the  FTC  sent  20  staff  experts  on  20  technical  assistance 
missions  to  14  countries,  including  the  ten-nation  ASEAN  Community,  India,  Rus-
sia, Azerbaijan, South Africa, Central America, Tanzania, and Egypt. 

Because  USAID  resources  for  these  activities  have  been  declining,  the  Commis-
sion may need to consider alternative funding sources. The Antitrust Modernization 
Commission  recently  recommended  that  Congress  appropriate  funds  for  use  by  the 
agencies directly for this important work. 

The  Commission  wants  to  ensure  that  the  quality  of  our  work  is  maintained  de-
spite the breadth of our mission and the challenges that have been described involv-

V. Conclusion 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

19 

ing  technological  change  and  an  evolving  global  economy.  In  the  last  several  years, 
Congress  has  passed  a  variety  of  significant  new  laws  that  the  FTC  is  charged,  at 
least  in  part,  with  implementing  and  enforcing,  such  as  the  CAN–SPAM  Act,  the 
Fair and Accurate Credit Transactions Act, the Children’s Online Privacy Protection 
Act,  the  Gramm-Leach-Bliley  Act,  and  the  U.S.  SAFE  WEB  Act.  In  light  of  these 
new  laws  and  challenges,  the  FTC  appreciates  the  Committee’s  continued  support 
for  providing  the  Commission  with  the  authority,  personnel,  and  resources  needed 
to ensure that the FTC vigorously protects American consumers and promotes a vi-
brant marketplace. 

I would be happy to answer any questions that you and other Members may have 

about the FTC’s reauthorization. 
Endnotes 

1 The written statement represents the views of the Federal Trade Commission. My oral pres-
entation and responses to questions are my own and do not necessarily reflect the views of the 
Commission or any other Commissioner. 

2 The  FTC  has  broad  law  enforcement  responsibilities  under  the  Federal  Trade  Commission 
Act, 15 U.S.C. § 41 et seq. With certain exceptions, the statute provides the agency with jurisdic-
tion over nearly every economic sector. Certain entities, such as depository institutions and com-
mon carriers, as well as the business of insurance, are wholly or partly exempt from FTC juris-
diction.  In  addition  to  the  FTC  Act,  the  agency  has  enforcement  responsibilities  under  more 
than 50 other statutes and more than 30 rules governing specific industries and practices. 

3 The  Commission  wants  to  ensure  that  the  quality  of  our  work  is  maintained  despite  the 
quantity  of  demands  placed  upon  us,  the  breadth  of  our  mission,  and  the  increasing  challenges 
of  a  dynamic  domestic  and  global  marketplace.  Today,  the  FTC  has  1,074  full-time  equivalent 
employees (‘‘FTEs’’). In the last few years, Congress has passed a variety of significant new laws 
that  the  FTC  is  charged,  at  least  in  part,  with  implementing  and  enforcing,  such  as  the  CAN– 
SPAM Act, the Fair and Accurate Credit Transactions Act, the Children’s Online Privacy Protec-
tion  Act,  the  Gramm-Leach-Bliley  Act,  and  the  U.S.  SAFE  WEB  Act.  We  would  like  to  work 
with  the  Committee  to  help  ensure  that  our  reauthorization  includes  appropriate  increases  in 
resources to meet these growing challenges. 

4 The  Commission’s  ability  to  seek  civil  penalties  is  limited,  and  we  look  forward  to  working 
with you to ensure that the FTC has the authority it needs to deter wrongful conduct and pro-
tect  American  consumers.  For  example,  where  civil  penalties  are  authorized  (such  as  for  viola-
tions  of  specific  statutes  like  CAN–SPAM,  or  regulations  including  the  Telemarketing  Sales 
Rule), the Commission cannot, unlike other agencies such as the Securities and Exchange Com-
mission or the Commodity Futures Trading Commission, go directly to court, but must first refer 
the  case  to  the  Department  of  Justice,  which  has  45  days  in  which  to  decide  whether  to  bring 
the action. Only if the DOJ declines may the FTC bring the civil penalties claim. The Commis-
sion  has  a  good,  long-standing  working  relationship  with  DOJ,  which  has  greatly  assisted  us 
in  our  consumer  protection  efforts.  But,  for  example,  there  are  cases  in  which  we  must  forgo 
seeking  civil  penalties  in  the  interest  of  seeking  expeditious  injunctive  relief.  We  look  forward 
to working with the Committee to examine this issue. 

5 So  far  during  FY  2007,  the  FTC’s  Bureau  of  Consumer  Protection  has  achieved  many  suc-
cesses.  It  obtained  57  court  orders  requiring  defendants  to  pay  more  than  $236  million  in  con-
sumer  redress,  obtained  8  court  judgments  for  civil  penalties  in  an  amount  over  $4.9  million, 
and  filed  35  new  complaints  in  Federal  district  court  to  stop  unfair  and  deceptive  practices.  It 
also  completed  14  statutorily-mandated  requirements  such  as  rulemakings  and  reports,  led  2 
law  enforcement  sweeps,  hosted  11  conferences  and  workshops,  issued  5  reports  on  topics  sig-
nificant to consumers, and developed 16 consumer and business education campaigns. 

6 Pub. L. 105–318, 112 Stat. 3007 (1998) (codified at 18 U.S.C. § 1028). 
7 Exec. Order No. 13,402, 71 FR 27945 (May 10, 2006). 
8 The President’s Identity Theft Task Force, Combating Identity Theft: A Strategic Plan (‘‘Stra-

http://www.ftc.gov/os/caselist/0523131/index.shtm. 

18 See FTC News Release, Hearings Will Explore Emerging Technologies and Consumer Issues 
in  the  Next  Decade  (July  26,  2006),  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/opa/2006/07/techade.htm. 
19 15 U.S.C. § 45(a)(2) exempts from the FTC Act ‘‘common carriers subject to the Acts to Reg-
ulate Commerce.’’ 15 U.S.C. § 44 defines the ‘‘Acts to regulate commerce’’ as ‘‘Subtitle IV of Title 

tegic Plan’’), available at http.//www.idtheft.gov. 

9 OMB  Memorandum  07–16,  ‘‘Safeguarding  Against  and  Responding  to  the  Breach  of  Person-
ally  Identifiable  Information’’  (May  22,  2007),  available  at  http://www.whitehouse.gov/omb/ 
memoranda/fy2007/m07-16.pdf;  OMB  Memorandum,  ‘‘Recommendations  for  Identity  Theft  Re-
lated Data Breach Notification’’ (Sept. 20, 2006), available at http://www.whitehouse.gov/omb/ 
memoranda/fy2006/tasklforceltheftlmemo.pdf. 

10 See http://www.ftc.gov/infosecurity/. 
11 See http://www.ftc.gov/bcp/workshops/proofpositive/index.shtml. 
12 On July 30, 2007, the FTC issued a request for public comment on the uses of Social Secu-
rity  numbers  in  the  private  sector,  and  announced  that  it  was  planning  to  host  one  or  more 
public  forums  on  the  issue  in  the  coming  months.  See  http://www.ftc.gov/opa/2007/07/ssn/ 
shtm. 

13 See http://www.usdoj.gov/opa/pr/2007/July/07lcrtl522%20%20%20.html. 
14 FTC  News  Release,  FTC  Launches  Nationwide  Id  Theft  Education  Campaign  (May  10, 

2006), available at http://www.ftc.gov/opa/2006/05/ddd.htm. 

15 Available at http://onguardonline.gov/index.html. 
16 Available at http://www.ftc.gov/bcp/edu/microsites/idtheft/business/data-breach.html. 
17 In  the  Matter  of  Direct  Revenue,  LLC,  FTC  Dkt.  No.  C–4194  (June  29,  2007),  available  at 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

20 

49 (interstate transportation) and the Communications Act of 1934’’ and all amendments there-
to. 

20 Partners  for  Understanding  Pain,  Pain  Advocacy  Tool  Kit  (Sept.  2006)  (including  members 
from  American  Cancer  Society,  American  Pharmacists  Association,  and  Arthritis  Foundation, 
among  others),  available  at  http://www.nmmra.org/resources/HomelHealth/NurseslTooll 
Kitl2006.pdf. 

21 E.g.,  Approximately  two-thirds  of  U.S.  adults  are  overweight  or  obese.  National  Center  for 
Health  Statistics,  Prevalence  of  Overweight  and  Obesity  Among  Adults:  United  States,  2003– 
2004.  available  at  http://www.cdc.gov/nccdphp/dnpa/obesity/faq.htm#adults;  and  approxi-
mately  127  million  adults  in  the  U.S.  are  overweight,  60  million  obese,  and  9  million  severely 
obese,  American  Obesity  Association,  AOA  Fact  Sheet,  available  at  http://obesity1. 
tempdomainname.com/subs/fastfacts/obesitylUS.shtml. 

22 E.g., FTC v. Window Rock Enters., Inc., No. CV04–8190 (JTLx) (C.D. Cal. filed Jan. 4, 2007) 
(stipulated  final  orders)  (Cortislim),  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/os/caselist/windowrock/ 
windowrock.htm; In the Matter of Goen Techs. Corp., FTC File No. 042 3127 (Jan. 4, 2007) (con-
sent  order)  (TrimSpa),  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/os/caselist/goen/0423127agreement.pdf; 
United States v. Bayer Corp., No. 07–01 (HAA) (D.N.J. filed Jan. 3, 2007) (consent decree) (One- 
A-Day),  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/os/caselist/bayercorp/070104consentdecree.pdf;  FTC  v. 
Chinery,  No.  05–3460  (GEB)  (D.N.J.  filed  Dec.  26  ,  2006)  (stipulated  final  order)  (Xenadrine), 
available at http://www.ftc.gov/os/caselist/chinery/070104stipulatedfinalorder.pdf; FTC v. QT, 
Inc.,  No.  03  C  3578  (N.D.  Ill.  Sept.  8,  2006)  (final  judgment  order),  available  at  http:// 
www.ftc.gov/os/caselist/0323011/061113qrayfinaljdgmntorder.pdf. 

23 See  FTC  News  Release,  Federal  Trade  Commission  Reaches  ‘‘New  Year’s’’  Resolutions  with 
Four  Major  Weight-Control  Pill  Marketers  (Jan.  4,  2007),  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/opa/ 
2007/01/weightloss.htm. 

24 See FTC News Release, Workshop Explores Marketing, Self-Regulation, and Childhood Obe-

sity (July 15, 2005), available at http://www.ftc.gov/opa/2005/07/obesityworkshopma.htm. 

25 Perspectives on Marketing, Self-Regulation, & Childhood Obesity: A Report on a Joint Work-
shop of the Federal Trade Commission and the Department of Health and Human Services (Apr. 
2006),  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/os/2006/05/PerspectivesOnMarketingSelf-Regulation& 
ChildhoodObesityFTCandHHSReportonJointWorkshop.pdf. 

26 See  Bruce  Horovitz  and  Laura  Petrecca,  Disney  to  Make  Food  Healthier  for  Kids,  USA 
(Oct.  17,  2006),  available  at  http://www.usatoday.com/money/media/2006-10-16- 

Today 
disneylx.htm. 

27 See  Annys  Shin,  Ads  Aimed  at  Children  Get  Tighter  Scrutiny;  Firms  to  Promote  More 

Healthful Diet Choices, Wash. Post, Nov. 15, 2006, at D1. 

28 The  one  exception  is  Cadbury  Adams,  LLC,  which  committed  either  to  refrain  from  adver-
tising to children under 12 or to devote at least 50 percent of such advertising to a product that 
offers a healthier dietary option. Bubblicious gum is currently the only product Cadbury Adams 
advertises to children under 12. 

29 The  Commission  also  brings  other  law  enforcement  actions  related  to  financial  services, 
such  as  credit  reporting,  financial  privacy,  data  security,  and  identity  theft.  For  a  description 
of  some  of  these  recent  cases,  see  ‘‘The  FTC  in  2007:  A  Champion  for  Consumers  and  Competi-
tion,’’  Federal  Trade  Commission,  April  2007,  at  24–25,  http://www.ftc.gov/os/2007/04/ 
ChairmansReport2007.pdf at 29–30, 37. 

30 FTC  v.  Mortgages  Para  Hispanos.Com  Corp.,  No.  06–00019  (E.D.  Tex.  2006);  FTC  v. 
Ranney, No. 04–1065 (D. Colo. 2004); FTC v. Chase Fin. Funding, No. 04–549 (C.D. Cal. 2004); 
United States v. Fairbanks Capital Corp., No. 03–12219 (D. Mass. 2003); FTC v. Diamond, No. 
02–5078 (N.D. Ill. 2003); United States v. Mercantile Mortgage Co., No. 02–5079 (N.D. Ill. 2002); 
FTC v. Associates First Capital Corp., No. 01–00606 (N.D. Ga. 2002); FTC v. First Alliance Mort-
gage  Co.,  No.  00–964  (C.D.  Cal.  2002);  United  States  v.  Action  Loan  Co.,  No.  00–511  (W.D.  Ky. 
2000); FTC v. Nu West, Inc., 00–1197 (W.D. Wash. 2000); United States v. Delta Funding Corp., 
No.  00–1872  (E.D.N.Y.  2000);  FTC  v.  Barry  Cooper  Prop.,  No.  99–07782  (C.D.  Cal.  1999);  FTC 
v.  Capitol  Mortgage  Corp.,  No.  99–580  (D.  Utah  1999);  FTC  v.  CLS  Fin.  Serv.,  Inc.,  No.  99– 
1215  (W.D.  Wash.  1999);  FTC  v.  Granite  Mortgage,  LLC,  No.  99–289  (E.D.  Ky.  1999);  FTC  v. 
Interstate  Res.  Corp.,  No.  99–5988  (S.D.N.Y.  1999);  FTC  v.  LAP  Fin.  Serv.,  Inc.,  No.  99–496 
(W.D. Ky. 1999); FTC v. Wasatch Credit Corp., No. 99–579 (D. Utah 1999); In re First Plus Fin. 
Group,  Inc.,  FTC  Docket  No.  C–3984  (2000);  In  re  Fleet  Fin.,  Inc.,  128  F.T.C.  479  (1999);  FTC 
v. Capital City Mortgage Corp., No. 98–00237 (D.D.C. 1998). 

31 FTC v. Mortgages Para Hispanos. Com Corp, supra note 28. 
32 Stipulated  Final  Judgment  and  Order  of  Permanent  Injunction,  FTC  v.  Mortgages  Para 

Hispanos. Com Corp., supra note 28, Sept. 25, 2006. 

33 United  States  v.  Fairbanks  Capital  Corp,  supra  note  28;  FTC  v.  Capital  City  Mortgage 

Corp., supra note 28. 

34 Order Preliminarily Approving Stipulated Final Judgment and Order as to Fairbanks Cap-
ital Corp. and Fairbanks Capital Holding Corp., United States v. Fairbanks Capital Corp., supra 
n. 28, Nov. 21, 2003; Stipulated Final Judgment and Order as to Thomas D. Basmajian, United 
States v. Fairbanks Capital Corp., supra n. 28, Nov. 21, 2003. 

35 FTC  News  Release,  FTC,  Subprime  Mortgage  Servicer  Agree  to  Modified  Settlement  (Aug. 

2, 2007), available at http://www.ftc.gov/opa/2007/08/sps.shtm. 

36 FTC, Bureau of Economics Staff Report, James M. Lacko and Janis K. Pappalardo, Improv-
ing  Consumer  Mortgage  Disclosures:  An  Empirical  Assessment  of  Current  and  Prototype  Disclo-
sure  Forms,  June  2007.  An  earlier  BE  study  addressed  mortgage  broker  compensation  disclo-
sures.  FTC,  Bureau  of  Economics  Staff  Report,  James  M.  Lacko  and  Janis  K.  Pappalardo,  The 
Effect  of  Mortgage  Broker  Compensation  Disclosures  on  Consumers  and  Competition:  A  Con-
trolled Experiment, Feb. 2004, http://www.ftc.gov/os/2004/01/030123mortgagefullrpt.pdf. 

37 A  prepaid  debit  card,  also  called  a  prepaid  card,  is  typically  a  plastic  stored  valued  card 
that  uses  magnetic  stripe  technology  to  store  information  about  funds  that  consumers  ‘‘prepay’’ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

21 

or ‘‘load’’ onto the card. Consumers can use prepaid cards to make purchases or withdraw money 
from merchants and ATMs that accept the network brand on the card. 

38 See  FTC  News  Release,  National  Restaurant  Company  Settles  FTC  Charges  for  Deceptive 

Gift Card Sales (Apr. 3, 2007), available at http://www.ftc.gov/opa/2007/04/darden.htm. 

39 FTC  v.  Rawlins  &  Rivera,  Inc.,  No.  07–146  (M.D.  Fla.  2007);  United  States  v.  Whitewing 
Financial  Group,  No.  06–2102  (S.D.  Tex.  2006);  FTC  v.  Check  Investors,  Inc.,  No.  03–2115 
(D.N.J.  2003),  appeal  docketed,  Nos.  05–3558,  05–3957  (3rd  Cir.  Aug.  2,  2005);  United  States 
v.  Capital  Acquisitions  and  Management  Corp.,  No.  04–50147  (N.D.  Ill.  2004);  FTC  v.  Capital 
Acquisitions  and  Management  Corp.,  No.  04–7781  (N.D.  Ill.  2004);  In  re  Applied  Card  Systems, 
Inc.,  FTC  Docket  No.  C–4125  (Oct.  8,  2004);  United  States  v.  Fairbanks  Capital  Corp.,  supra 
n. 14; FTC v. Associates, supra n.14; United States v. DC Credit Services, Inc., No. 02–5115 (C.D. 
Cal. 2002); United States v. United Recovery Systems, Inc., No. 02–1410 (S.D. Tex. 2002); United 
States v. North American Capital Corp., No. 00–0600 (W.D.N.Y. 2000); United States v. National 
Financial  Systems,  Inc.,  No.  99–7874  (E.D.N.Y.  1999);  Perimeter  Credit,  L.L.C.,  No.  99–0454 
(N.D.  Ga.  1999);  In  re  Federated  Department  Stores,  Inc.,  FTC  Docket  No.  C–3893  (Aug.  27, 
1999); FTC v. Capital City Mortgage Co., supra n. 14; United States v. Nationwide Credit, Inc., 
No.  98–2920  (N.D.  Ga.  1998);  United  States  v.  Lundgren  &  Associates,  P.C.,  No.  98–1274  (E.D. 
Cal.  1998);  In  re  May  Dep’t  Stores  Co.,  FTC  Docket  No.  C–3848  (Nov.  2,  1998);  In  re  General 
Electric Capital Corp., FTC Docket No. C–3839 (Dec. 23, 1998). 

40 FTC v. Rawlins & Rivera, supra n. 34. 
41 Order  Granting  Motion  for  Preliminary  Injunction,  FTC  v.  Rawlins  &  Rivera,  supra  n.  34, 

42 16  C.F.R.  § 310.  The  Commission  promulgated  the  TSR  following  Congressional  enactment 
of  the  Telemarketing  and  Consumer  Fraud  and  Abuse  Prevention  Act  in  1994.  15  U.S.C. 
§§ 6101–6108. 

43 FTC v. FTN Promotions, Inc., No. 8:07–cv–1279–T–30TGW (M.D. Fla. July 23, 

Apr. 6, 2007. 

2007). 

tered Mar. 8, 2007). 

44 FTC v. 120199 Canada, Ltd., No. 1:04–CV–07204 (N.D. Ill.) (permanent injunction order en-

45 These Do Not Call cases are included in the 240 TSR cases noted above. 
46 FTC  v.  Warner  Chilcott  Holdings  Co.  III,  No.  1:05–cv–02179–CKK  (D.D.C.  filed  Nov.  7, 

2005), available at http://www.ftc.gov/os/caselist/0410034/051107comp0410034%20.pdf. 

47 FTC  News  Release,  Consumers  Win  as  FTC  Action  Results  in  Generic  Ovcon  Launch  (Oct. 
23,  2006),  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/opa/2006/10/chilcott.htm.  In  October  2006,  the  dis-
trict  court  entered  a  final  order  that  settled  the  FTC’s  charges  against  Warner  Chilcott.  As  a 
result  of  the  settlement,  Warner  Chilcott:  (1)  must  refrain  from  entering  into  agreements  with 
generic  pharmaceutical  companies  in  which  the  generic  agrees  not  to  compete  with  Warner 
Chilcott and there is either a supply agreement between the parties or Warner Chilcott provides 
the  generic  with  anything  of  value  and  the  agreement  adversely  affects  competition;  (2)  must 
notify the FTC whenever it enters into supply or other agreements with generic pharmaceutical 
companies; and (3) for 3 months, had to take interim steps to preserve the market for the tablet 
form of Ovcon in order to provide Barr the opportunity to compete with its generic version. FTC 
v. Warner Chilcott Holdings Co. III, No. 1:05–cv–02179–CKK (D.D.C. filed Oct. 23, 2006) (stipu-
lated  permanent  injunction  and  final  order),  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/os/caselist/ 
0410034/finalorder.pdf. The FTC’s case against Barr is ongoing. 

48 In the Matter of Actavis Group, FTC Docket No. C–4190 (May 18, 2007) (decision and order), 

available at http://www.ftc.gov/os/caselist/0710063/index.shtm. 

49 In  the  Matter  of  Barr  Pharms.,  Inc.,  FTC  Docket  No.  C–4171  (Dec.  8,  2006)  (decision  and 

order), available at http://www.ftc.gov/os/caselist/0610217/0610217barrdolfinal.pdf. 

50 In the Matter of Watson Pharms., Inc., and Andrx Corp., FTC Docket No. C–4172 (Dec. 12, 
2006)  (decision  and  order),  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/os/caselist/0610139/061212do 
lpubliclver0610139.pdf. 

51 In  the  Matter  of  Teva  Pharm.  Indus.  Ltd.  and  IVAX  Corp.,  FTC  Docket  No.  C–4155  (Mar. 
2,  2006)  (decision  and  order),  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/os/caselist/0510214/0510 
214.htm. 

52 In the Matter of Johnson & Johnson and Pfizer Inc., FTC Docket No. C–4180 (Jan. 19, 2007) 
(decision  and  order),  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/os/caselist/0610220/0610220c4180 
decisionorderlpublicversion.pdf; see also In the Matter of Allergan, Inc. and Inamed Corp., FTC 
Docket  No.  C–4156  (Apr.  17,  2006)  (decision  and  order),  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/os/ 
caselist/0610031/0610031.htm. 

53 FTC News Release, FTC Challenges Hospira/Mayne Pharma Deal (Jan. 18, 2007), available 
at  http://www.ftc.gov/opa/2007/01/hospiramayne.htm;  In  the  Matter  of  Hospira,  Inc.  and 
Mayne  Pharma  Ltd.,  FTC  Docket  No.  C–4182  (Jan.  18,  2007)  (decision  and  order),  available  at 
http://www.ftc.gov/os/caselist/0710002/070118do0710002.pdf. 

54 In  the  Matter  of  Boston  Scientific  Corp.  and  Guidant  Corp.,  FTC  Docket  No.  C–4164  (July 
(decision  and  order),  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/os/caselist/0610046/ 

25,  2006) 
060725do0610046.pdf. 

55 In  the  Matter  of  Hologic,  Inc.,  FTC  Docket  No.  C–4165  (Aug.  9,  2006)  (decision  and  order), 
available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/os/caselist/0510263/0510263decisionandorderpubrecver.pdf;  In 
the Matter of Thermo Electron Corp., FTC Docket No. C–4170 (Dec. 5, 2006) (decision and order), 
available at http://www.ftc.gov/os/caselist/0610187/061205do0610187.pdf. 

56 FTC News Release, FTC Proposes Study of Competitive Impacts of Authorized Generic Drugs 

(Mar. 29, 2006), available at http://www.ftc.gov/opa/2006/03/authgenerics.htm. 

57 In  the  Matter  of  Evanston  Northwestern  Healthcare  Corp.,  FTC  Docket  No.  9315  (Aug.  6, 
(Opinion  of  the  Commission),  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/os/adjpro/d9315/ 

2007) 
070806opinion.pdf. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

22 

58 In  the  Matter  of  Evanston  Northwestern  Healthcare  Corp.,  FTC  Docket  No.  9315  (Oct.  20, 
(initial  decision),  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/os/adjpro/d9315/051021idtext 

2005) 
version.pdf. 

59 The Commission also challenged the merger of two of the top three operators of outpatient 
kidney  dialysis  clinics  and  required  divestitures  in  66  markets  throughout  the  United  States. 
In  the  Matter  of  Fresenius  AG,  FTC  Docket  No.  C–4159  (June  30,  2006)  (decision  and  order), 
available at http://www.ftc.gov/os/caselist/0510154/0510154.htm. 

60 In  the  Matter  of  Puerto  Rico  Ass’n  of  Endodontists,  Corp.,  FTC  Docket  No.  C–4166  (Aug. 
24,  2006) 
(decision  and  order),  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/os/caselist/0510170/ 
0510170c4166praedecisionorder.pdf; In the Matter of New Century Health Quality Alliance, Inc., 
FTC  Docket  No.  C–4169  (Sept.  29,  2006)  (decision  and  order),  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/ 
os/caselist/0510137/0510137nchqaprimedecisionorder.pdf;  In  the  Matter  of  Advocate  Health 
Partners,  et  al.,  FTC  Docket  No.  C–4184  (Feb.  7,  2007)  (decision  and  order),  available  at 
http://www.ftc.gov/os/caselist/0310021/0310021.htm;  and  In  the  Matter  of  Health  Care  Alli-
ance  of  Laredo,  L.C.,  FTC  Docket  No.  C–4158  (Mar.  23,  2006)  (decision  and  order),  available 
at http://www.ftc.gov/os/caselist/0410097/0410097.htm. 

61 In  the  Matter  of  South  Carolina  State  Board  of  Dentistry,  FTC  Docket  No.  9311  (June  20, 
http://www.ftc.gov/os/adjpro/d9311/070 

available 

(decision 

order), 

and 

at 

2007) 
620decision.pdf. 

62 FTC v. Equitable Resources, Inc., Dominion Resources, Inc., et al., No. 07–cv–490 (W.D. Pa. 
filed  April  13,  2007)  (complaint  filed),  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/os/adjpro/d9322/ 
070413cmpltforpi-tro.pdf. 

63 FTC  News  Release,  FTC  Challenges  Acquisition  of  Interests  in  Kinder  Morgan,  Inc.  by  The 
Carlyle  Group  and  Riverstone  Holdings  (Jan.  25,  2007),  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/opa/ 
2007/01/kindermorgan.shtm. 

64 FTC News Release, FTC Files Complaint in Federal District Court Seeking to Block Western 
Refining’s Acquisition of Rival Energy Company Giant Industries, Inc. (April 12, 2007), available 
at http://www.ftc.gov/opa/2007/04/westerngiantltro.shtm. 

65 Other  recent  energy  matters  include:  Chevron/USA  Petroleum,  an  abandoned  transaction 
in which Chevron would have acquired most of the retail gasoline stations owned by USA Petro-
leum,  the  largest  remaining  chain  of  service  stations  in  California  not  controlled  by  a  refiner 
(USA Petroleum’s president stated that the parties abandoned the transaction because of resist-
ance from the FTC), see Elizabeth Douglass, Chevron Ends Bid to Buy Stations, LA Times, Nov. 
18,  2006,  Part  C  at  2;  EPCO/TEPPCO,  in  which  EPCO’s  $1.1  billion  acquisition  of  TEPPCO’s 
natural gas liquid storage business was only allowed to proceed if TEPPCO first agreed to divest 
its  interests  in  the  world’s  largest  natural  gas  storage  facility  in  Bellvieu,  Texas,  to  an  FTC- 
approved buyer, see In the Matter of EPCO, Inc., and TEPPCO Partners, L.P., FTC Docket No. 
C–4173  (Oct.  31,  2006)  (decision  and  order),  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/os/caselist/ 
0510108/0510108c4173do061103.pdf; Chevron/Unocal, which resolved the Commission’s admin-
istrative monopolization complaint against Unocal and antitrust concerns arising from Chevron’s 
proposed $18 billion acquisition of Unocal, see In the Matter of Chevron Corp., FTC Docket No. 
C–4144  (July  27,  2005)  (consent  order),  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/os/caselist/0510125/ 
050802do0510125.pdf and Union Oil Co. of Calif., FTC Docket No. 9305 (July 27, 2005) (consent 
order),  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/os/adjpro/d9305/050802do.pdf;  and  Aloha  Petroleum/ 
Trustreet  Properties,  in  which  the  Commission  alleged  that  Aloha’s  proposed  acquisition  of 
Trustreet  Properties’  half  interest  in  import-capable  terminal  and  retail  gasoline  assets  in  Ha-
waii would have reduced from five to four the overall number of island gasoline marketers that 
had  guaranteed  access  to  supply,  and  from  three  to  two  the  number  of  suppliers  selling  to 
unintegrated  retailers,  see  FTC  v.  Aloha  Petroleum  Ltd.,  No.  CV05  00471  HG/KSC  (Dist.  Hi. 
complaint 
filed  July  27,  2005),  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/os/caselist/1510131/ 
050728comp1510131.pdf.  Ultimately,  Aloha  Petroleum  was  dismissed  at  the  agency’s  request 
after  Aloha  announced  a  long-term  agreement  with  a  third  party,  Mid  Pac  Petroleum,  that 
would give Mid Pac substantial rights to use the terminal to import gasoline into Hawaii. 

66 In the Matter of American Petroleum Company, Inc., FTC File No. 061–0229 (June 14, 2007) 
http://www.ftc.gov/os/caselist/0610229/0610229 

available 

order), 

at 

(decision 
decisionorder.pdf. 

and 

67 President George W. Bush, Remarks to the Renewable Fuels Summit 2006 (Apr. 25, 2006), 

available at http://www.whitehouse.gov/news/releases/2006/04/20060425.html. 

68 The  Commission  and  DOJ  also  extended  an  open  offer  to  assist  state  Attorneys  General 
with  gasoline  pricing  investigations  upon  request.  As  part  of  its  continuing  law  enforcement 
interaction with the states, through the National Association of Attorneys General, the Commis-
sion sponsored a Federal/state enforcement conference in September 2006 to explore competition 
issues in petroleum markets. 

69 ‘‘Federal  Trade  Commission  Report  on  Spring  Summer  2006  Nationwide  Gasoline  Price  In-
creases’’  (August  30,  2006),  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/reports/gasprices06/P040101 
Gas06increase.pdf. Commissioner Leibowitz dissented from the Report. See http://www.ftc.gov/ 
speeches/leibowitz/P010401gas06dissent.pdf. 

70 FTC  News  Release,  FTC  Releases  Report  on  its  ‘‘Investigation  of  Gasoline  Price  Manipula-
tion  and  Post-Katrina  Gasoline  Price  Increases’’  (May  22,  2006),  available  at  http:// 
www.ftc.gov/opa/2006/05/katrinagasprices.htm. 

71 Science,  State,  Justice,  Commerce,  and  Related  Agencies  Appropriations  Act,  2007,  Pub.  L. 

No. 109–108 § 632, 119 Stat. 2290 (2005) (‘‘Section 632’’). 

72 Federal  Trade  Commission,  Investigation  of  Gasoline  Price  Manipulation  and  Post-Katrina 
(Spring  2006),  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/reports/060518 
Gasoline  Price  Increases 
PublicGasolinePricesInvestigationReportFinal.pdf; but see concurring statement of Commissioner 
Jon Leibowitz (concluding that the behavior of many market participants leaves much to be de-
sired and that price gouging statutes, which almost invariably require a declared state of emer-
gency  or  other  triggering  event,  may  serve  a  salutary  purpose  of  discouraging  profiteering  in 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

23 

(July 

the  aftermath  of  a  disaster),  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/speeches/leibowitz/060518 
LeibowitzStatementReGasolineInvestigation.pdf. 

73 See, e.g., FTC News Release, FTC Charges Austin Board of Realtors With Illegally Restrain-
at  http://www.ftc.gov/opa/2006/07/ 
ing  Competition 
austinboard.htm;  see  also  FTC  News  Release,  FTC  Charges  Real  Estate  Groups  with  Anti-
competitive Conduct in Limiting Consumers’ Choice in Real Estate Services (Oct. 12, 2006), avail-
able  at  http://www.ftc.gov/opa/2006/10/realestatesweep.htm;  FTC  News  Release,  Commission 
Receives Application for Proposed Divestiture from Linde AG and The BOC Group plc; FTC Ap-
proves  Final  Consent  Orders  in  Real  Estate  Competition  Matters  (Dec.  1,  2006),  available  at 
http://www.ftc.gov/opa/2006/12/fyi0677.htm. 

74 FTC News Release, FTC Issues Final Opinion and Order in Rambus Matter (Feb. 5, 2007), 

available 

2006), 

13, 

available at http://www.ftc.gov/opa/2007/02/070502rambus.htm. 

75 In the Matter of Rambus, Inc., Docket No. 9302 (July 31, 2006) (opinion of the Commission), 

available at http://www.ftc.gov/os/adjpro/d9302/060802commissionopinion.pdf. 

76 In  the  Matter  of  Rambus  Inc.,  Docket  No.  9302  (Feb.  5,  2007)  (opinion  of  the  Commission 
on  remedy)  (Harbor,  P.,  and  Rosch,  T.,  concurring  in  part,  dissenting  in  part),  available  at 
http://www.ftc.gov/os/adjpro/d9302/070205opinion.pdf;  In  the  Matter  of  Rambus  Inc.,  Docket 
No.  9302  (Feb.  2,  2007)  (final  order),  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/os/adjpro/d9302/ 
070205finalorder.pdf. 

77 FTC v. Whole Foods Markets and Wild Oats Markets, No. 1:07–cv–01021 (D.D.C. filed June 
filed),  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/os/caselist/0710114/070605 

(complaint 

5,  2007), 
complaint.pdf. 

78 FTC  v.  Whole  Foods  Markets  and  Wild  Oats  Markets,  No.  07–1021  (D.D.C.  Aug.  16,  2007); 
FTC  v.  Whole  Foods  Markets  and  Wild  Oats  Markets,  No.  07–5276  (D.C.  Cir.  Aug.  23,  2007). 
79 In the Matter of Rite Aid Corporation and The Jean Coutu Group, FTC Docket No. C–4191 
filed),  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/os/caselist/0610257/ 

(complaint 

(June  4,  2007) 
070604complaint.pdf. 

80 In  the  Matter  of  Missouri  Board  of  Embalmers  and  Funeral  Directors,  FTC  File  No.  061 
0026  (Mar.  9,  2007)  (proposed  decision  and  order),  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/os/caselist/ 
0610026/0610026decisonorder.pdf. 

81 In  the  Matter  of  Lockheed  Martin  Corp.  and  The  Boeing  Co.,  FTC  File  No.  051  0165  (Oct. 
3,  2006) 
(decision  and  order),  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/os/caselist/0510165/ 
0510165decisionorderpublicv.pdf;  In  the  Matter  of  Lockheed  Martin  Corp.  and  The  Boeing  Co., 
FTC  File  No.  051  0165  (Oct.  3,  2006)  (agreement  containing  consent  order),  available  at 
http://www.ftc.gov/os/caselist/0510165/0510165agreement.pdf. 

82 In  the  Matter  of  Gen.  Dynamics  Corp.,  FTC  Docket  No.  C–4181  (Dec.  28,  2006)  (decision 
and  order),  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/os/caselist/0610150/0610150decisionorder.pdf;  In 
the  Matter  of  Gen.  Dynamics  Corp.,  FTC  Docket  No.  C–4181  (Dec.  28,  2006)  (agreement  con-
taining 
consent 
http://www.ftc.gov/os/caselist/0610150/0610 
150agreement.pdf. 

83 In the Matter of Serv. Corp. Int’l and Alderwoods Group Inc., FTC Docket No. C–4174 (Dec. 
(decision  and  order),  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/os/caselist/0610156/ 

available 

orders), 

at 

29,  2006) 
070105do0610156.pdf. 

84 In  the  Matter  of  Linde  AG  and  The  BOC  Group  PLC,  FTC  Docket  No.  C–4163  (Sept.  5, 
http://www.ftc.gov/os/caselist/0610114/ 

available 

order), 

at 

2006) 
0610114c4163LindeBOCDOPubRecV.pdf. 

(decision 

and 

85 FTC  News  Release,  FTC  Chairman  Announces  Merger  Process  Reforms  (Feb.  16,  2006), 

available at http://www.ftc.gov/opa/2006/02/mergerlprocess.htm. 

86 FTC  News  Release,  Federal  Trade  Commission  and  Department  of  Justice  Allow  Electronic 
Submission  of  Premerger  Notification  Filings  (June  20,  2006),  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/ 
opa/2006/06/premerger.htm. 

87 FTC  Staff  Comments  to  Councilmember  Mary  M.  Cheh,  Chairperson,  Committee  on  Public 
Services and Consumer Affairs, Council of the District of Columbia (June 8, 2007), available at 
http://www.ftc.gov/os/2007/06/V070011divorcement.pdf;  FTC  Staff  Comments  to  Christopher 
R.  Stone,  State  of  Connecticut  House  of  Representatives  (May  2,  2007),  available  at  http:// 
www.ftc.gov/be/V070008.pdf. 

88 Federal Trade Commission and United States Department of Justice Comments to Governor 
Jennifer  M.  Granholm  of  Michigan  (May  30,  2007),  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/be/ 
v050021.pdf. 

89 Federal  Trade  Commission  and  United  States  Department  of  Justice  Comments  to 
Assemblywoman  Helene  E.  Weinstein,  Chair,  Committee  on  Judiciary,  New  York  State  Assem-
bly (Apr. 27, 2007), available at http://www.ftc.gov/be/V070004.pdf. 

90 FTC  Staff  Comments  to  Ms.  Lilia  G.  Judson,  Executive  Director,  Indiana  Supreme  Court 
(May  11,  2007),  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/be/V070010.pdf;  Brief  of  the  Federal  Trade 
Commission  As  Amicus  Curiae  Supporting  Arguments  to  Vacate  Opinion  39  of  the  New  Jersey 
Supreme  Court  Committee  on  Attorney  Advertising  (May  8,  2007),  available  at  http:// 
www.ftc.gov/be/V070003opinion39.pdf; FTC Staff Comments to the Florida Bar (Mar. 23, 2007), 
available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/be/V070002.pdf;  FTC  Staff  Comments  to  the  Rules  of  Profes-
sional  Conduct  Committee,  Louisiana  State  Bar  Association  (Mar.  14,  2007),  available  at 
http://www.ftc.gov/be/V070001.pdf; FTC Staff Comments to the Office of Court Administration 
of  the  New  York  Unified  Court  System  (Sept.  14,  2006),  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/os/ 
2006/09/V060020-image.pdf. 

91 FTC Staff Comments to Assemblywoman Nellie Pou, Chair, Appropriations Committee, New 
Jersey General Assembly (Apr. 17, 2007), available at http://www.ftc.gov/be/V060019.pdf; FTC 
Staff  Comments  to  Terry  G.  Kilgore,  Member,  Commonwealth  of  Virginia  House  of  Delegates 
(Oct. 2, 2006), available at http://www.ftc.gov/be/V060018.pdf. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

24 

92 FTC  News  Release,  FTC  and  DOJ  to  Host  Joint  Public  Hearings  on  Single-Firm  Conduct 
as Related to Competition (Nov. 28, 2005), available at http://www.ftc.gov/opa/2005/11/unilat-
eral.htm. 

93 FTC  Staff  Report,  Municipal  Provision  of  Wireless  Internet  (Sept.  2005),  available  at 

http://www.ftc.gov/os/2006/10/V060021municipalprovwirelessinternet.pdf. 

94 FTC  Staff  Report,  Broadband  Connectivity  Competition  Policy  (June  2007),  available  at 

http://www.ftc.gov/reports/broadband/v070000report.pdf. 

95 FTC  Conference,  Energy  Markets  in  the  21st  Century:  Competition  Policy  in  Perspective 
(Apr.  10–12,  2007),  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/bcp/workshops/energymarkets/index.html. 
96 Federal  Trade  Commission  and  Department  of  Justice,  Antitrust  Enforcement  and  Intellec-
tual  Property  Rights:  Promoting  Innovation  and  Competition  (April  17,  2007),  available  at 
http://www.ftc.gov/opa/2007/04/ipreport.shtm. 

97 Federal  Trade  Commission  and  United  States  Department  of  Justice,  Competition  in  the 
Real Estate Brokerage Industry (Apr. 2007), available at http://www.ftc.gov/reports/realestate/ 
V050015.pdf.  To  complement  the  report,  the  Commission  simultaneously  released  a  consumer 
education  publication,  Buying  a  Home:  It’s  a  Big  Deal,  which  has  tips  for  considering  the  serv-
ices  of  a  real  estate  professional  and  using  the  Internet  as  a  source  of  real  estate  information. 
FTC  Consumer  Education,  Buying  a  Home:  It’s  a  Big  Deal  (May  2007),  available  at  http:// 
www.ftc.gov/bc/edu/pubs/consumer/alerts/zalt001.shtm. 

98 Available at http://www.ftc.gov/ftc/antitrust.htm. 
99 Available at http://www.ftc.gov/ftc/oilgas/index.html. 
100 Available at http://www.ftc.gov/bc/healthcare/index.htm. 
101 Available at http://www.ftc.gov/bc/realestate/index.htm. 
102 Available at http://www.ftc.gov/bc/tech/index.htm. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Madam  Chair,  thank  you  very  much.  We  ap-

preciate your testimony. 

Let me ask a number of questions of you. 
First, in your testimony, you indicate that you would like to work 
with  the  Committee  to  help  ensure  that  the  reauthorization  in-
cludes appropriate resources—increases in resources to meet grow-
ing challenges. I note that, in 1979, the Federal Trade Commission 
had  1,750  full-time  employees,  it  now  has  1,074.  So,  from  1,700- 
plus  to  1,000,  that’s  a  very  substantial  reduction  in  the  number  of 
employees  of  the  Federal  Trade  Commission.  What  do  you  think 
represents  a  level  of  employment  and  an  increase  in  the  invest-
ment  in  the  FTC  that  would  be  appropriate,  given  the  challenges? 
Ms.  MAJORAS.  I  think  part  of  it  depends,  Chairman  Dorgan,  on 
whether  new—whether  there  are  new  enforcement  priorities  that 
are  assigned  to  the  FTC.  I  think  where  we  are  today  is,  if  we  can 
grow  by  10  to  15,  perhaps  20,  FTEs  a  year  over  the  next  number 
of  years,  we  probably  will  still  be  in  a  strong  position  to  continue 
to protect consumers at the level at which we have been. 

It’s—there  are—I  think  there  are  several  reasons  why  the  agen-
cy,  particularly  back  in  the  1980s,  began  to  diminish  in  size.  Over 
the  last  few  years,  it  actually  has  been  growing,  and  certainly  in 
my  tenure  we’ve  been  growing  steadily  over  the  last  few  years  as 
Congress—well,  as  markets  have  changed  and  required  us  to  step 
in more—in new and different areas, and as Congress has given us 
new responsibilities. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Let  me  ask  about  the  common  carrier  exemp-
tion.  You  have  referred  to  that,  and  we’ve  talked  about  that  pre-
viously. The common carrier exemption is a gap that, in my under-
standing,  prevents  the  Federal  Trade  Commission  from  moving  in 
certain  areas  dealing  with  communications.  Can  you  describe  that 
gap? And how important is it that we deal with it? 
Ms. MAJORAS. I’m happy to do that. Thank you. 
Increasingly,  as  we  are  seeing  the  communications  industry  and 
players  in  that  industry  converging,  technologies  are  converging, 
functions  are  changing,  and,  obviously,  less  of  our  communications 
function  in  this  country  falls  under  the  rubric  of  common  carrier. 
What  we  are  bumping  up  against  in  trying  to  bring  cases,  say,  in 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

25 

area  of  calling  cards  or  the  area  of  advertising  of  bundles  of  serv-
ices—so,  a  bundle  that  might  include  your  cable,  your  Internet  ac-
cess,  and  telephone—we  are  being  asked  to  look  at  whether  there 
may  be  some  deception  in  those  areas,  whether  the  advertising  is 
not  fully  accurate.  And  the  difficulty  is  that,  if  a  company  falls 
under  the  rubric  of  common  carrier,  what  they  argue  to  us  is  that 
we  have  no  authority.  Now,  we’ve  taken  a  view  that  common  car-
rier  status,  from  our  perspective—we  look  at  the  activity  and 
whether  it’s  common  carriage,  not  the  label  that  a  company  puts 
on itself, but, nonetheless, what we are finding in our enforcement 
work is that the telecom companies want to prohibit us from going 
in  those  areas,  and  we  simply—this  is  what  we,  I  think,  are  very 
good at. We have a lot of experience at rooting out deception in ad-
vertising  and  in  other  disclosures  that  are  made  to  consumers  in 
services  that  are  extremely  important  to  them.  And  so,  we’re— 
what  we’re  worried  about  is  that  this  problem  is  going  to  grow  as 
the markets continue to evolve, and not be reduced. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Well,  we  agree.  And  my  hope  would  be,  in  the 
reauthorization bill, that we will eliminate that exemption and give 
the FTC the authority that is necessary. 

Now, let me ask a question on a subject that you and I have dis-
agreed on over the years, and that is the issue of oil pricing. There 
have  been  substantial  mergers  in  the  oil  industry,  mergers  that 
have  meant  that  virtually  every  oil  company  has  two  names— 
Exxon Mobil, ConocoPhillips—they marry up and have two names; 
they’re bigger, they’re stronger, they have more economic muscle in 
the marketplace. And many people feel that that has played a role 
in disadvantaging consumers and giving more market power to the 
companies. The reports I have seen recently suggest that refiners— 
I’m  talking  about  the  refinery  capability  in  this  country—are  tak-
ing  a  larger  share  of  the  profits  of  oil.  The  Wall  Street  Journal 
noted,  and  I’ll  quote,  ‘‘Lately,  American  refiners  have  made  a 
pretax  profit  of  roughly  $30  on  each  barrel  of  oil  they  use  to 
produce  gasoline,  more  than  three  times  the  margin  in  Singapore, 
a  major  Asian  refining  center.’’  If  refiners  are  making  twice  as 
much on a gallon today, versus a few years ago, does that not sug-
gest to someone in your position in the Federal Trade Commission, 
that there is market power being exercised in a way that disadvan-
tages  consumers,  coming  from,  and  stemming  from,  substantial 
mergers? 

Ms. MAJORAS. That’s not what we’ve concluded in the various in-
vestigations  and  studies  that  we’ve  done  into  this  industry,  Sen-
ator.  I  mean,  the  fact  of  the  matter  is  that,  in  refining  in  par-
ticular, if you actually look at it from concentration standpoint, it’s 
still  a  very  unconcentrated  marketplace.  The  problem  we  have  is 
that demand continues to grow year after year, and refining capac-
ity, while it has grown—some people say, ‘‘Well, all these refineries 
have closed, how could it have grown?’’ Well it’s grown through ex-
pansion,  and  we  now  have  some  bigger  refineries,  and  a  lot  of  the 
smaller  and  less  efficient  refineries  have  gone  away.  We  also  have 
better  technologies  and  can  refine  more  gasoline  out  of  one  barrel 
of  oil.  So,  there  has  actually  been  an  expansion  in  capacity,  but, 
nonetheless, demand has continued to grow, and so, we’re now im-
porting,  actually,  refined  gasoline  into  this  country,  because  we 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

26 

have  not—because  the  refiners  and  their  capacity  hasn’t  kept  up 
with the demand. 

Senator  DORGAN.  But  if,  in  fact,  it  is  the  case  that  refiners  are 
making  twice  as  much  now  on  a  gallon  of  gasoline  as  they  made 
previously,  wouldn’t  that  suggest  that  the  market  power  exists 
there  because  of  mergers  to  impose  that  upon  consumers?  And 
wouldn’t  that  encourage  the  Federal  Trade  Commission  to  take  a 
skeptical look at it? 

Ms.  MAJORAS.  Well,  the—a  couple  of  things—it  doesn’t  suggest 
that  they  have  market  power  that  comes  from  mergers.  I  mean,  it 
could  suggest  that,  but  we’ve  looked  at  it,  and  that’s  not  what  we 
believe  it  suggests.  The  second  thing  is  that,  you  know,  we’ve 
brought  three  cases  this  year  in  the  energy  area;  indeed,  we 
brought one to challenge the merger between two refiners, because 
we  felt  that,  in  that  part  of  the  country,  that  would—that  could, 
potentially, give the remaining refiner market power. And the Dis-
trict  Court  disagreed  with  us  and  said,  ‘‘No,  we’re  not  concerned 
about  that,  there’s  plenty  of  competition  here,’’  and  denied  our  re-
quest  for  an  injunction.  So,  surely  we  are  being  very  vigilant  and 
looking at mergers very, very closely, and identifying those that we 
think will inhibit competition, going forward. 

Senator  DORGAN.  But,  in  many  ways,  the  mergers  are  already 
completed. I mean, we’ve had dramatic consolidation, and that con-
solidation,  it  seems  to  me,  just  intuitively,  provides  much  greater 
muscle  in  the  marketplace,  and  the  consumers,  at  this  point,  are 
the victims at the end of the process. Is that not the case? 

Ms.  MAJORAS.  We  actually  don’t—we  actually  don’t  believe  it  is, 
because—I mean, obviously, you’re referring to the mergers that oc-
curred  in  the  1990s,  the  very  large  mergers.  Interestingly,  if—I 
mean,  we  look  at  the  market  in  different  pieces.  If  you  look  at  up-
stream,  for  example,  exploration  and  production  of  actual  oil— 
there,  consolidation  has  almost  no  effect;  OPEC  sets  the  price  at 
that  level.  Exxon  Mobil,  indeed,  has  about  a—just  over,  I  think— 
last stats I saw were, maybe, a 3 percent market share—in the ex-
ploration  and  production  of  oil.  So,  you  know,  hard  to  see  how  a 
merger  hurts  consumers,  when  you  have  numbers  that  low.  OPEC 
is clearly setting the price of oil, and the price of oil—is the great-
est  determinant  of  what  we’re  going  to  pay—of  what  we’re  going 
to  pay  at  the  pump.  Moving  down  the  chain  of  distribution,  obvi-
ously  you  get  to  the  refining  and  wholesale  levels.  It’s  true  that, 
after years of very low profits, which probably contribute to having 
less investment in more refineries, over the last couple of years we 
have  seen  the  profits  for  the  refiners  go  up,  as  I  said,  as  we’ve— 
as we’ve—it isn’t that the mergers have given us fewer—less refin-
ery  capacity,  it’s—again,  it’s—we  have—we  have  more  capacity 
now  than  we  had  10  years  ago.  The  problem  is  that  we  also  have 
greater demand. And even as we hear consumers really feeling the 
pain  at  the  pump;  nonetheless,  we  look  at  the  figures  and  the  de-
mand continues to go up. 

Senator  DORGAN.  But  it  seems  to  me,  with  all  due  respect,  that 
that  rationalizes  a  set  of  facts,  to  the  best  extent  one  can,  with  a 
conclusion  one  has  already  developed.  It  seems  to  me  that  here’s 
the  case.  As  the  large  oil  companies  merge  and  our  country  waves 
a  green  light  or  a  green  flag  or  something,  and  says,  ‘‘Go  right 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

27 

ahead’’—as they merge and become stronger and have more muscle 
in  the  marketplace,  they,  in  many  cases,  have  eliminated  refin-
eries.  I  would  guess  you  would  agree  with  that.  We  have  more  re-
fining capacity, yes, but many of those mergers have resulted in re-
fineries  closing.  And,  in  fact,  it  seems  to  me  they  have  opportuni-
ties,  through  market  power,  to  decide  refining  capacity  in  a  way 
that  maximizes  their  profits.  And  the  refinery  industry  is  not,  as 
you  suggest,  widely  dispersed  in  ownership;  there  is  a  substantial 
amount  of  ownership  of  the  refining  capacity  by  the  major  inte-
grated companies. 

And  I  think  you  said  that  OPEC  has  a  prominent  influence  in 
setting  the  price  of  oil.  You’re  right  about  that.  There  are  three 
things that tell me there is no free market at all. The three things 
are:  first,  the  OPEC  ministers  sitting  in  a  closed  room,  making 
judgments;  second,  bigger,  stronger,  merged  oil  companies  with 
more  economic  muscle  in  the  marketplace;  and  third,  a  futures 
market that has become an orgy of speculation. Those three things 
tell  me  there’s  not  a  free  market.  I  mean,  we  talk  about  all  this 
‘‘free  market’’  stuff.  There’s  no  free  market  here.  And  if,  in  fact, 
that’s  the  case,  there  is  no  free  market,  then  it  means  it  is  much, 
much  more  important  to  have  your  agency  be  the  watchdog  to 
make certain that consumers are not gouged. 

Ms. MAJORAS. Well, thank you, Senator. I mean, I disagree with 
you that there’s not a free market in gasoline. We see the workings 
of  the  market,  constantly.  And—but  where  I  absolutely  agree  with 
you  is,  regardless—I  mean,  you  and  I  could  agree  to  disagree  on 
that  point,  but,  nonetheless,  where  I  absolutely  agree  with  you  is, 
we  still  have  to  be  the  watchdog  in  this  area.  And  we  are  the 
watchdog.  And,  as  I  said,  we’ve  brought  three  energy  cases  this 
year;  early  last  year,  we  were  pushing  on  a  merger  that  Chevron 
was trying to do. They abandoned the merger. They said it was be-
cause  of  concerns  of  the  FTC.  So,  performing  that  watchdog  func-
tion, we absolutely are doing. 

As  far  as  closing  refineries  as  a  result  of  mergers,  you  know,  I 
wasn’t—I  have  to  say,  of  course,  I  wasn’t  here  in  the  1990s,  but, 
while  there  may  have  been  some  of  that,  there  were  a  number  of 
other  things  that  happened.  One  is,  the  FTC  did  not  allow  these 
mergers  to  go  through  without  significant  divestitures.  And  some 
of  those  divestitures,  as  I  understand  it,  occurred  in  the  refining 
area.  So,  what  we  have  today  is,  a  lot  of  the  largest  refiners  are 
not the Exxon Mobils in this country, they’re companies like Valero 
and others, who have—who bought refineries from the bigger com-
panies  and  now  are  significant  players  in  that.  So,  you  actually 
have  some  relatively  new  players  in  the  refining  business,  as  well. 
We  did  do  a  study—we  did  do  an  investigation,  in  2006  and  the 
early  part  of  2007,  to  see  whether,  in  fact,  we  could  find  evidence 
that  refiners  were  using  capacity  in  making  decisions,  particularly 
jointly, to keep the price—to keep the price high; and we just didn’t 
find any evidence of that. 

Senator  DORGAN.  North  Dakota  has  the  second  highest  price  of 
gasoline  in  the  country,  next  to  Hawaii,  today.  We  are  the  sixth 
largest energy-producing state in the country, with oil, natural gas, 
and  coal.  I  mean,  I  would  say  that  there  are  a  whole  lot  of  folks 
out  there  that  have  real  questions  about  how  these  prices  are  set. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

28 

I  don’t  suggest  this  is  the  case  with  what  is  happening  with  oil  or 
gas, but I would tell you that I chaired the hearing in this room— 
Ken  Lay  sat  where  you  were  sitting—the  former  CEO  of  Enron. 
And  I  also,  on  the  Energy  Committee,  on  another  committee,  sat 
at  a  dais  when  the  Federal  Energy  Regulatory  Commission  sat  at 
the table; and they weren’t watchdogs, they were lapdogs. The fact 
is,  we  were  told—those  of  us  that  said,  ‘‘What’s  happening  on  the 
West  Coast?’’—we  were  told,  ‘‘You’re  wrong.’’  The  Vice  President 
said  we  were  wrong,  ‘‘It’s  a  free  market.  The  free  market  system 
is  working.’’  Turns  out,  it  wasn’t,  there  was  grand  theft  going  on. 
I’m  not  suggesting  that  that  is  the  case  here,  but  what  I  am  sug-
gesting is, the role of a watchdog and the role of a referee is a very 
important  role  in  this  country,  especially  if  we  have  decided  to 
allow  substantial  numbers  of  mergers,  where  you  have  increased 
concentration. That has been the case in this industry. And I want 
the  industry  to  succeed.  It’s  certainly  succeeding  beyond  most  peo-
ple’s  dreams  these  days.  But  I  also  want  the  consumers  to  have  a 
watchdog  that  gives  them  a  voice,  to  determine  whether  there  is 
market manipulation. 

Let  me  go  to  a  couple  of  other  things  that  I  want  to  talk  to  you 

about. 

One  is,  as  you  might  imagine,  subprime  loans.  There’s  an  enor-
mous  consequence  to  this  country’s  economy  with  respect  to  what 
is happening with the consequences of subprime loans now. Tell me 
your  impression  of  what  kind  of  deceptive  advertising,  if  any—or 
deceptive lending—existed that has caused this problem. Some will 
say,  ‘‘Well,  look,  this  is  the  fault  of  those  that  lent  the  money  to 
people that shouldn’t have gotten it, and it’s the fault of the people 
that  borrowed  the  money,  who  should  have  known  better.’’  So, 
everybody’s  at  fault.  But  is  there  not  a  case  to  be  made  here  that 
there has been substantial deceptive advertising? 

Ms.  MAJORAS.  Just  yesterday,  we  announced  that—earlier  this 
summer,  we  did  a—an  Internet  and  other  advertising  sweep,  and, 
just yesterday, sent letters to 200 advertisers of mortgage loans, to 
tell  them  that  we  believe  that  they  may  be  violating  Federal  law 
by  deceptively  advertising  loans  on  their—particularly  on  the  first 
page;  you  go  to  the  second  page  and  get  fine  print—but  teasing 
consumers into believing that they could get loans at 1 percent and 
the  like.  So,  definitely,  as,  you  know—the  FTC  has  been  active  in 
this  space,  in  terms  of  deception  in  mortgage  loan  advertising,  for 
years,  before  this  even  became  a  big  problem,  and  we’ve  brought 
a  number  of  cases,  and  we’ve  gotten  back  $320  million  for  con-
sumers.  So,  this  is  something  that’s  not  a  fad  for  us  at  all;  we’ve 
been on—we’ve been on this. And I do think that deception played 
a role. 

I  also,  though,  think  that,  even  and,  obviously,  we  wouldn’t  be 
doing  this  work  if  we  didn’t  think  it  was  extremely  important,  but 
there’s  another  thing,  Senator,  that  we’re  worried  about,  that  I’d 
like  to  bring  to  your  attention,  and  that  is,  even  for  those  who 
weren’t  deceived,  and  even  for  those  who  are  getting  loans—you 
know,  both  in  the  subprime  arena,  but  also  not—consumers  just 
are not understanding what they’re getting in their mortgage. And 
we published a study earlier this summer that our economists did, 
which  showed  that,  across  the  board,  the  mortgage  disclosures, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

29 

even when the law is being followed, are just not explaining to peo-
ple  what  their  mortgage  means.  And  so,  I  think  we  should  look  at 
both parts of this, the deception part, which we’re working on, but 
we’re  also  concerned  about,  even  if  honest  disclosures  are  given, 
are  our  consumers  understanding  what  their  mortgage  means  and 
what they’re getting? 

Senator.  DORGAN.  So,  first  of  all,  I  appreciate  the  work  that  you 
have  done  for  some  while  in  this  area,  but—Warren  Buffet  said, 
‘‘Every bubble will burst.’’ We forget that as the bubble builds. We 
always forget that. And it seems to me that we were in this period 
for  some  years,  where  we  had  all  these  advertisements  for 
subprime  loans  and  credit  cards:  ‘‘Have  no  income,  have  no  job, 
have  bad  credit,  come  to  us.’’  I  mean,  you  see  it  and  hear  it  on 
radio and—— 

Ms. MAJORAS. Yes. 
Senator  DORGAN.—television  and  so  on.  And  have  you—during 
this period, have you put together initiatives that are more aggres-
sive,  that  reach  out?  I  mean,  you  describe  what  you’ve  just  done, 
and  I  appreciate  that,  but  have  we  gone  through  a  period  where 
you weren’t very active? Or should the Commission have been more 
active  during  the  period  that  the  bubble  was  being  created?  And, 
if  so,  what  can  we  learn  from  that,  and  how  can  we  be  more  ag-
gressive now to make sure this doesn’t happen again? 

Ms. MAJORAS. Well, I—no, you raise a good point. Obviously, it’s 
part  of  my  job  and  my  commissioners’  job  and  our  other  managers 
to  always  evaluate  how  we’re  using  our  resources.  We’ve—we  cer-
tainly  brought—have  brought  a  number  of  cases  in  this  area  over 
the  last  few  years.  Should—could  we,  and  should  we,  have  been 
more  active?  That’s  entirely  possible.  Our  staff  that  works  on  this 
particular  area  was  swamped,  over  this  same  period,  with  identity 
theft and data security issues. And we were sometimes, you know, 
the ones in the Federal Government who needed to deal with those 
issues. 

I  was  so  concerned  that  we  needed  to  be  spending  more  time  on 
some  lending  and  other  traditional  financial  issues  that  I  split 
apart our financial services division last year, and said, ‘‘You focus 
on  data  security  and  identity  theft,  and  these  others—you  need  to 
redouble your efforts in the area of lending, other credit issues, and 
debt collection issues.’’ And we’ve now done that. 

Senator DORGAN. Let me read to you a couple of ads that I know 
you’re  aware  of.  There’s  an  ad  from  probably  the  largest  mortgage 
lender in the country, one that has had to go borrow $11 billion to 
meet  a  shortfall.  Here’s  the  ad  that  they  were  running:  ‘‘Home-
owners, do you want to refinance, get cash? We have a great reason 
to do it now. No cost to refinance, no points, no application fee, no 
credit  reporting,  no  third-party  fees,  no  title,  no  escrow,  no  ap-
praisal  fees,  no  closing  costs.  You  wind  up  with  a  lot  more  cash.’’ 
I’ve got a whole list of them here—‘‘Easy mortgage.’’ All of these 
are  seductive  advertisements  to  consumers,  to  say,  ‘‘You  know 
what, need money, fast bucks? Come here.’’ I mean, it reminds me 
of  a  different  kind  of  industry  that  used  to  be  operating  in  the 
shade  someplace.  While  all  of  this  was  going  on,  did  we  intercept 
any  of  it,  did  we  take  action,  at  this  point,  to  say,  ‘‘Wait  a  second, 
this doesn’t sound right, doesn’t seem right’’? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

30 

Ms.  MAJORAS.  Well,  we  did.  We  certainly  brought  cases.  We  got 
consumer  complaints  in.  We  continue  to  monitor  those  complaints. 
We brought cases. 

Senator DORGAN. But you said you were swamped. And that gets 
back to the first question I asked you. If we’re going to increase by 
ten  people  a  year,  what’s  that,  100  years  before  we  get  to  1,000 
people?  And  how  long  to  add  back  what  we  used  to  have,  some 
years ago at the FTC? 

Ms.  MAJORAS.  Well,  I  think  the  FTC  was  a  very  different  place 
in  1980,  and  did  a  lot  of  things  that  most  people  would  agree  it 
shouldn’t have been doing. So, it’s—— 

Senator DORGAN. Like what? 
Ms. MAJORAS.—it’s not a perfect—— 
Senator DORGAN. Like what? 
Ms.  MAJORAS.—comparison.  Like  industrywide  rulemakings  on 
things that were not very helpful to consumers, as opposed to some 
enforcement.  And—no,  look,  I  mean,  the  resource—the  resource 
question  is  a  fair  one,  but  the  thing  to  remember  in  this  area  is 
that we’re sharing—I mean, we have a piece—— 

Senator DORGAN. I understand. 
Ms.  MAJORAS.—and  we’re  sharing  with  the  banking  agencies, 
and with all the states, who have, actually, greater powers than we 
have  in  this  area.  And  so,  we’re  not  the  only  players.  Now,  there’s 
just  no—all  I’m  trying  to  admit  to  you,  Senator,  is  that,  of  course, 
when  there’s  an  economic  crisis  of  some  sort,  or  a  bubble  bursts, 
it’s part of my job to look back on it and say, ‘‘Yes, of course, if we 
had  had  more  resources,  we  would  have—we  would  have  done  it 
even more.’’ And, of course, that’s the case in almost everything we 
do. 

Senator  DORGAN.  I  understand.  But  when  you  say,  ‘‘We  were 
swamped,’’  and  we  see  an  agency  that  went  from  1,700  to  1,000 
people, and we now see not just this—in this particular area, which 
is going to have significant consequence to our whole economy and 
to  a  lot  of  the  American  people—but  in  addition  to  this,  the  toys 
coming in from China. I want to talk about that a little bit; I know 
that  that  relates  to  the  Consumer  Product  Safety  Commission,  as 
well.  But  when  you  say,  ‘‘We’re  swamped’’—look,  my  interest  is  in 
having  an  enforcement  agency  that’s  a  referee  and  that  represents 
us  in  going  after  deceptive  advertising  and  issues  of  concentration 
and  competition  that  you  have  the  resources  you  need.  That’s 
why—that’s  the  first  question  I  asked  you.  I  don’t  want  you  to  be 
too swamped to wake up in the morning and see an ad, or to have 
your  people  peruse  all  these  ads,  and  say,  ‘‘We’re  going  after  it. 
This is wrong. Consumers are being bilked. This is unfair.’’ I mean, 
I  want  you  to  have  the  resources  necessary.  And  as  you  know— 
there  are  people  who  believe  that  there  ought  to  be  a  minimalist 
role  here,  ‘‘If  someone  gets  stung  by  bad  business  practices,  tough 
luck.  They’ll  just  understand,  they’ll  learn,  you  don’t  do  business 
with  that  kind  of  situation  any  more,  you  don’t  do  business  with 
that company.’’ There are people with that minimalist attitude. 

Ms. MAJORAS. And—— 
Senator  DORGAN.  I  don’t  want  that.  I  want  an  FTC  with  teeth 

and with aggressiveness. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

31 

Ms. MAJORAS. That is absolutely not my attitude. It’s not that it’s 
minimalist. The difficulty for a small agency, though, is that I can’t 
absorb  50  people  every  year.  I  mean,  it’s—the  hiring  cost  that  it 
takes just to get that done, the absorption of people into the agen-
cy,  the  training—I  think  we  should  grow,  and—look,  we’ll  grow  as 
fast  as  we  can  and  I  agree  that  we  should  grow.  My  only  point  is, 
having worked in this organization and others, it’s very difficult to 
suddenly—when  you’re  small,  to  begin  with—grow  by  leaps  and 
bounds—— 

Senator DORGAN. Right. 
Ms. MAJORAS.—all at once. 
Senator  DORGAN.  A  fair  point.  I  accept  the  point.  And  my  only 
point  is  that  whatever  the  level  should  be  at  the  Federal  Trade 
Commission  to  protect  us  in  the  manner  that  we  want  to  be  pro-
tected,  to  protect  consumers,  we  want  that  level  to  exist  with  re-
spect to resources. 

And  I  want  to  come,  now,  to  this  issue  of  the  products  that  we 
read about on the pages of our newspapers. Someone buys a set of 
tires, to discover that the tires are faulty, bad products; and some-
one’s  on  the  road,  driving  70  miles  an  hour,  and  has  a  problem 
with  a  tire,  and  somebody  dies.  A  young  boy  swallows  a  heart- 
shaped charm—a small heart-shaped charm that comes with a pair 
of  tennis  shoes.  Turns  out  it’s  99  percent  lead,  and  the  4-year-old 
boy is dead. You know, the list is endless of trinkets and toys, Elmo 
and Big Bird, coming in from overseas now in this galloping global 
economy. And we discover—you know what?—we not only exported 
the  jobs,  we  exported  minimal  requirements  to  attend  to  the  pro-
duction, and we don’t have the foggiest idea of the conditions under 
which these products are being produced. 

So,  describe  to  me  your  role  and  the  role  of  the  Consumer  Prod-
uct Safety Commission, as well, with respect to product safety and 
what  we’re  now  seeing  with  respect  to  the  global  economy  and 
products coming in that are unsafe. 

Ms.  MAJORAS.  The  Consumer  Product  Safety  Commission,  Sen-
ator  Dorgan,  has  almost  the  entire  responsibility  for  this  current 
problem.  We  obviously  have  the  ability  to  go  after  deceptive  and 
unfair  practice—and  unfair  practices.  But  as  far  as  product  safety 
has  gone,  that  has  been  the  province  of  the  CPSC.  Obviously,  in 
food  and  pharma  and  so  forth,  that  has  been  FDA.  And  we  work 
with  those  agencies,  as  appropriate.  But,  in  fact,  we  haven’t  even 
worked much with CPSC, because we just don’t have much overlap 
with them. 

Senator  DORGAN.  The  CPSC  was  originally  an  outgrowth  of  the 

Federal Trade Commission, is that—— 

Ms. MAJORAS. That’s my—— 
Senator DORGAN.—correct? 
Ms. MAJORAS.—understanding. And that—— 
Senator  DORGAN.  You  have  no  relationship  at  this  point,  really? 
Ms.  MAJORAS.  Oh,  no,  we  have—we  have  a  relationship.  Occa-
sionally—to tell you the truth, we overlap more in the international 
arena,  because  some  agencies  overseas  have  the  same—still  have 
both  functions  in  their  agencies;  and  so,  sometimes  they  want  to 
meet  with  both  of  us,  and  we  may  be  consulting.  And  there  may 
be the occasional issue on which we consult with them. But I can’t 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

32 

think of anything official I’ve had to consult with them on anytime 
recently. 

Senator  DORGAN.  I’m  going  to  send  you  a  list  of  questions  about 
this  area,  because  I  think  there  needs  to  be  closer  consultation. 
And I also want to explore the issue of whether the Federal Trade 
Commission should retain some kind of a role here, working in co-
operation with the Consumer Product Safety Commission. 

It’s  clear  to  me  that,  with  the  global  economy  these  days,  and 
substantial  outsourcing  of  production,  we  now  insource  products 
from  all  around  the  world,  and,  in  many  cases,  we  don’t  have  the 
foggiest  idea  what  the  conditions  of  production  were.  And  now  we 
discover that Elmo and Big Bird have lead paint which exceeds the 
amount  of  lead  that  we  would  allow  American  children  to  be  ex-
posed  to.  This  is  not  new.  I  mean,  Benjamin  Franklin  warned  us 
about  that.  So,  it’s  not  as  if  we’ve  discovered  some  new  phe-
nomenon,  except  that  we  have  just  outsourced  production,  and  we 
have plants operating in parts of the world where they want to re-
duce  costs,  so  they  use  lead—fast-drying,  cheap,  bright.  The  prob-
lem is, it can kill children. 

Ms. MAJORAS. Yes. 
Senator DORGAN. And so—— 
Ms. MAJORAS. Yes. 
Senator DORGAN.—I want to explore some of that with you, with 

some written questions. 

summary. 

Let  me  ask,  if  I  might,  about  network  neutrality.  I’m  sure  you 

expected I would want to ask you about your statement. 

Ms. MAJORAS. Yes. 
Senator DORGAN. The Federal Trade Commission has made some 
statements—you  have  made  some  statements—about  the  issue  of 
network  neutrality,  or  net  neutrality.  Tell  me  your  impression  of 
these issues. 

Ms.  MAJORAS.  Well,  it’s  a  broad  issue,  but  I’ll  try  to  give  you  a 

We—when  I  first  was  trying  to  figure  out  what  my  impression 
of  the  issues  were,  probably  back  in  the  summer  of  2006,  my  im-
pression  was  that  there  wasn’t  enough—there  wasn’t  enough  out 
there in the marketplace that I could read, that could fully educate 
us  on  the  issue.  We  were  being  asked  a  lot  of  questions  about 
whether  competition  laws  are  sufficient  to  deal  with  these  issues 
as they come up. And I just—I felt there wasn’t enough good infor-
mation  out  there,  so  I  asked  my  staff  to  go  out  and  get  some.  And 
they did. They spoke to dozens and dozens of folks with an interest 
in  this  area,  and  then  we  held  a  couple  of  days  of  public  hearings, 
which  went  over  extremely  well,  because  I  think  people  were  very 
happy to get together and talk about this issue honestly. 

We  then  issued  a  report,  in—I  believe  it  was  June—in  which 
what we concluded was that, in thinking about acting in this area, 
legislators  or  other  policymakers  should  exercise  caution,  because 
there’s  so  much  that  we  still  don’t  know  about  what’s  happening 
in  this  marketplace,  what’s  going  to  happen  in  this  marketplace. 
There’s  no  question  that  people  on  both  sides  of  the  issue  say, 
‘‘These  Internet  service  providers  are  going  to  have  this  incentive 
or  that  incentive.’’  ‘‘No,  they’re  not.  They’re  going  to  have  this  in-
centive or that incentive.’’ That could be—either side could be right. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

33 

Variations  on  what  either  side  believe  could  be  right.  And  because 
this  is  such  a  dynamic  area,  where  we  don’t  want  to  squelch  the 
innovation  that’s  going  on,  squelch  the  development  as  we  move 
forward,  we  are  concerned  that  regulating  prematurely,  and  per-
haps  on  such  a  broad  basis,  as  opposed  to  trying  to  take  care  of 
problems that we know are occurring, really could serve to squelch 
this market in a way that’s harmful to consumers. 

Senator DORGAN. Can I ask what you mean by ‘‘regulating’’? Be-
cause  my  understanding  is  that,  prior  to  a  recent  decision  by  the 
FCC,  we  had  nondiscrimination  rules  in  place,  which  do  not  now 
exist.  But  were  those  nondiscrimination  rules  what  you  define  as 
‘‘regulation’’? 

Ms. MAJORAS. They’re part of regulation, yes. 
Senator  DORGAN.  And  so,  a  regulatory  framework  that  requires 

nondiscrimination, you think that’s inadvisable? 

Ms.  MAJORAS.  That’s  not  what  the  report  says.  What  the  report 
says is that, ‘‘Here are the things that one needs to think about be-
fore  you  do  it.’’  And  we  don’t  think  there’s  enough—first  of  all,  we 
don’t  think  there’s  evidence  that  discrimination  is  occurring,  or 
even  that  it  surely  will  occur.  We  don’t  think—if  it  does  occur,  we 
think  there  are  certainly  possible  economic  scenarios  in  which,  if 
it did occur, it would not be harmful to consumers, necessarily. And 
so,  if  you  have  an  inflexible  rule  that  prevents  it,  we’re  concerned 
that that may—that may prevent business models from developing 
that would actually be helpful. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Let  me  ask  you—there  was  an  op-ed  piece  a 
while  back  by  a  local  telephone  company  that  provides  broadband 
service,  and  so  on,  in  a  region,  and  the  manager  of  that  company 
said,  ‘‘You  know,  we  need  some  additional  revenue,  and  one  way 
that I hope to get that revenue is to take a look at some of the big 
folks  that  are  on  the  Internet  and  say  to  them,  ‘You’ve  got  to  pay 
a  toll  charge  to  get  to  the  people  I’m  serving.’ ’’  That  seems  to  be 
classically  what  we  exactly  want  to  prohibit  in  this  country.  And 
yet, if that telephone company decided to do that on their Internet 
service,  to  say  to  a  large  or  a  small  site  out  there,  ‘‘You’ve  got  to 
pay  money  to  us  in  order  for  us  to  move  your  site—or  make  your 
site  accessible  to  our  customers,’’  that  would,  under  current  cir-
cumstances, that would be all right, wouldn’t it? Because there’s no 
nondiscrimination  requirement,  and  it  would  be  fine  for  that  com-
pany to do that. I think that’s a horrible thing to have happen. My 
guess  is  that  your  philosophy  is,  ‘‘Well,  if  it  happens,  there’s  going 
to  be  some  other  alternatives,  and  competition  will  solve  the  prob-
lem.’’ Is that your position? 

Ms.  MAJORAS.  Well,  I  have  to—I  have  two  positions.  First  of  all, 
I  don’t  know  whether  it  will  be  completely  awful  for  that  to  hap-
pen.  I  know  that  companies  like  Google  and  Microsoft  don’t  want 
to  have  to  pay  for  it.  They  like  the—they  like—they  like  the  fact 
that  they’re  not.  So,  I  understand,  you  know,  that  perspective.  I 
certainly  understand  the  perspective  of  small  content  providers, 
and we do want to make sure that there are lots of—that we have 
lots  of  content  on  the  Internet.  But  I  do  think  that—a  couple  of 
things.  One,  I  think  competition  takes—does—likely  takes  care  of 
a  lot  of  it,  because  the  fact  of  the  matter  is—I  can’t  imagine  con-
sumers  tolerating  not  getting  the  content  that  they  want.  I  mean, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

34 

there  has  just  never  been  a  medium  that  consumers  have  believed 
was their own like the Internet. So, I think that these telecom pro-
viders have if they haven’t gotten the message, they probably will, 
that this won’t be tolerated. But, moreover, I’m not suggesting that 
if  you  start  to  see  something  that  really  is  harmful  to  consumers, 
that there might not be a time when some new rules are necessary. 
That’s—you know, that’s obviously part of what—— 

Senator DORGAN. Well—— 
Ms. MAJORAS.—regulators do, and what you do. But I just—to do 
it  now,  we  think—we  think—we  just  have  to  realize—could  create 
more problems. 

Senator  DORGAN.  But,  you  see,  this  gets  back  to  the  questions 
I’ve asked about some previous issues. You say, ‘‘Well, don’t worry. 
If  there  becomes  a  problem,  we’ll  deal  with  it  later.’’  I’d  like  us  to 
prevent  a  problem  from  existing  here.  And  let  me  give  you  an  ex-
ample.  When  Ed  Whitaker,  the  former  CEO  of  AT&T,  then  with 
BellSouth,  said,  quote,  ‘‘They  don’t  have  any  fiber  out  there,  they 
don’t have any wires, they don’t have anything. They use my lines 
for  free.  That’s  bull.  For  a  Google  or  a  Yahoo!  or  a  Vonage  or  any-
body  to  expect  these  pipes  for  free  is  nuts.’’  It’s  quite  clear  what 
the  interest  is,  and  it’s  clear  to  me  where  we’re  headed.  We’re 
headed  toward  a  circumstance  where  big  providers  that  have  a  lot 
of  muscle  and  will  be  able  to  make  it  stick,  will  set  up  different 
kinds  of  lanes  and  freeways  here,  some  toll,  some  not.  And  con-
sumers will not know what they don’t have. That’s just a fact. 

Ms.  MAJORAS.  And  I  just  don’t—I  just  don’t  completely  agree 

with that. 

right. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Well,  I  know  you  don’t  agree  with  it,  but  I’m 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  DORGAN.  Let  me  tell  you  why.  Consumers  won’t  know 
what  they  don’t  have,  because  there  will  be  providers  out  there, 
there will be sites out there—I’ll give you an example. I don’t have 
a  big  thing  for  Google.  I  don’t  have  any  contact  with  Google.  But 
Larry  and  Sergey,  just  9  years  ago,  were  moving  to  a  garage  with 
a garage-door opener, and had nine employees. That’s 9 years ago. 
And they had an idea. Nine years later, they have a company that 
exceeds the combined valuation of Coca Cola, Ford Motor, and Gen-
eral Motors. Now, would two guys in a dorm room or a garage have 
access  to  the  consumers  in  X,  Y,  or  Z  city  if  the  big  interests  said, 
‘‘Oh,  by  the  way,  you  get  a  shot  to  go  on  our  toll  road  if  you  can 
pay the toll’’? I don’t know. I don’t think consumers will ever know 
what  they  miss.  We  created  this  Internet  system  through  innova-
tion.  Innovation  was  available  to  everybody  under  every  cir-
cumstance,  and  it  was  able  to  be  accessed  by  everybody  under 
every circumstance. If we get to a point where we say, ‘‘Now there’s 
no nondiscrimination rules, there’s no rules against discrimination, 
you  can  discriminate,’’  we  won’t  know  what  we  miss.  We  won’t 
know  what  innovation  we  squelch.  And  I  would  hope  that  the  phi-
losophy at the Federal Trade Commission is not to say, ‘‘You know 
what,  let’s  wait  and  see  what  develops.  We’ll  respond  to  it  like  a 
catcher  responds  to  a  foul  ball  here.’’  Let’s—how  about  deciding 
that  what  we’ve  built,  we  built  with  nondiscrimination  require-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

35 

ments. That’s the regulatory framework in which we built this suc-
cessful venture. 

Ms.  MAJORAS.  But  what  I  don’t—what  I  don’t  want  to  see  hap-
pen—Senator, you and I would not have been able to predict where 
we are—5 years ago, we would not have been able to predict where 
we  are  today.  That  makes  it  very  difficult  for  us  to  predict  where 
the  Internet  is  going,  or  probably  even  where  we  want  it  to  be  5 
years from now, and we just have to remember that if we put rules 
into place here, there will be some unintended consequences. That’s 
just part of what we’re pointing out. There always are. And, again, 
I think that this medium is so dynamic that—no way is Verizon or 
any  of  these  other  companies  powerful  enough  to  squelch  it.  The 
amount of consumer-generated content that’s out there, if they sud-
denly  start  putting  a  stop  to  that,  there  will  be  a  hue  and  cry  in 
this—across  this  Nation  like  no  tomorrow,  and  they’ll  lose—you 
know,  they’ll  lose  a  lot  of  customers.  So,  I  just—I  don’t  disagree 
with  you.  I  don’t  want  the  bad  result  that  you’re  talking  about.  I 
think that there just may be a difference in how we get there. 

Senator  DORGAN.  I  fail,  ever,  to  see  a  downside  from  non-
discrimination.  I  mean,  I  can’t  think  of  a  detrimental  impact  of 
nondiscrimination. Maybe—— 

Ms. MAJORAS. May I—— 
Senator DORGAN.—you can. 
Ms. MAJORAS. May I offer one? 
Senator DORGAN. Sure. 
Ms.  MAJORAS.  OK.  Today  there  are  certain  types  of  content  that 
require  faster  speeds.  And,  unfortunately,  because  there’s—you 
know,  I—I’m  not  always  great  at  technical  terms,  forgive  me,  Sen-
ator—but  you’re—where  we’re  running  out  of  space,  almost—when 
we look at prioritization and who should go first, in terms of trans-
mittal, if, for example, you don’t prioritize certain things, like mov-
ies or VoIP or these other things that consumers are really starting 
to  want  on  the  Internet,  over  things  that,  sure,  you’re  going  to 
transmit,  but  they  don’t  need  to  go  as  quickly  or  with  greater  pri-
ority, then you’re going to lose those—the functions, the capability, 
at least in the short run. 

Senator DORGAN. Well—— 
Ms.  MAJORAS.  So,  to  be  able  to  prioritize  those—that’s  a  form  of 

discrimination. 

Senator  DORGAN.  We  see  a  different  landscape,  I  guess.  I  think 
both  the  lack  of  informed  public  policy  and  the  lack  of  effective 
competition  means  that  we  have  1⁄20 the  speed  at  twice  the  price 
for the same Internet service that many of our foreign competitors 
have.  If  you’re  living  in  Japan  or  Korea,  you  have  a  whole  lot  bet-
ter speed—a whole lot more speed and at a lot less cost. 

What  I  see  in  virtually  every  area  of  telecommunications  is  gal-
loping concentration, and I would encourage you, Madam Chair, to 
take a look at the bills you pay every month for your services. Most 
Americans  do  the  same,  and  they  understand  there  is  not  robust 
competition  to  drive  prices  down,  which  would  be  the  effect  of  ro-
bust competition. 

But  we’ll  save  that  for  another  day.  My  hope  is  that  you  will 
agree with me that, rather than wait for bad things to happen, we 
might  want  to  preserve  the  same  nondiscrimination  rules  that  we 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

36 

have always had with the growth of the Internet. I see no downside 
to nondiscrimination. But you and I will have more back and forth, 
on this issue. 

Because  we  have  another  panel,  let  me  thank  you  for  coming, 
and say this. I think the discussions we’ve had about energy prices, 
about  the  subprime  loans,  about  staffing  at  the  FTC,  about  decep-
tive advertising, and about foreign products coming into this coun-
try,  tainted  products  and  so  on,  all  of  these  things  are  really  very 
important, and the Federal Trade Commission, I think, is in a posi-
tion  to  play  a  very,  very  important  role.  I  don’t  ask  you  to  come 
up  here  today  to  denigrate  a  lot  of  good  people  that  serve  in  the 
Federal Trade Commission. I do have heartburn, from time to time, 
that,  especially  in  recent  years,  almost  anybody  that  wants  to 
merge  gets  a  shot  at  merging  without  any  oversight.  And  I  know 
you’ve  told  me  today  of  some  circumstances  where  you  have  been 
an  impediment  to  these  mergers,  and  I  appreciate  that,  because  I 
think  there  are  times  when  mergers  clearly  are  not  in  the  public 
interest. I want the Federal Trade Commission to be an aggressive 
and  an  active  advocate  on  behalf  of  competition  and  on  behalf  of 
American consumers. My own belief is that, given the world we live 
in, we need to add resources to the Federal Trade Commission, and 
give  the  Federal  Trade  Commission  the  capability  and  the  re-
sources that it needs to do the job that is required of it by law. 

So,  I  thank  you  for  coming  today,  and  let  me  ask  you  to  thank 
the  other  Commissioners  for  the  Committee.  We  will  be  trying  to 
report a bill out of the Committee, a reauthorization bill, to finally 
get this through the U.S. Senate and through Congress. Thank you 
very much. 

Ms. MAJORAS. Thank you for your support, Chairman Dorgan, we 

appreciate it. 

Senator DORGAN. Thanks for being here. 
Let me call the next panel up: Dr. Mark Cooper, Mr. Chris Mur-
ray,  Mr.  Michael  Calhoun,  Mr.  Ari  Schwartz,  and  Mr.  Marty 
Abrams. 

I want to indicate that your entire statement will be made a part 
of the permanent record, and I would ask that you summarize. I’ve 
had a chance to review your testimony. 

And we will begin, today, with Dr. Mark Cooper, who represents 

the Consumer Federation of America. 

Dr.  Cooper,  welcome,  to  you.  You’ve  appeared  before  this  Com-
mittee  on  a  number  of  previous  occasions,  and  we  appreciate  your 
appearance today. You may proceed. 

STATEMENT OF DR. MARK N. COOPER, DIRECTOR OF 
RESEARCH, CONSUMER FEDERATION OF AMERICA 

Dr. COOPER. Mr. Chairman, thank you. 
There  are  certainly  some  areas  where  the  FTC  has  done  a  good 
job,  but,  for  oil  and  high-speed  broadband  Internet  access,  it  has 
failed  consumers  badly.  Here,  the  FTC  asserts  that  there  is  vig-
orous  competition,  when  there  is  not;  and  has  claimed  that  there 
is no harm, when there is a great deal. The FTC has allowed refin-
ing markets and wholesale gasoline markets to become highly con-
centrated  through  lax  merger  review.  The  resulting  tight  oligopoly 
imposes  severe  pain  at  the  pump  and  in  the  pocketbook,  hundreds 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

37 

of  billions  of  dollars  of  overcharges.  The  FTC’s  analysis  of  recent 
price  spikes  ignores  fundamental  structural  problems  of  its  own 
making in oil markets. 

If the subject of the FTC’s 2006 price gouging investigation, men-
tioned  earlier,  had  been  the  first  price  spike  in  the  petroleum  in-
dustry  in  recent  years,  then  the  report  might  be  plausible.  But,  as 
every  gasoline  consumer  knows,  the  2006  spike  was  the  sixth  in  a 
string  of  seven  that  have  occurred  in  the  last  8  years.  Given  the 
ever-lengthening  list  of  events—fire,  flood,  hurricane,  lightning, 
rust,  demand  surges—that  Federal  agencies  use  to  excuse  these 
price  spikes,  the  only  way  one  can  characterize  the  FTC’s  analysis 
is that the price spikes are not the result of a conspiracy, they are 
the  result  of  stupidity.  The  industry  is  simply  unable  to  cope  with 
any  event  that  is  out  of  the  ordinary,  or  even  do  routine  spring 
cleaning, without driving the price through the roof. 

What  are  some  of  the  surprises  the  FTC  identified  in  the  2006 
price  spike?  Seasonal  effects  of  summer  driving,  increased  con-
sumer  demand  for  gasoline,  refinery  outages  resulting  from  hurri-
cane  damage,  other  unexpected  or  external  events,  and  required 
maintenance. 

Surprise,  surprise—consumers  drive  more  in  the  summer,  and 
we  drive  more  as  we  grow  in  population  and  wealth.  These  two 
facts have been in evidence since Mr. Ford first mass-produced the 
Model  T,  but  they  still  somehow  seem  to  have  snuck  up  on  the  oil 
industry. 

Surprise,  surprise—refineries  need  to  be  maintained,  and  they 
break.  How  could  the  industry  not  have  noticed?  Worse  still,  why 
is there so little spare capacity that the industry has to run at such 
high  levels  of  utilization  that  they  are  much  more  prone  to  acci-
dents? Accidents don’t just happen, they happen because you over-
use your facilities. 

Why is there a deficit of over 3 million barrels a day in domestic 
refining,  more  than  twice  what  it  was  a  decade  and  a  half  ago? 
Why have stockpiles been cut in half so they are inadequate to deal 
with any small blip in supply and demand? 

In  fact,  five  of  the  six  excuses  that  the  FTC  gave  for  the  price 
spikes of 2006 are the result of strategic underinvestment in capac-
ity and management mistakes that have created a tight market in 
which  you  don’t  need  collusion  to  put  prices  up.  True  competitive 
markets expand capacity. Tight oligopolies increase prices and prof-
its. 

Let  me  turn  to  broadband.  When  Congress  passed  the  Tele-
communications  Act  of  1996,  the  U.S.  was  a  global  leader  in  the 
Internet.  Virtually  all  Internet  traffic  in  this  country  traveled  on 
telecommunications  networks  that  were  obligated  to  provide  non-
discriminatory  interconnection  and  carriage  under  Title  II  of  the 
Communications Act. But the FCC abandoned the principle of non-
discrimination, allowing a cozy duopoly of telephone and cable com-
panies to dominate the broadband marketplace without any obliga-
tion to provide nondiscriminatory access. 

Chairman Majoras was dead wrong in her example. Ed Whitaker 
is  not  being  prevented  from  prioritizing  movies.  What  he  wants  to 
do is discriminate in favor of his movie and against the other guy’s 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

38 

movies.  Establishing  priorities  for  categories  of  service  is  differen-
tiation, not discrimination. She got that absolutely wrong. 

The FTC and the DOJ have cheered this decision by the FCC to 
allow  this  cozy  duopoly  to  come  into  existence,  claiming,  ‘‘Two’s 
enough  for  consumer  protection.’’  But  theory  and  empirical  evi-
dence  contradict  that  plan.  The  cozy  duopoly  in  America  dribbles 
out  bandwidth  at  10  to  20  times  the—what  other  people  pay 
around the world. 

We  have  fallen  from  third,  6  years  ago,  to  at  least  15th,  maybe 
24th, depending on how you counted. Consumers pay too much for 
too little in this country, and other nations with consumer-friendly 
and competition-friendly policies have become the focal point of in-
novation.  We  can  see  what  we’re  missing,  Mr.  Chairman,  by  look-
ing at those who have less—left us in their dust. 

Efforts  to  explain  away  the  declining  state  of  the  U.S.  by  popu-
lation density, market concentration, household size, income levels, 
income  inequality,  education,  and  age,  among  other  things,  do  not 
negate  the  fact  and  the  finding  that  the  U.S.  has  fallen  behind  at 
least  a  dozen  other  nations.  The  success  of  the  Internet,  as  you 
pointed out, was built on communications networks that were oper-
ated  in  an  open  and  nondiscriminatory  manner  so  that  vigorous 
competition between applications and service providers was free to 
provide  innovation  and  consumer-friendly  services  that  drove  de-
mand. The way to break out of the current quagmire is not to claim 
that  a  duopoly  is  all  you  need,  but  to  return  to  the  successful  pro-
competitive policies of open communications that made the Internet 
possible  and  allowed  the  U.S.  to  be  the  world  leader  in  the  first 
generation of the digital age. 

The nations that have passed us by have relied on that very pol-
icy  that  we  used  30,  20,  10  years  ago  to  achieve  leadership.  We 
need to get back to that simple policy of nondiscrimination in com-
munications. 
Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Dr. Cooper follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DR. MARK N. COOPER, DIRECTOR OF RESEARCH, 

CONSUMER FEDERATION OF AMERICA 

Mr. Chairman and Members of the Committee, 
Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify.  My  name  is  Mark  Cooper  and  I  am  Di-

rector of Research at the Consumer Federation of America (CFA).1 

In  my  comments  today  I  address  two  areas  where  the  antitrust  authorities,  the 
Federal Trade Commission (FTC) in particular, have dropped the ball, failing to pro-
tect  consumers  from  the  abuse  of  market  power.  While  the  two  sectors  I  address— 
the  oil  industry 2 and  high-speed,  broadband  Internet  access 3—would  appear  to  be 

1 The  Consumer  Federation  of  America  (CFA)  is  a  non-profit  association  of  300  consumer 
groups, with a combined membership of more than 50 million people. CFA was founded in 1968 
to advance the consumer’s interest through advocacy, research, and education. 

2 ‘‘The  Failure  of  Federal  Authorities  to  Protect  American  Energy  Consumers  from  Market 
Power  and  Other  Abusive  Practices,’’  Loyola  Consumer  Law  Review,  19:4  (2007);  The  Role  of 
Supply,  Demand,  Industry  Behavior  and  Financial  Markets  in  the  Gasoline  Price  Spiral  (Pre-
pared for Wisconsin Attorney General Peggy A. Lautenslager, May 2006); Record Prices, Record 
Oil  Company  Profits:  The  Failure  Of  Antitrust  Enforcement  To  Protect  American  Energy  Con-
sumers (Consumer Federation of America, Consumers Union, September 2004). 

3 This testimony draws on Mark Cooper, ‘‘The Importance of Open Networks in Sustaining the 
Digital  Revolution,’’  in  Thomas  M.  Lenard  and  Randolph  J.  May  (Eds.)  Net  Neutrality  or  Net 
Neutering  (New  York,  Springer,  2006);  Open  Architecture  as  Communications  Policy  (Stanford 
Law  School,  Center  for  Internet  and  Society:  2004);  ‘‘Open  Communications  Platforms:  Corner-
stone  of  Innovation  and  Democratic  Discourse  In  the  Internet  Age,’’  Journal  on  Telecommuni-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

39 

dramatically  different,  the  underlying  problem  that  afflicts  consumers  in  each  of 
these markets is the same—inadequate competition and the failure of antitrust au-
thorities  to  act  to  promote  competition  or  prevent  anti-consumer,  anti-competitive 
behavior  by  the  industry.  Federal  authorities  have  allowed  a  tight  oligopoly  in  oil 
and  a  cozy  duopoly  in  broadband  to  engage  in  strategic  under-investment  in  facili-
ties, creating artificial shortages that allow them to overcharge consumers. 

There are other areas where we think the FTC is doing a good job, including cer-
tain  aspects  of  consumer  protection,  merger  review  in  other  industries,  and  anti-
competitive,  anti-consumer  practices  in  the  drug  industry.  But  the  oil  industry  and 
the broadband industry are extremely important and they are real weak spots. 

The FTC has allowed refining markets and wholesale gasoline markets to become 
highly  concentrated  through  lax  merger  review.  The  result  is  a  tight  oligopoly  and 
severe pain in the pocketbook—hundred of billions of dollars in overcharges and ex-
cess  profits.  The  FTC’s  analysis  of  recent  price  spikes  ignores  fundamental  struc-
tural problems of its own making in oil markets. 

The  FCC  has  allowed  a  cozy  duopoly  of  telephone  and  cable  companies  to  domi-
nate  the  broadband  access  market,  without  any  obligation  to  provide  nondiscrim-
inatory  access.  The  FTC 4 and  the  DOJ 5 have  cheered  this  decision  claiming  that 
market  forces  in  a  duopoly  will  protect  consumers,  but  theory  and  empirical  evi-
dence  contradict  that  claim.  As  a  result,  the  cozy  duopoly  dribbles  out  bandwidth 
at prices that are 10 to 20 times as high as in other nations around the world. The 
reliance  on  this  cozy  duopoly  has  been  disastrous  for  the  United  States.  In  a  short 
half  decade,  we  have  fallen  from  third  in  the  world  in  broadband  penetration  and 
now  are  behind  at  least  a  dozen  nations  (15th)  and,  by  some  counts  almost  two 
dozen.  Consumers  pay  too  much  for  too  little  and  the  economy  suffers  as  other  na-
tions with consumer and competition-friendly policies become the focal point of inno-
vation. 
Oil Prices 

If the subject of the recent FTC oil price gouging investigation had been the first 
price  spike  in  the  petroleum  industry  in  recent  years,  then  the  report  on  the  2006 
price  spike  might  be  plausible,  but  as  every  gasoline  consumer  knows,  it  was  not 
the  first  price  spike  by  any  stretch  of  the  imagination.  In  fact,  the  2006  spike  was 
the sixth in a string of seven that have occurred in the last 8 years. 

Given  the  ever  lengthening  list  of  unnatural  events—fire,  flood,  hurricane,  light-
ening,  rust,  demand  surges—that  Federal  agencies  use  to  explain  recent  price 
spikes,  the  only  way  you  can  characterize  the  FTC  conclusion  is  that  the  price 
spikes are not the result of a conspiracy—they are the result of stupidity. The indus-
try  is  simply  unable  to  cope  with  any  event  that  is  out  of  the  ordinary  and  even 
deal  with  routine  spring  cleaning  without  driving  prices  through  the  roof.  When 
there  are  surprises  and  unexpected  events  for  which  the  industry  is  unprepared, 
prices go up and oil companies just happen to make a lot more money. Its all quite 
innocent; dumb, but innocent—stupid like a fox. 
What  are  these  surprises  and  unexpected  events  that  the  FTC  identified  in  the  2006 
price  spike?  ‘‘Seasonal  effects  of  the  summer  driving  season  . . .  and  increased 
consumer demand for gasoline beyond the seasonal effects.’’ 

Surprise,  surprise—consumers  drive  more  in  the  summer  and  more  as  the  popu-
lation and economy grow. Those two facts have been in evidence since Mr. Ford first 
mass  produced  the  Model  T,  but  they  still  seem  to  have  snuck  up  on  the  oil  indus-
try. As Exhibits 1 and 2 show, the long term growth trend and seasonal driving pat-
terns predict the gasoline demand in 2006 almost perfectly. 

cations, Technology and Intellectual Property, 2:1, 2003, first presented at The Regulation of In-
formation Platforms, University of Colorado School of Law, January 27, 2002. 

4 Federal  Trade  Commission,  Report  on  Spring/Summer  2006  Nationwide  Gasoline  Price  In-

5 ‘‘U.S. Department of Justice Ex Parte Filing,’’ In the Matter of Broadband Industry Practices, 

creases. 

WC Docket No. 07–52, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

Exhibit 1 

40 

Source: Energy Information Administration, Database, Petroleum Consumption. 

Exhibit 2 

Source: Energy Information Administration, Database, Petroleum Consumption. 
Even if there were a bit of a surprise, why is there no spare capacity or stockpiles 
to  deal  with  it?  In  competitive  industries,  when  there  is  a  seasonal  pattern,  pro-
ducers build systems to respond without having to raise prices dramatically, for fear 
that they will lose their customers. Prices fluctuate, but competition drives seasonal 
sectors  to  shave  the  peaks.  In  the  oil  industry  they  don’t  work  that  way,  they  just 
put  the  prices  up.  Over  the  past  couple  of  decades  the  oil  industry  has  systemati-
cally  under-invested  in  storage  (see  Exhibit  3),  reducing  the  amount  of  gasoline  on 
hand,  thereby  creating  a  tight  market  with  little  capacity  to  respond  not  only  to 
genuinely unexpected shifts in demand, but even to routine seasonal patterns. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.

2
P
O
O
C
2
1
9

s
p
e
.

1
P
O
O
C
2
1
9

Exhibit 3: Gasoline Stocks above Minimum Operational Levels 

41 

Source: Energy Information Administration, Petroleum Database. 

What  are  these  surprises  and  unexpected  events?  ‘‘Refinery  outages  resulting  from 
hurricane  damage,  other  unexpected  problems  or  external  events,  and  required 
maintenance.’’ 

Surprise,  surprise—refineries  need  to  be  maintained  and  they  break.  How  could 
the industry have been so stupid as not to notice? Never mind that in a competitive 
industry  each  individual  producer  would  carry  more  spare  capacity  for  fear  that  he 
might  get  caught  short  if  he  had  an  outage  or  have  to  raise  prices,  which  would 
cost him his customers (see Exhibit 4). In the oil industry they don’t work that way, 
they just put the prices up. Worse still, the stupidity of the oil industry makes mat-
ters worse. When you don’t build enough refineries and you run them at high levels 
of capacity, they break more often. Over the past couple of decades the oil industry 
has  systematically  under-invested  in  refining  capacity—closing  dozens  of  refineries 
and refusing to build new ones—thereby creating a system that not only cannot re-
spond to accidents, but that cannot even provide routine maintenance without caus-
ing price spikes. There is now a shortfall of over 3 million barrels a day of refining 
capacity (see Exhibits 5 and 6). 
Exhibit 4: Spare Capacity in Refining v. All Industry 

Source:  Calculated  from  Board  of  Governors  of  the  Federal  Reserve  System,  Federal  Reserve 
Statistical  Release,  Industrial  Production  and  Capacity  Utilization;  Energy  Information  Admin-
istration, U.S. Department of Energy, U.S. Percent Utilization of Refinery Operable Capacity. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.

4
P
O
O
C
2
1
9

s
p
e
.

3
P
O
O
C
2
1
9

Exhibit 5 

42 

Source: Energy Information Administration, Database, Petroleum Consumption, Refining. 

Exhibit 6 

Source: Energy Information Administration, Database, Petroleum Consumption, Refining. 

What are these surprises and unexpected events? ‘‘Increased price of ethanol . . . ca-
pacity  reductions  stemming  from  refiners’  transition  from  methyl  tertiary-butyl 
ether (MTBE) to ethanol.’’ 

That  summer  fuels  require  oxygenates  has  been  known  for  well  over  a  decade. 
That everyone in the industry switched to ethanol at the same time creating a tem-
porary  shortage  was  dumb.  They  did  not  have  to  switch,  they  chose  to,  en  mass, 
even  though  they  had  not  arranged  for  adequate  supplies.  They  switched  without 
making  sure  that  alternatives  would  be  available.  The  result  is  a  most  remarkable 
pattern  of  behavior.  When  ethanol  is  cheap  they  don’t  use  it,  when  it  is  expensive 
they all want it. 

Thus,  five  of  the  six  excuses  that  the  FTC  gave  for  the  price  spikes  of  2006  are 
the result of strategic under-investment in capacity and management mistakes that 
have  created  a  tight  market  and  exploit  that  tightness.  If  the  cost  of  inputs,  like 
crude  and  ethanol,  and  the  need  to  bring  expensive  imports  to  market  were  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.

6
P
O
O
C
2
1
9

s
p
e
.

5
P
O
O
C
2
1
9

43 

cause  of  increases  in  prices  at  the  pump,  then  one  would  not  expect  the  domestic 
spread  and  refinery  margins  and  oil  industry  profits  to  be  increasing,  but  they  are 
(see Exhibits 7 and 8). 
Exhibit 7 

Source:  Energy  Information  Administration,  Database,  Petroleum  Consumption,  Retail  Gaso-

line (excluding taxes) minus refiner acquisition cost of crude. 
Exhibit  8:  Major  Oil  Company  Return  on  Equity  is  Far  Above  Historic 

Levels 

Source: FRS Companies: Energy Information Administration, Form EIA–28 (Financial Report-
ing System). All Manufacturing Companies: U.S. Census Bureau Quarterly Financial Report, All 
Manufacturing Companies. 

The  simple  fact  of  the  matter  is  that  this  pattern  of  behavior  was  made  possible 
by  the  merger  wave  of  the  past  decade  (see  Exhibit  9).  It  has  created  a  situation 
in which the industry does not have to collude to increase prices and profits. It just 
waits  for  the  inevitable  driving  season  to  arrive,  leavened  by  inadequate  capacity 
and excuses, to put prices up. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.

8
P
O
O
C
2
1
9

s
p
e
.

7
P
O
O
C
2
1
9

Exhibit 9: Mergers have severely reduced the number of refiners 

44 

Source: http://tonto.eia.doe.gov/FTPROOT/financial/mergers/dwnstream.pdf. 
The  FTC  adopts  a  very  consumer  unfriendly  definition  of  price  gouging.  The  do-
mestic  spread  on  gasoline  was  49  cents  per  gallon  higher  in  2006  than  the  average 
for  1990–1999  (see  Exhibit  9).  However,  the  FTC  assumes  that  the  inflated  prices 
of  2001–2005  as  the  base,  so  it  concludes  that  the  ‘‘extraordinary’’  increase  in  2006 
was only 16–21 cents. Because the market is too tight, it estimates that prices could 
have  risen  by  as  much  as  $1.35  to  $2.21,  so  consumers  should  take  solace  in  the 
fact that the industry left a lot on the table. When it looks at price gouging for indi-
vidual companies, it assumes that if all the companies raise prices at the same time, 
then none is gouging, even though profits are going through the roof. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e
.

9
P
O
O
C
2
1
9

45 

Broadband Internet 

The  FTC  and  the  Department  of  Justice  have  made  precisely  the  same  mistakes 
in  analyzing  the  broadband  market  place  that  have  afflicted  the  FTC’s  analysis  of 
the oil industry. They see vigorous competition,6 where there is little; they see little 
harm,7 where there is a great deal of damage. 

The decision to abandon the principle of open communications networks after the 
Telecommunications  Act  of  1996  (the  1996  Act)  resulted  in  a  cozy  duopoly  of  the 
telephone  and  cable  companies  that  has  failed  to  accomplish  the  most  fundamental 
goals  of  the  Telecommunications  Act  of  1996.  In  comparison  to  at  least  a  dozen 
other nations, the closed proprietary networks of the cozy duopoly have: 

• Failed ‘‘to make available to all people of the United States . . . adequate facili-

ties at reasonable charges,’’ 

• Failed to ‘‘encourage the deployment on a reasonable and timely basis’’ of a two- 
way  communications  network,  with  advanced  telecommunications  capabilities, 
with  ‘‘high-speed,  switched,  broadband  telecommunications  capability  that  en-
ables users to originate and receive high-quality voice, graphics, and video tele-
communication,’’ and 

• Threatened  the  vibrant  and  competitive  Internet  that  Congress  sought  to  pre-

serve in the 1996 Act. 

The  failure  of  the  closed,  proprietary,  and  cozy  duopoly  is  evident  in  a  multi-

dimensional context. This model has 

• Failed  to  deliver  any  broadband  services  to  substantial  numbers  of  American 

households (around 9 percent, according to the GAO); 

• Failed  to  deliver  bandwidth  with  data  transfer  rates  comparable  to  the 

broadband networks which are deployed in other industrialized nations. 

• Failed across the board to deliver facilities that afford two-way communications 

at full broadband functionality and at reasonable prices. 

In addition, 
• Where  last-mile  broadband  networks  are  available,  the  prices  charged  for 
broadband  are  excessive  when  compared  with  the  price  per  megabit  available 
in other industrialized nations; 

• The target recipients of advanced broadband facilities, which are capable of pro-
viding  bandwidth  on  par  with  the  higher  speeds  available  in  other  industri-
alized  nations,  are  households  with  high  incomes,  reflecting  pricing  practices 
which demand extremely high charges for access. 

When  Congress  passed  the  Telecommunication  Act  of  1996,  virtually  all  Internet 
traffic  originated  by  or  delivered  to  the  public  traveled  on  telecommunications  net-
works that were obligated to provide nondiscriminatory interconnection and carriage 
under  Title  II  of  the  Communications  Act.  The  U.S.  was  the  global  Internet  leader 
by  far.  But  the  FCC  abandoned  the  principles  of  nondiscrimination,  first  for 
broadband provided by cable companies, then for telephone companies. 

Half  a  decade  latter  we  have  fallen  far  behind  many  other  nations  (see  Exhibits 
10,  11  and  12).  When  it  comes  to  truly  broadband  communications  that  Congress 
envisioned  in  the  1996  Act,  compared  to  many  other  nations,  most  of  which 
strengthened their commitment to open communications networks, 

• Americans  pay  over  ten  times  more  for  far  less  service  than  the  leading 

broadband nations (see Exhibit 13) and 

• The communications networks being deployed in America relegate the public to 
the  role  of  passive  listeners  and  restrict  their  opportunity  as  producers  of  con-
tent  and  speakers  to  fully  utilize  the  immense  functionality  of  broadband  tech-
nologies in civic discourse (see Exhibit 14). 

6 FTC  Staff  Report,  Broadband  and  Connectivity  Competition  Policy,  June  2007,  p.  10;  DOJ, 

Ex Parte Filing, p. 1. 

7 FTC Staff Report, p. 11; DOJ, Ex Parte Filing, p. 24. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

Exhibit 10: The U.S. Is Falling Behind On Broadband: 3 OECD Nations Were 

Ahead Of The U.S. In 2001, 14 Nations Are Now Ahead of the U.S. 

46 

Exhibit  11:  The  U.S.  Ranks  15th  on  Broadband  Penetration  by  Households 

and Per Capita 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.

1
1
P
O
O
C
2
1
9

.

s
p
e
0
1
P
O
O
C
2
1
9

47 

46.6 France 
46.3 United Kingdom 
46.1 Virginia 
45.7 Luxembourg 

45 Australia 
45 DC 
45 Arizona 

Exhibit  12:  60%  of  U.S.  States  have  lower  broadband  penetration  than 

Spain, 40% have lower broadband penetration than Portugal 
35.6 Wyoming 
34.6 Germany 
34.5 South Carolina 
33.5 Tennessee 
33.4 Montana 
33.3 North Carolina 
32.5 Iowa 
31.7 Kentucky 
31.6 Ireland 
31.4 Idaho 
30.9 New Zealand 
30.8 West Virginia 
30.1 Arkansas 
29.8 New Mexico 
29.4 Alabama 
28.8 Czech Republic 
21.3 South Dakota 
20.4 North Dakota 
20.2 Mississippi 
19.6 Czech Republic 
18.3 Hungary 
15.3 Poland 
13.6 Turkey 
9.2 Mexico 
8.8 Greece 
8.4 Slovak Republic 

44.6 United States avg. 
44.5 Spain 
44.4 Alaska 
43.8 Texas 
42.9 Nebraska 
42.8 Minnesota 
41.6 Maine 
41.1 Utah 
40.8 Pennsylvania 
40.2 Ohio 
40.2 Vermont 
39.7 Austria 

% of Nation/State 
HH 
80.9 South Korea 
71.1 Iceland 
64.2 Netherlands 
63.6 Denmark 
63.4 Norway 
61.4 Switzerland 
61.1 Hawaii 
60.7 New Jersey 
59.9 Connecticut 
57.3 Massachusetts 
57.2 Canada 
56.8 New Hampshire 
56.8 California 
53.9 Finland 
53.3 Maryland 
52.6 Rhode Island 
51.8 New York 
51.4 Delaware 
50.5 Japan 
50.4 Nevada 
49.5 Sweden 
48.2 Belgium 
48.2 Florida 
47.9 Washington 
46.9 Kansas 
Exhibit 13: 

39 Wisconsin 
38.9 Missouri 
38.3 Portugal 
37.9 Italy 
37.6 Indiana 

37 Oklahoma 
36.8 Michigan 
36.1 Louisiana 

Derek Turner, Broadband Reality Check II, Free Press, August 2006. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

.

s
p
e
3
1
P
O
O
C
2
1
9

Exhibit 14: The U.S. Ranks 14th in Average Speed 

48 

Source: Information Technology and Innovation Foundation 
The root cause of this failure is the abandonment of the commitment to open com-
munications  networks  and  the  reliance  on  feeble  competition  between,  at  best,  two 
closed proprietary networks that possess and abuse market power. With inadequate 
competition  and  little  public  obligation,  the  cozy  duopoly  dribbles  out  capacity  at 
high prices and restricts the uses of the network, chilling innovation in applications 
and services and causing a much lower rate of penetration of broadband in the U.S. 
than abroad. 

Efforts  to  explain  away  the  declining  status  of  the  U.S.  by  population  density, 
market  concentration,  household  size,  income  levels,  income  inequality,  education, 
age,  among  other  factors  do  not  negate  the  finding  the  U.S.  is  well  behind  a  dozen 
or more developed nations (see Exhibits 15 and 16). 
Exhibit 15: Controlling for Urbanicity, Income and Industry Concentration, 

the U.S. is outperformed by 15 OECD Nations 

Source: Scott Wallstein, Everything You Hear about Broadband in the U.S. is Wrong, Progress 

and Freedom Foundation, June 2007 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.

5
1
P
O
O
C
2
1
9

.

s
p
e
4
1
P
O
O
C
2
1
9

49 

Exhibit  16:  Lowering  expectations  does  not  improve  the  picture:  The  U.S. 
ranks  14th  on  performance  and  11  of  the  14  nations  ahead  on 
broadband are also outperforming the U.S. 

Source: Phoenix Center, The Broadband Performance Index, July 2007; OECD rankings 
The  demonstrated  failure  of  the  cozy  duopoly  model  to  achieve  the  goals  of  the 
1996  Act,  the  flawed  theory  of  the  benefits  of  discrimination,  the  clear  initial  signs 
of  anti-competitive  and  anti-consumer  practices,  as  well  as  the  extremely  dim  pros-
pects  for  vigorous  competition  in  facilities,  combine  to  create  a  very  dismal  future 
for  broadband  consumers  in  America.  The  Federal  antitrust  agencies  have  turned 
a blind eye to the problem. The only way to break out of this quagmire is to return 
to  the  successful  policies  of  open  communications  that  made  the  Internet  possible 
and  allowed  the  U.S.  to  be  the  world  leader  in  the  first  generation  of  the  digital 
age.  The  success  of  the  Internet  was  built  on  communications  networks  that  were 
operated in an open and nondiscriminatory manner so that the vigorous competition 
between applications and service providers was free to provide innovations and con-
sumer-friendly service that drove demand. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Dr.  Cooper,  thank  you  very  much.  As  always, 

you seem to have had breakfast and have a lot of energy. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator DORGAN. And we appreciate your being here. 
Mr. Michael Calhoun, the president of the Center for Responsible 

Lending. 

Mr. Calhoun, welcome. 

STATEMENT OF MICHAEL D. CALHOUN, PRESIDENT, 

CENTER FOR RESPONSIBLE LENDING 

Mr. CALHOUN. Thank you, Chairman. 
My testimony today will address the Federal Trade Commission’s 
regulation  of  the  mortgage  market,  with  focus  on  the  subprime 
market, looking at how they can be more effective in protecting the 
integrity of that market. 

I’m  the  President  of  the  Center  for  Responsible  Lending,  which 
is a nonprofit research organization that studies the mortgage mar-
ket.  Equally  important,  the  Center  is  an  affiliate  of  Self-Help, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

.

s
p
e
6
1
P
O
O
C
2
1
9

50 

which is a lender for first-time homebuyers, and we have provided 
over  $5  billion  of  financing  for  first-time  homebuyers  across  the 
country.  This  participation  in  the  subprime  market  has  given  us  a 
front-row  seat  for  the  mess  that  we  now  face  in  the  current  crisis. 
I’ll focus my testimony on two key points. First, what is the sta-
tus  of  the  crisis  in  the  mortgage  market?  And,  second,  how  could 
the  FTC  be  more  effective  in  reducing  or  preventing  this  problem? 
We  are  now  painfully  aware  of  the  subprime  mortgage  market, 
which is, I think, bad news for a lot of people, because of the large 
number  of  families  losing  their  homes,  and,  equally,  the  ripple  ef-
fects  throughout  the  whole  mortgage  market  and  the  whole  econ-
omy. When you look at the features of the mortgages that families 
were  sold,  it’s  no  surprise  that  we  have  a  major  problem.  The  typ-
ical  subprime  mortgage  that  families  have  today  has  a  payment 
that,  after  2  years,  increases  by  35  to  50  percent,  even  if  market 
interest  rates  do  not  increase  at  all.  Few  families  can  absorb  that 
kind  of  payment  shock.  To  compound  matters,  lenders  sold  these 
loans to families based only on their ability to make the initial pay-
ments, and those payments could be more than 50 percent of their 
borrower’s gross income, before taxes. When the payment increases 
take  effect,  we  often  see  monthly  mortgage  payments  that  are 
equal  to  80  percent  or  more  of  a  family’s  take-home  income.  To 
make  matters  even  worse,  over  half  of  these  loans  were  provided 
without documentation of the family’s income, and lenders and bro-
kers  typically,  in  over  three-fourths  of  these  loans,  did  not  include 
any  escrow  for  taxes  or  insurance,  in  order  to  make  the  monthly 
payments  look  lower,  but  creating,  again,  further  financial  shock. 
To  be  clear,  these  were  junk  loans,  not  loans  made  to  junk  bor-
rowers.  And  that’s  shown  by  the  fact  that,  even  in  the  subprime 
market,  borrowers  and  families  who  received  fixed-rate  subprime 
mortgages  have  been  able  to  keep  up  their  payments  on  those 
loans.  In  contrast,  these  exploding  ARM  loans  could  continue  only 
as long as home values increased by double digits each year so that 
the  families  could  refinance  the  loans  and  pay  them,  in  effect,  out 
of their home equity. 

This reckless lending is taking a heavy toll on American families, 
costing  more  than  2  million  families  their  homes.  And  since  most 
subprime  loans  are  refinancings  of  existing  homes,  only  about  10 
percent  of  these  loans  were  loans  to  first-time  homebuyers.  That’s 
a common misconception. 

This  crisis  is  driving  families  out  of  homeownership  and  out  of 
the middle class. It is particularly devastating in communities—for 
example,  half  of  all  African-American  and  Latino  loans  are 
subprime loans. And these impending foreclosures are the greatest 
threat  to  their  family  wealth  in  a  generation.  And  all  observers  of 
the market agree, the worst is yet to come. 

This  market  has  not  been  able  to  correct  itself,  as  the  lack  of 
substantive standards has rewarded the least responsible practices. 
Families,  but  also  lenders  and  investors,  have  been  hurt  by  this 
lack of market integrity. Federal and State regulators have moved, 
recently,  to  enact  some  modest  protections,  such  as  the  common 
sense  idea  that  they  should  check  to  see  if  families  can  repay  the 
loans after the initial low payments expire. The FTC has taken ac-
tion to protect consumers in some ways. Much more action is need-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

51 

ed  by  the  FTC,  and  more  authority  and  resources  are  needed  for 
the FTC. 

The  announcements  and  consumer  information  brochures  are 
helpful,  but  more  is  needed  to  protect  families  in  their  largest  fi-
nancial  transactions.  The  FTC  needs  to  establish  substantive 
standards,  as  it  has  done  with  other  credit  practices  and  in  other 
fields,  previously.  Mere  case-by-case  enforcement  means  that  most 
cases are never addressed when you have an agency of very limited 
resources. 

More tools for the agency are also needed, including joint author-
ity  for  the  FTC  and  Federal  depository  regulators,  standard  rule-
making procedures are needed so the FTC can act in a timely fash-
ion. And a private right of action is needed so that violations of the 
FTC  Act  are  enforceable  by  consumers.  Perhaps  most  importantly, 
there have been suggestions to preempt existing authority that the 
states have in the mortgage area, and that would make things only 
far worse. We need as many cops on this beat as possible. 

In  conclusion,  most  families  rely  on  their  homes  not  only  for  the 
physical  and  emotional  shelter,  but  it’s  a  repository  of  most  of  a 
families’  hard-earned  wealth.  Over  the  past  few  years,  we’ve  seen 
unscrupulous  mortgage  brokers  and  lenders  seize  that  wealth  for 
their own gain, at great cost to our communities, families, and the 
Nation as a whole. The FTC, the Fed, and Congress need to act to 
help  provide  families  with  the  means  to  safeguard  their  homes  in 
what now are perilous transactions when they take out a mortgage. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Calhoun follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF MICHAEL D. CALHOUN, PRESIDENT, 

CENTER FOR RESPONSIBLE LENDING 

Chairman Dorgan, Ranking Member DeMint, and Members of the Subcommittee, 
thank  you  for  holding  this  hearing  and  considering  this  reauthorization  in  the  con-
text  of  the  current  turmoil  in  the  subprime  mortgage  market.  I  serve  as  the  Presi-
dent  of  the  Center  for  Responsible  Lending  (CRL)  (www.responsiblelending.org). 
CRL  is  a  not-for-profit,  non-partisan  research  and  policy  organization  dedicated  to 
protecting homeownership and family wealth by working to eliminate abusive finan-
cial practices. 

We  also  have  direct  experience  as  a  subprime  lender.  CRL  is  an  affiliate  of  the 
Center  for  Community  Self  Help  (www.self-help.org),  which  consists  of  a  credit 
union  and  a  non-profit  loan  fund.  For  the  past  26  years,  Self-Help  has  focused  on 
creating  ownership  opportunities  for  low-wealth  families,  primarily  through  financ-
ing  home  loans  to  low-income  and  minority  families,  those  often  targeted  for 
subprime  loans.  Self-Help  has  provided  over  $5  billion  of  financing  to  55,000  low- 
wealth families, small businesses and nonprofit organizations in North Carolina and 
across the country. Our loan losses have been less than 1 percent per year. 

Through this lending experience, I understand the benefits of subprime loans that 
contribute  to  sustainable  homeownership.  Unfortunately,  when  it  comes  to  fair,  af-
fordable mortgages and opportunities for lasting homeownership, the subprime mar-
ket’s record is sorely lacking. The Center for Responsible Lending estimates that 2.2 
million  families  have  lost  or  will  lose  their  homes  as  a  result  of  abusive  subprime 
loans  made  in  recent  years.  That  is  one  in  every  five  subprime  loans  made  in  2005 
and  2006,  a  rate  unseen  in  the  modern  mortgage  market.  When  we  consider  the 
subsequent  loans  subprime  borrowers  have  been  refinanced  into,  the  probable  fore-
closure rate jumps to over one-third of all subprime borrowers. 

My main messages to you today are these: 

1. Problems caused by the subprime market are severe and widespread. 
2.  Abusive  loans  led  to  today’s  devastating  foreclosures,  and  we  need  to  keep 
reckless lenders off the streets. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

52 

3. The FTC could play a vital role in restoring integrity to the subprime market 
and reducing abusive home loans. 

I. The Current Situation: An Epidemic of Foreclosures 

Last  December,  the  Center  for  Responsible  Lending  published  a  report  that  rep-
resents  the  first  comprehensive,  nationwide  research  projecting  foreclosures  in  the 
subprime market. The report, ‘‘Losing Ground: Foreclosures in the Subprime Market 
and  Their  Cost  to  Homeowners,’’  is  based  on  an  analysis  of  over  six  million 
subprime mortgages, and the findings are disturbing. Our results show that despite 
low interest rates and high housing appreciation during the past several years, the 
subprime  market  has  experienced  high  foreclosure  rates  comparable  to  the  worst 
foreclosure  experience  ever  in  the  modern  prime  market.  We  also  show  that  fore-
closure  rates  will  increase  significantly  in  many  markets  as  housing  appreciation 
slows or reverses. As a result, we project that 2.2 million borrowers will lose or have 
lost their homes and up to $164 billion of wealth in the process. That translates into 
foreclosures on one in five subprime loans (19.4 percent) originated in recent years.1 
Since  we  issued  that  report,  the  condition  of  the  subprime  market  has  deterio-
rated rapidly, and subsequent events have shown our projection to be conservative. 
A  recent  study  by  the  investment  bank,  Lehman  Brothers,  shows  that  the  number 
of  2006-originated  loans  likely  to  face  foreclosure  is  30  percent.2 Headlines  appear 
daily  in  the  news  detailing  the  negative  ripple  effects  of  bad  subprime  loans  that 
have  extended  to  investors  and  financial  interests  in  many  places  throughout  the 
world. 

At the same time, many in the lending industry still fail to acknowledge the scope 
of  the  problem,  the  damage  caused  by  reckless  lending  practices,  and  the  need  for 
more  than  cursory  solutions.  As  recently  as  last  month,  the  Mortgage  Bankers’  As-
sociation denied that subprime foreclosure rates are of concern for the economy.3 

Yet,  the  Mortgage  Bankers’  own  figures  show  that  the  problem  is  severe  and 
widespread.  Last  week,  the  MBA  released  the  ‘‘Second  Quarter  National  Delin-
quency Survey,’’ the latest figures available on the performance of home loans. The 
survey  shows  that  mortgage  loans  entering  foreclosure  have  increased  in  47  states 
since  this  time  last  year.  On  average,  the  increases  were  50  percent  higher.  Only 
four  states—North  Dakota,  South  Dakota,  Utah  and  Wyoming—did  not  experience 
increases in new foreclosures. Less than 2 percent of the American population lives 
in those states. 

While the rate of subprime foreclosures is alarming today, the worst is still ahead. 
With 1.7 million foreclosures predicted to occur in the next two to 3 years, it is im-
perative  that  Congress  take  action  to  assist  homeowners  struggling  today,  not  just 
protect future subprime borrowers.4 

Several  factors  have  driven  massive  home  losses,  including  dangerous  products, 
loose  underwriting,  broker  abuses,  investor  demands,  and  Federal  neglect.  In  the 
context of today’s hearing, I will focus on reckless lending, dangerous loans, and the 
need to strengthen protections on the Federal level. 

II. The Role of Reckless Lending 

Under typical circumstances, foreclosures occur because a family experiences a job 
loss,  divorce,  illness  or  death.  However,  the  epidemic  of  home  losses  in  today’s 
subprime market is well beyond the norm. Subprime lenders have virtually guaran-
teed  rampant  foreclosures  by  approving  risky  loans  for  families  while  knowing  that 
these  families  will  not  be  able  to  pay  the  loans  back.  Subprime  lenders  flooded  the 
market  with  high-risk  loans  and  made  them  appealing  to  borrowers  by  marketing 
low monthly payments based on low introductory teaser rates. 

One  of  the  key  findings  in  our  research  on  subprime  mortgages  is  that  subprime 
mortgages  typically  include  characteristics  that  significantly  increase  the  risk  of 
foreclosure,  regardless  of  the  borrower’s  credit.5 Since  foreclosures  typically  peak 
several years after a family receives a loan, we focused on the performance of loans 
made  in  the  early  2000s  to  determine  what,  if  any,  loan  characteristics  have  a 
strong association with foreclosures. Our findings are consistent with other studies: 
increases  in  mortgage  payments  and  poorly  documented  income  substantially  boost 
the  risk  of  foreclosure.  For  example,  even  after  controlling  for  differences  in  credit 
scores, these were our findings for subprime loans made in 2000: 

rate mortgages. 

• Adjustable-rate mortgages had 72 percent greater risk of foreclosure than fixed- 
• Mortgages with ‘‘balloon’’ payments had a 36 percent greater risk than a fixed- 
• Prepayment penalties are associated with a 52 percent greater risk. 

rate mortgage without that feature. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

53 

• Loans  with  no  documentation  or  limited  documentation  of  the  applicant’s  in-

come were associated with a 29 percent greater risk. 

Lenders  and  mortgage  insurers  have  known  for  decades  that  these  features  in-
crease  the  risk  of  foreclosure,  yet  these  characteristics—adjustable-rate  loans  with 
prepayment  penalties,  made  with  little  documentation—describe  typical  subprime 
mortgage loans made in recent years. 

A  significant  culprit  in  today’s  foreclosure  was  the  proliferation  of  hybrid  adjust-
able-rate mortgages (‘‘ARMs,’’ called 2/28s or 3/27s), which begin with a fixed inter-
est rate for a short period, then convert to a much higher interest rate and continue 
to adjust every 6 months, quickly jumping to an unaffordable level. Commonly, this 
interest rate increases by between 1.5 and 3 percentage points at the end of the sec-
ond year, and such increases are scheduled to occur even if interest rates in the gen-
eral  economy  remain  constant.6 This  type  of  loan,  as  well  as  other  similar  hybrid 
ARMs (such as 3/27s) have rightfully earned the name ‘‘exploding’’ ARMs. 
A. Loose Qualifying Standards and Business Practices 

The  negative  impact  of  high-risk  loans  could  have  been  greatly  reduced  if 
subprime lenders had been carefully screening loan applicants to assess whether the 
proposed  mortgages  are  affordable.  Unfortunately,  many  subprime  lenders—as  well 
as lenders writing ‘‘non-traditional’’ mortgages such as ‘‘payment option ARMs’’ and 
interest-only  loans—have  been  routinely  abdicating  the  responsibility  of  under-
writing loans in any meaningful way. 

Lenders  today  have  a  more  precise  ability  than  ever  before  to  assess  the  risk  of 
default on a loan. Lenders and mortgage insurers have long known that some home 
loans  carry  an  inherently  greater  risk  of  foreclosure  than  others.  However,  by  the 
industry’s own admission, underwriting standards in the subprime market have be-
come extremely loose in recent years, and analysts have cited this laxness as a key 
driver in foreclosures.7 Let me describe some of the most common problems: 

Not  considering  payment  shock:  Lenders  who  market  2/28s  and  other  types  of 
high-risk  mortgages  often  do  not  consider  whether  the  homeowner  will  be  able  to 
pay  when  the  loan’s  interest  rate  resets,  setting  the  borrower  up  for  failure. 
Subprime  lenders’  public  disclosures  indicate  that  most  are  qualifying  borrowers  at 
or  near  the  initial  start  rate,  even  when  it  is  clear  from  the  terms  of  the  loan  that 
the  interest  rate  can  (and  in  all  likelihood,  will)  rise  significantly,  giving  the  bor-
rower  a  higher  monthly  payment.  For  example,  as  shown  in  the  chart  below,  pub-
licly available information indicates that these national subprime lenders, who were 
prominent  in  recent  years,  do  not  adequately  consider  payment  shock  when  under-
writing ARMs: 

Sample Underwriting Rules For Adjustable Rate Mortgages 8 

Lender 

Underwriting Rule 

OPTION ONE MORTGAGE CORP 
FREMONT INVESTMENT & LOAN  Ability  to  repay  based  on  initial  payments  due  in  the 

Qualified at initial monthly payment. 

NEW CENTURY 

year of origination. 

Generally  qualified  at  initial  interest  rate.  Loans  to 
borrowers  with  FICO  scores  under  580  and  loan-to- 
value ratios of more than 80 percent are qualified at 
fully indexed rate minus 100 basis points. 

These  underwriting  rules  indicate  that  lenders  routinely  qualified  borrowers  for 
loans based on a low interest rate when the cost of the loan is bound to rise signifi-
cantly—even  if  interest  rates  remain  constant.  In  fact,  until  very  recently,  it  was 
not  uncommon  for  2/28  mortgages  to  be  originated  with  an  interest  rate  4  percent-
age  points  under  the  fully-indexed  rate.  For  a  loan  with  an  8  percent  start  rate,  a 
4  percentage  point  increase  is  tantamount  to  a  40  percent  increase  in  the  monthly 
principal and interest payment amount. 

Failure  to  escrow:  The  failure  to  consider  payment  shock  when  underwriting  is 
compounded by the failure to escrow property taxes and hazard insurance.9 In stark 
contrast  to  the  prime  mortgage  market,  most  subprime  lenders  make  loans  based 
on low monthly payments that do not escrow for taxes or insurance.10 This deceptive 
practice  gives  the  borrower  the  impression  that  the  payment  is  affordable  when,  in 
fact,  there  are  significant  additional  costs.  Given  that  the  typical  practice  in  the 
subprime  industry  is  to  accept  a  loan  if  the  borrower’s  debt  is  at  or  below  50  to  55 
percent of their pre-tax income, using an artificially low monthly payment based on 
a teaser rate and no escrow for taxes and insurance virtually guarantees that a bor-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

54 

rower  will  not  have  the  residual  income  to  absorb  a  significant  increase  whenever 
taxes or insurance come due during the first year or two, or certainly not when pay-
ments jump up after year two. 

A study by the Home Ownership Preservation Initiative in Chicago found that for 
as  many  as  one  in  seven  low-income  borrowers  facing  difficulty  in  managing  their 
mortgage  payments,  the  lack  of  escrow  of  tax  and  insurance  payments  were  a  con-
tributing  factor.11 When  homeowners  are  faced  with  large  tax  and  insurance  bills 
they  cannot  pay,  the  original  lender  or  a  subprime  competitor  can  benefit  by  entic-
ing  the  borrowers  to  refinance  the  loan  and  pay  additional  fees  for  their  new  loan. 
In  contrast,  it  is  common  practice  in  the  prime  market  to  escrow  taxes  and  insur-
ance and to consider those costs when looking at debt-to-income and the borrower’s 
ability to repay.12 

Low/no  documentation:  Inadequate  documentation  also  compromises  a  lender’s 
ability to assess the true affordability of a loan. Fitch recently noted that ‘‘loans un-
derwritten using less than full documentation standards comprise more than 50 per-
cent  of  the  subprime  sector.  . . .’’ 13 ‘‘Low  doc’’  and  ‘‘no  doc’’  loans  originally  were 
intended  for  use  with  the  limited  category  of  borrowers  who  are  self-employed  or 
whose incomes are otherwise legitimately not reported on a W–2 tax form, but lend-
ers  have  increasingly  used  these  loans  to  obscure  violations  of  sound  underwriting 
practices. For example, a review of a sample of these ‘‘stated-income’’ loans disclosed 
that  90  percent  had  inflated  incomes  compared  to  IRS  documents,  and  ‘‘more  dis-
turbingly,  almost  60  percent  of  the  stated  amounts  were  exaggerated  by  more  than 
50  percent.’’ 14 It  seems  unlikely  that  all  of  these  borrowers  could  not  document 
their income, since most certainly receive W–2 tax forms, or that they would volun-
tarily  choose  to  pay  up  to  1.5  percent  higher  interest  rate  to  get  the  ‘‘benefit’’  of  a 
stated-income loan.15 

Multiple  risks  in  one  loan:  In  addition,  regulators  have  expressed  concern  about 
combining  multiple  risk  elements  in  one  loan,  stating  that  ‘‘risk-layering  features 
in  loans  to  subprime  borrowers  may  significantly  increase  risks  for  both  the  . . . 
[lender]  and  the  borrower.’’ 16 Previously  I  described  a  brief  overview  of  the  in-
creased risk associated with several subprime loan characteristics, including adjust-
able-rate  mortgages,  prepayment  penalties,  and  limited  documentation  of  income. 
Each  of  these  items  individually  is  associated  with  a  significant  increase  in  fore-
closure  risk,  and  each  has  been  characteristic  of  subprime  loans  in  recent  years; 
combining them makes the risk of foreclosure even worse. 
B. Broker Abuses and Perverse Incentives 

Mortgage brokers are individuals or firms who find customers for lenders and as-
sist  with  the  loan  process.  Brokers  provide  a  way  for  mortgage  lenders  to  increase 
their business without incurring the expense involved with employing sales staff di-
rectly.  Brokers  also  play  a  key  role  in  today’s  mortgage  market:  According  to  the 
Mortgage  Bankers  Association,  mortgage  brokers  now  originate  45  percent  of  all 
mortgages, and 71 percent of subprime loans.17 

Brokers  often  determine  whether  subprime  borrowers  receive  a  fair  and  helpful 
loan,  or  whether  they  end  up  with  a  product  that  is  unsuitable  and  unaffordable. 
Unfortunately,  given  the  way  the  current  market  operates,  widespread  abuses  by 
mortgage brokers are inevitable. 

First, unlike other similar professions, mortgage brokers have no fiduciary respon-
sibility  to  the  borrower  who  employs  them.  Professionals  with  fiduciary  responsi-
bility  are  obligated  to  act  in  the  interests  of  their  customers.  Many  other  profes-
sionals  already  have  affirmative  obligations  to  their  clients,  including  real  estate 
agents,  securities  brokers  and  attorneys.  Buying  or  refinancing  a  home  is  the  big-
gest  investment  that  most  families  ever  make,  and  particularly  in  the  subprime 
market,  this  transaction  is  often  decisive  in  determining  a  family’s  future  financial 
security. The broker has specialized market knowledge that the borrower lacks and 
relies  on.  Yet  most  mortgage  brokers  deny  that  they  have  any  legal  responsibility 
to  refrain  from  selling  inappropriate,  unaffordable  loans,  or  to  put  their  own  finan-
cial interest ahead of their clients’.18 

Second, the market, as it is structured today, gives brokers strong financial incen-
tives  to  ignore  the  best  interests  of  homeowners.  Brokers  and  lenders  are  focused 
on  feeding  investor  demand,  regardless  of  how  particular  products  affect  individual 
homeowners.  Moreover,  because  of  the  way  they  are  compensated,  brokers  have 
strong  incentives  to  sell  excessively  expensive  loans.  They  earn  money  through  up- 
front fees, not ongoing loan payments. To make matters worse for homeowners, bro-
kers  typically  have  a  direct  incentive  to  hike  interest  rates  higher  than  warranted 
by  the  risk  of  loans.  In  the  majority  of  subprime  and  similar  transactions,  brokers 
demand a kickback from lenders (known as ‘‘yield spread premiums’’) if they deliver 
mortgages  with  rates  higher  than  the  lender  would  otherwise  accept.  Not  all  loans 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

55 

with yield-spread premiums are abusive, but because they have become so common, 
and  because  they  are  easy  to  hide  or  downplay  in  loan  transactions,  unscrupulous 
brokers can make excessive profits without adding any real value. 

Experts on mortgage financing have long raised concerns about problems inherent 
in  a  market  dominated  by  broker  originations.  For  example,  the  chairman  of  the 
Federal  Reserve  Board,  Ben  S.  Bernanke,  recently  noted  that  placing  significant 
pricing  discretion  in  the  hands  of  financially  motivated  mortgage  brokers  in  the 
sales of mortgage products can be a prescription for trouble, as it can lead to behav-
ior not in compliance with fair lending laws.19 Similarly, a report issued by Harvard 
University’s Joint Center for Housing Studies, stated, ‘‘Having no long term interest 
in the performance of the loan, a broker’s incentive is to close the loan while charg-
ing  the  highest  combination  of  fees  and  mortgage  interest  rates  the  market  will 
bear.’’ 20 

In  summary:  Mortgage  brokers,  who  are  responsible  for  originating  over  70  per-
cent of loans in the subprime market, have strong incentives to make abusive loans 
that  harm  consumers,  and  no  one  is  stopping  them.  In  recent  years,  brokers  have 
flooded  the  subprime  market  with  unaffordable  mortgages,  and  they  have  priced 
these  mortgages  at  their  own  discretion.  Given  the  way  brokers  operate  today,  the 
odds of successful homeownership are stacked against families who get loans in the 
subprime market. 
C. Abusive Loan Terms: Prepayment Penalties and Yield-Spread Premiums 
Prepayment  penalties—an  ‘‘exit  tax’’  for  refinancing  or  otherwise  paying  off  a 
loan—are  a  destructive  feature  of  the  subprime  market  that  lock  borrowers  in  to 
high-cost  loans,  and  make  it  difficult  for  responsible  lenders  to  refinance  them  into 
lower-cost  loans.  Today  prepayment  penalties  are  imposed  on  about  70  percent  of 
all  subprime  loans,21 compared  to  about  2  percent  of  prime  loans.22 This  disparity 
belies any notion that subprime borrowers freely ‘‘choose’’ prepayment penalties. All 
things being equal, a borrower in a higher-cost loan, or in an unpredictable, adjust-
able  rate  loan  with  a  very  high  margin,  would  not  choose  to  be  inextricably  tied  to 
that product by a high exit tax.23 With common formulations of 6 months’ interest, 
or  amounts  of  approximately  3  percent  of  the  principal,  the  amount  of  equity  lost 
is significant. For a $200,000 loan, a 3 percent prepayment penalty costs borrowers 
$6,000,  eating  almost  entirely  the  median  net  worth  for  African  American  house-
holds.24 

It  has  long  been  recognized  that  prepayment  penalties  trap  borrowers  in  disad-
vantageous,  higher  cost  loans.  Indeed,  this  is  the  penalty’s  purpose—in  industry 
parlance, to ‘‘build a fence around the borrower’’ or ‘‘close the back door.’’ Less well 
known  is  the  fact  that  these  penalties  also  increase  the  cost  of  the  loan  at  origina-
tion  because  they  are  linked  to  higher  rates  on  loans  that  pay  higher  so-called 
‘‘yield-spread premiums’’ to brokers.25 Thus, contrary to the claims of some lenders, 
prepayment  penalties  do  not  decrease,  but,  rather,  frequently  increase  the  cost  of 
subprime loans. 

Yield-spread premiums are a bonus paid by the lender to the mortgage broker as 
a reward for placing the borrower into a higher cost loan than the borrower qualifies 
for. Lenders are willing to pay the premium only where they are sure that the bor-
rower will remain in the higher-cost loan long enough to enable the lender to recoup 
the cost of the premium from the borrower. 

It is important to note that the lender does not allow the broker to get any yield- 
spread  premium  if  the  loan  has  no  prepayment  penalty,  a  result  that  is  common 
in the subprime sector. Yield-spread premiums and prepayment penalties are inter-
twined  in  a  way  that  is  harmful  to  consumers  and  detrimental  to  competition.  For 
a  fuller  discussion  of  these  issues,  please  refer  to  our  recent  comment  letter  to  the 
Federal Reserve Board, submitted on August 15.26 
D. Racial Steering 

Eliminating  the  practice  of  steering  borrowers  to  pricier  and  riskier  loans  is  also 
critical to assuring a fair marketplace that does not impose a discrimination tax on 
borrowers of color. We know that for borrowers of color, the odds of receiving a high-
er-cost  loan  are  greater,  even  after  controlling  for  legitimate  risk  factors,  such  as 
credit  scores.27 We  are  long  past  the  time  when  we  can—or  should—close  our  eyes 
to this. Tax cuts are popular in Washington. Ending the discrimination tax on mort-
gage  lending  is  a  tax  cut  that  is  long  overdue,  and  prohibiting  steering  is  the  way 
to do it. 

It serves the interest not only of homeowners, but of the world economy, to assure 
that  all  families  seeking  loans  who  qualify  for  lower-cost  prime  mortgages  should 
receive a prime mortgage, not a subprime loan. We know that far more people have 
been placed in high-cost loans than should have been.28 Since it is now abundantly 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

56 

clear that ‘‘risky loans,’’ as much or more than ‘‘risky borrowers,’’ are a threat, mar-
ket professionals—loan originators, whether brokers or retail lenders—should be re-
quired to assure that borrowers are put into the rate they qualify for. Market incen-
tives  that  encourage  originators  to  put  as  many  people  as  possible  into  the  priciest 
(and most dangerous) loans possible helped make this problem; prohibiting those in-
centives is a necessary part of the solution. 

The  subprime  market  has  long  cited  ‘‘riskier  borrowers’’  or  ‘‘credit-impaired  bor-
rowers’’ as its justification for the higher prices on these loans. The argument is that 
investors need the higher prices to justify their risk, yet that extra price burden for 
the subprime loan puts credit-strapped borrowers that much closer to the edge. 

III. Federal Neglect and the Potential Role of the FTC 

Policymakers  have  long  recognized  that  Federal  law—the  Home  Ownership  and 
Equity Protection Act of 1994 (HOEPA)—governing predatory lending is inadequate 
and  outdated.  Although  the  Federal  Reserve  Board  (hereinafter,  the  ‘‘Board’’)  has 
the  authority  to  step  in  and  strengthen  relevant  rules,  they  have  thus  far  refused 
to act in spite of years of large-scale abuses in the market, though they will report-
edly propose some regulations this year. Other Federal regulators with relevant au-
thority, such as the Office of the Comptroller of Currency, have done very little en-
forcement,  and  they  have  been  slow  to  enact  rules.  The  result:  For  the  majority  of 
subprime  mortgage  providers,  there  are  no  consequences  for  making  abusive  or 
reckless home loans. 

On  July  25  this  year,  we  joined  the  Consumer  Federation  of  America  and  other 
concerned  groups  in  presenting  testimony  before  the  U.S.  House  Committee  on  Fi-
nancial Services.29 In part of that testimony, we discuss the important role the Fed-
eral  Trade  Commission  could  play  in  eliminating  abusive  lending  practices  in  the 
home loan market. The FTC brings two particular strengths: 

First,  the  FTC  is  the  agency  with  long  experience  in  interpreting  and  enforcing 
the  law  against  unfair  and  deceptive  acts  and  practices  (UDAP)  in  commerce,  hav-
ing  been  in  that  business  for  well  over  half  a  century.  This  experience  contrasts 
sharply  with  that  of  the  banking  regulatory  agencies,  who  only  recently  even  gave 
thought  to  utilizing  such  authority.30 In  addition  to  longer  experience  with  UDAP 
concepts,  the  FTC  is  also  the  agency  whose  chief  job  is  to  protect  consumers  from 
unfair  and  deceptive  acts  in  commerce,  and  to  protect  the  integrity  of  the  market-
place  for  honest  and  ethical  competition.  Though  the  agency,  like  several  others, 
could have done more to prevent the current subprime debacle, it makes little sense 
to prevent the agency with the most experience.31 

Second, the FTC is also the agency with the fewest conflicts of interest since, un-
like  the  bank  regulatory  agencies,  there  is  no  structural  conflict  of  interest—it  is 
not  dependent  upon  assessments  for  its  funding,  does  not  need  to  compete  with 
other  regulators  for  entities  to  regulate,  and  its  primary  role  is  to  protect  con-
sumers, not bank profitability. 

With these strengths in mind, we offer two recommendations: 

1. Enhance the power of section 5 of the FTC Act by expanding the rule-making and 

enforcement authority of the agency. 

Section 5 of the Federal Trade Commission Act prohibits unfair and deceptive acts 
and  practices  in  trade  and  commerce.  Expanding  the  regulatory  and  enforcement 
authority of the Federal Trade Commission related to mortgage lending—and many 
other aspects of consumer financial services—would enhance the capacity for appro-
priate  Federal  regulatory  response,  as  the  Consumer  Federation  of  America,  we  at 
CRL, and others recommended in earlier Congressional testimony.32 The FTC is the 
agency charged with primary interpretive and enforcement authority under Section 
5,  but  the  Act  places  that  authority  as  to  federally  chartered  depositories  institu-
tions  with  the  Federal  financial  regulators.33 Though  the  FRB,  NCUA  and  OTS 
have  rule-making  authority  under  the  FTC  Act,  and  others  have  enforcement  au-
thority as well, removing limits on the FTC’s capacity to act makes sense. 

While  more  could  have  been  done  with  their  rule-making  authority,  the  FTC  has 
promulgated  two  rules  that  have  been  effective  in  curbing  abuses  in  the  consumer 
finance  area.  The  first,  the  ‘‘anti-holder  rule,’’  abrogates  the  holder  in  due  course 
rule  for  credit  sales  where  the  seller  refers  the  borrower  to  the  lender  or  arranges 
or assigns the sales financing.34 (A ‘‘holder in due course’’ is any subsequent owner 
of  a  check,  note  or  other  financial  instrument  of  value.)  That  rule  is  based  on  the 
principle  that,  after  the  interest  in  a  debt  obligation  is  transferred,  it  is  fundamen-
tally  unfair  to  separate  the  borrower’s  obligation  to  pay  for  a  good  or  service  if  the 
provider of that good or service failed in its legal and contractual obligations to the 
borrower. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

57 

The  anti-holder  rule  provides  an  important  object  lesson  for  the  current  fore-
closure  crisis.  It  recognized  that  when  the  ultimate  owner  of  the  obligation  sought 
payment  from  the  consumer,  the  consumer’s  ‘‘right’’  to  seek  redress  against  the 
originator  while  still  obligated  to  pay  the  current  holder  was  largely  theoretical.  It 
further  recognized  that  those  who  were  in  the  business  of  buying  up  credit  obliga-
tions were in a far better position to police the marketplace of originators than con-
sumers. That model demonstrates that accountability up the chain is workable, and 
the FTC should be commended for recognizing that. 

Another  FTC  rule  that  brought  significant  reform  to  the  market  is  the  Credit 
Practices  Rule,  which  eliminated  abusive  contractual  remedies  that  were  standard 
practices  in  the  finance  company  industry.35 This  rule  was  aimed  at  contracts  that 
provided  powerful  remedies  to  finance  companies  in  non-negotiated  contracts  that 
denied due process and other legal rights to borrowers. Though vociferously opposed 
by the industry, the FTC recognized that industry wide practices can be—and some-
times  are—inherently  unfair  or  deceptive,  and  should  be  simply  banned.  Their  au-
thority  to  do  so  has  been  upheld  by  the  courts,36 and  the  practical  sense  of  doing 
so without doing harm to the marketplace has been upheld by history. 

Finally,  states  should  be  permitted  parallel  enforcement  authority  under  Section 
5  or  their  state  analogues.  It  adds  considerably  to  the  available  resources—more 
‘‘cops  on  the  beat’’—and,  like  the  FTC,  they  have  experience,  and  are  less  subject 
to conflicts. 
2. Create a private right of action under Section 5 of the FTC Act. 

Currently, harmed consumers have no right to enforce the Federal FTC Act: only 
public  enforcement  is  possible.  Even  absent  the  intrinsic  conflicts  of  interest,  en-
forcement agencies such as the FTC have limited resources. When problems become 
the  rule  in  an  industry,  rather  than  the  exception,  as  is  the  case  recently,  public 
resources  will  simply  never  be  adequate.  Regulatory  investigations  are  also  very 
time  consuming,  and  hold  no  remedy  for  homeowners  who  face  foreclosure  today. 
It  is  imperative  that  consumers  be  able  to  wield  their  own  tools  when  they  need 
them. 

Though consumers in many states can invoke their state unfair and deceptive acts 
and practices law, there are significant gaps, such as exclusions for ‘‘regulated enti-
ties.’’  Further,  with  the  overly  expansive  assertion  of  preemption  of  state  law  by 
Federal banking regulators, it is unclear whether we are about to see a constriction 
in the ability of consumers to use their state UDAP laws.37 

IV. Conclusion 

The  mortgage  industry  has  argued  for  years  that  regulation  of  subprime  lending 
would have the unintended consequence of restricting credit, but it is now apparent 
that the current tightening of credit has been caused by the lack of adequate regula-
tion  and  the  reckless  lending  that  followed.  If  subprime  lenders  had  been  subject 
to  reasonable  rules—the  kind  of  rules  that  responsible  mortgage  lenders  have  al-
ways followed—we wouldn’t have the problems we’re seeing today. 

Common-sense  protections  would  prevent  this  catastrophe  from  happening  again. 
We  need  a  combination  of  sensible  state  laws  backed  by  a  strong  Federal  floor.  In 
recent years, many states have taken action to curb specific predatory lending prac-
tices,  but  Federal  regulators  have  remained  largely  passive  until  recently,  and  still 
have  a  ways  to  go.  These  recommended  changes  to  the  FTC  Act  will  help  protect 
families  from  abusive  financial  practices  and  help  restrain  the  market  from  the  ex-
cesses of recent years in the future. 
Endnotes 

1 A  full  copy  of  the  ‘‘Losing  Ground’’  foreclosure  study  and  an  executive  summary  appear  on 
CRL’s  website  at  http://www.responsiblelending.org/issues/mortgage/reports/page.jsp?itemID= 
31217189. 

2 Mortgage Finance Industry Overview, Lehman Brothers Equity Research, p. 4 (December 22, 

3 Comment  letter  from  the  Mortgage  Bankers  Association  to  the  Board  of  Governors  of  the 

2006). 

Federal Reserve Board, p. 4, dated August 15, 2007. 

4 Moody’s Economy.com, ‘‘Into the Woods: Mortgage Credit Quality, Its Prospects, and Implica-
tions,’’  a  study  incorporating  unique  data  from  Equifax  and  Moody’s  Investors  Service  (2007). 

5 See note 1. 
6 Here  we  are  describing  the  2/28  because  it  is  by  far  the  most  common  product  in  the 
subprime  market,  but  the  concerns  are  the  same  with  the  3/27,  which  differs  only  in  that  the 
teaser rate remains in effect for 3 years. 

7 See  e.g.,  Office  of  the  Comptroller  of  the  Currency,  National  Credit  Committee,  Survey  of 
Credit  Underwriting  Practices  2005.  The  Office  of  The  Comptroller  of  Currency  (OCC)  survey 
of  credit  underwriting  practices  found  a  ‘‘clear  trend  toward  easing  of  underwriting  standards 
as banks stretch for volume and yield,’’ and the agency commented that ‘‘ambitious growth goals 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

58 

crow taxes and insurance. 

ings Credit Policy (August 21, 2006). 

13 See Structured Finance: U.S. Subprime RMBS in Structured Finance CDOs, p. 4 Fitch Rat-

in  a  highly  competitive  market  can  create  an  environment  that  fosters  imprudent  credit  deci-
sions.’’  In  fact,  28  percent  of  the  banks  eased  standards,  leading  the  2005  OCC  survey  to  be 
its first survey where examiners ‘‘reported net easing of retail underwriting standards.’’ See also 
Fitch Ratings, 2007 Global Structured Finance Outlook: Economic and Sector-by-Sector Analysis 
(December 11, 2006). 

8 See  Option  One  Prospectus,  Option  One  Mortgage  Loan  Trust  2006–3  424B5  (October  19, 
2006)  available  at:  http://www.sec.gov/Archives/edgar/data/1378102/000088237706003670/ 
d581063l424b5.htm;  Fremont  Investment  and  Loan  Prospectus,  Fremont  Home  Loan  Trust 
2006–1  424B5  (April  4,  2006)  available  at:  http://www.sec.gov/Archives/edgar/data/1357374/ 
000088237706001254/d486451lall.htm; Morgan Stanley Prospectus, Morgan Stanley ABS Cap-
ital  I  Inc.  Trust  2007–NC1  Free  Writing  Prospectus  (January  19,  2007)  available  at:  http:// 
www.sec.gov/Archives/edgar/data/1385136/000088237707000094/d609032lfwp.htm; 
Best 
Practices Won’t Kill Production at New Century, p. 3 Inside B&C Lending (November 24, 2006). 
9 See,  e.g.,  ‘‘B&C  Escrow  Rate  Called  Low,’’  Mortgage  Servicing  News  Bulletin  (February  23, 
2005) ‘‘Servicers of subprime mortgage loans face a perplexing conundrum: only about a quarter 
of  the  loans  include  escrow  accounts  to  ensure  payment  of  insurance  premiums  and  property 
taxes,  yet  subprime  borrowers  are  the  least  likely  to  save  money  to  make  such  payments  . . . 
Nigel  Brazier,  senior  vice  president  for  business  development  and  strategic  initiatives  at  Select 
Portfolio  Servicing,  said  only  about  25  percent  of  the  loans  in  his  company’s  subprime  portfolio 
have escrow accounts. He said that is typical for the subprime industry.’’ 

10 See,  e.g.,  ‘‘Attractive  Underwriting  Niches,’’  Chase  Home  Finance  Subprime  Lending  mar-
keting  flier,  at  http://www.chaseb2b.com/content/portal/pdf/subprimeflyers/SubprimelAUN 
.pdf (available 9/18/2006) stating ‘‘Taxes and Insurance Escrows are NOT required at any LTV, 
and there’s NO rate add!’’ (suggesting that failing to escrow taxes is an ‘‘underwriting highlight’’ 
that  is  beneficial  to  the  borrower).  ‘Low  balling’  payments  by  omitting  tax  and  insurance  costs 
were  also  alleged  in  states’  actions  against  Ameriquest.  See,  e.g.,  State  of  Iowa,  ex  rel  Miller  v. 
Ameriquest Mortgage Co. et al, Eq. No. EQCE–53090 Petition, at ¶ 16(B) (March 21, 2006). 

11 Partnership Lessons and Results: Three Year Final Report, p. 31 Home Ownership Preserva-
tion  Initiative,  (July  17,  2006)  at  www.nhschicago.org/downloads/82HOPI3YearReportlJul17- 
06.pdf. 

12 In fact, Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac, the major mortgage investors, require lenders to es-

14 Mortgage  Asset  Research  Institute,  Inc.,  Eighth  Periodic  Mortgage  Fraud  Case  Report  to 
Mortgage  Bankers  Association,  p.  12,  available  at  http://www.mari-inc.com/pdfs/mba/ 
MBA8thCaseRpt.pdf  (April  2006);  see  also  2007  Global  Structured  Finance  Outlook:  Economic 
and Sector-by Sector-analysis, Fitch Ratings Credit Policy (New York, N.Y), December 11, 2006, 
at  21,  commenting  that  the  use  of  subprime  hybrid  ARMS  ‘‘poses  a  significant  challenge  to 
subprime collateral performance in 2007.’’ 

15 Traditional  Rate  Sheet  effective  12/04/06  issued  by  New  Century  Mortgage  Corporation,  a 
major subprime lender, shows that a borrower with a 600 FICO score and 80 percent LTV loan 
would  pay  7.5  percent  for  a  fully-documented  loan,  and  9.0  percent  for  a  ‘‘stated  wage  earner’’ 
loan. 

16 See Interagency Guidance on Nontraditional Mortgage Product Risks, note 42. 
17 MBA Research Data Notes, ‘‘Residential Mortgage Origination Channels,’’ September 2006. 
18 About  one-third  of  the  states  have  established,  through  regulation  or  case  law,  a  broker’s 
fiduciary duty to represent borrowers’ best interests. However, many of these provisions are rid-
dled  with  loopholes  and  provide  scant  protection  for  borrowers  involved  in  transactions  with 
mortgage brokers. In other states, the question has not been specifically addressed. 

19 Remarks by Federal Reserve Board Chairman Ben S. Bernanke at the Opportunity Finance 

Network’s Annual Conference, Washington, D.C. (November 1, 2006). 

20 Joint  Center  for  Housing  Studies,  ‘‘Credit,  Capital  and  Communities:  The  Implications  of 
the  Changing  Mortgage  Banking  Industry  for  Community  Based  Organizations,’’  Harvard  Uni-
versity  at  4–5.  Moreover,  broker-originated  loans  ‘‘are  also  more  likely  to  default  than  loans 
originated  through  a  retail  channel,  even  after  controlling  for  credit  and  ability-to-pay  factors.’’ 
Id. at 42 (citing Alexander 2003). 

21 See, e.g., David W. Berson, Challenges and Emerging Risks in the Home Mortgage Business: 
Characteristics  of  Loans  Backing  Private  Label  Subprime  ABS,  Presentation  at  the  National 
Housing Forum, Office of Thrift Supervision (December 11, 2006). According to MBA data, there 
was  a  69.2  percent  penetration  rate  for  prepayment  penalties  on  subprime  ARMs  originated  in 
2006.  Doug  Duncan,  Sources  and  Implications  of  the  Subprime  Meltdown,  Manufactured  Hous-
ing Institute, (July 13, 2007). A recent CRL review of 2007 securitizations showed a penetration 
rate for prepayment penalties averaging over 70 percent. 

22 See  Berson,  id.  A  recent  MBA  analysis  shows  that  97.6  percent  of  prime  ARMs  originated 
in  2006  had  no  prepayment  penalty,  and  99  percent  of  2006  prime  FRM  had  no  penalty.  Doug 
Duncan, id. 

23 Marketing  jargon  in  the  industry  is  more  honest  about  the  role  of  prepayment  penalties, 
along  with  high-  LTV  loans:  ‘‘Build  a  fence  around  the  customer:’’  or  bring  them  in  and  ‘‘close 
the  back  door’’  are  phrases  that  surfaced  during  regulatory  investigations  of  subprime  lenders 
in which one of the authors of this Comment was involved. 

24 Indeed,  according  to  one  study,  it  would  exceed  the  median  net  worth  in  2002  for  African 
American households ($5,988). And it drains almost 7 percent of the median net worth for white 
households that year ($88,651). Rakesh Kochhar, The Wealth of Hispanic Household: 1996–2002 
p. 5, (Pew Center for Hispanic Studies), http://pewHispanic.org/files/reports/34.pdf. 

25 Christopher  A.  Richardson  and  Keith  S.  Ernst,  Borrowers  Gain  No  Interest  Rate  Benefits 
from  Prepayment  Penalties  on  Subprime  Mortgages,  Center  for  Responsible  Lending  (January 
2005). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

59 

26 Comment  letter  from  the  Center  for  Responsible  Lending  to  the  Board  of  Governors  of  the 

Federal Reserve Board (August 15, 2007). 

27 Debbie  Gruenstein  Bocian,  Keith  S.  Ernst  and  Wei  Li,  Unfair  Lending:  The  Effect  of  Race 
and  Ethnicity  on  the  Price  of  Subprime  Mortgages,  Center  for  Responsible  Lending  (May  31, 
2006).  Study  finds  that  African-American  and  Latino  borrowers  are  at  greater  risk  of  receiving 
higher-rate loans than white borrowers, even after controlling for legitimate risk factors. For ex-
ample,  African-American  borrowers  with  prepayment  penalties  on  their  subprime  home  loans 
were  6  to  34  percent  more  likely  to  receive  a  higher-rate  loan  than  if  they  had  been  white  bor-
rowers with similar qualifications. 

28 Mike  Hudson  and  E.  Scott  Reckard,  More  Homeowners  with  Good  Credit  Getting  Stuck  in 
Higher-Rate  Loans,  L.A.  Times,  p.  A–1  (October  24,  2005).  For  most  types  of  subprime  loans, 
African-Americans  and  Latino  borrowers  are  more  likely  to  be  given  a  higher-cost  loan  even 
after  controlling  for  legitimate  risk  factors.  Debbie  Gruenstein  Bocian,  Keith  S.  Ernst  and  Wei 
Li, Unfair Lending: The Effect of Race and Ethnicity on the Price of Subprime Mortgages, Center 
for  Responsible  Lending,  (May  31,  2006)  at  http://www.responsiblelending.org/issues/mort-
gage/reports/page.jsp?itemID=29371010;  See  also  Darryl  E.  Getter,  Consumer  Credit  Risk  and 
Pricing,  Journal  of  Consumer  Affairs  (June  22,  2006);  Howard  Lax,  Michael  Manti,  Paul  Raca, 
Peter Zorn, Subprime Lending: An Investigation of Economic Efficiency, 533, 562, 569, Housing 
Policy Debate 15(3) (2004). 

29 Testimony  of  Travis  Plunkett,  Improving  Federal  Consumer  Protections  in  Financial  Serv-

ices, Hearing Before the House Financial Services Committee, (July 25, 2007). 

30 The  FTC  has  had  UDAP  authority  to  protect  consumers  for  nearly  70  years.  Though  the 
bank  regulatory  agencies  were  granted  parallel  enforcement  authority  in  1975,  it  is  only  since 
2000  that  they  have  recognized  that.  Even  so,  they  have  been  parsimonious  in  utilizing  it  in 
the  context  of  mortgage  lending,  for  example,  the  OCC’s  action  against  a  small  bank,  Laredo 
National Bank, # 2005–142. In contrast, the FTC took enforcement action against a non-deposi-
tory subprime lender that was at the time among the top originators of subprime loans, the As-
sociates,  FTC  v.  Associates  First  Capital,  (http://www.ftc.gov/opa/2002/09/associates.shtm#) 
and  other  major  predatory  lenders,  such  as  First  Alliance  Mortgage  Company  (FAMCO)  and 
Delta  Funding,  in  cooperation  with  other  agencies.  Abusive  practices  in  servicing  is  another 
major  problem  in  the  mortgage  context,  and  the  FTC  brought  an  action  against  Fairbanks,  a 
major  subprime  servicer,  (The  FTC  has  a  list  of  predatory  lending  cases  on  its  website, 
http://www.ftc.gov/opa/2002/07/subprimelendingcases.shtm. 

31 It  has  been  suggested  that  Congress  may  need  to  make  clear  to  the  FTC  that  it  will  gain 
this  authority  only  if  it  commits  to  using  it  in  an  appropriate  fashion.  See  Test.  of  Travis 
Plunkett, note 30. 

32 See note 30. 
33 15  U.S.C.  Sec.  45,  12  U.S.C.  Sec.  57a(a),  57a(f).  See  also  Julie  L.  Williams  &  Michael  S. 
Bylsma, On the Same Page: Federal Banking Agency Enforcement of the FTC Act to Address Un-
fair and Deceptive Practices by Banks, 58 Bus. Law. 1243 (2003). 

34 16 C.F.R.433. 
35 16 C.F.R. 444. 
36 American Financial Serv. Ass’n v. Federal Trade Commission, 767 F.2d 957 (D.C. Cir. 1985). 
37 For example, given the OTS’ position that its rules ‘‘occupy the field,’’ what will be the im-
pact  if  it  promulgates  UDAP  rules,  as  it  has  recently  proposed?  (OTS  Adv.  Notice  of  Proposed 
Rule  Making  ,  Unfair  or  Deceptive  Acts  or  Practices,  Dkt.  ID  OTS–20007–0015  (http:// 
www.ots.treas.gov/docs/7/73373.pdf). 

Senator  DORGAN.  Mr.  Calhoun,  thank  you  very  much  for  your 

Next  we’ll  hear  from  Chris  Murray,  the  Senior  Counsel  of  Con-

testimony. 

sumers Union. 
Mr. Murray? 

STATEMENT OF CHRIS MURRAY, SENIOR COUNSEL, 

CONSUMERS UNION 

Mr.  MURRAY.  Thank  you,  Subcommittee  Chairman  Dorgan,  for 
the  opportunity  to  represent  Consumers  Union  this  morning,  the 
nonprofit publisher of Consumer Reports magazine. 

I want to touch on a few different areas focused in the media and 
telecom sectors, and note that the FTC does serve as a critical first 
line  of  defense  for  anticompetitive  practices,  as  well  as  unfair  and 
deceptive behavior. 

The  first  thing  we  would  strongly  urge  Congress  to  do  is  elimi-
nate the constraints of the common carrier exemption. This exemp-
tion  from  FTC  jurisdiction  was  created  for  a  bygone  era,  that—we 
no  longer  have  a  single  monopoly  provider  that’s  tightly  regulated 
by  the  Federal  Communications  Commission.  Unfortunately,  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

60 

Commission  has  been  steadily  walking  away  from  regulating  the 
full  bundle  of  communications,  and  Congress  needs  to  provide  the 
authority for the FTC to fill this critical void. 

We see carriers using aggressive bundling tactics. They’re adver-
tising  unlimited  services  that  are  sharply  limited,  and  promoting 
plans  that  are  not  reflective  of  actual  costs.  But  what  happens 
when a telephone company advertises a misleading promotion that 
bundles a service that’s, today, exempt, such as landline telephone 
service, with a service that is not, such as broadband Internet? We 
would  argue  that  the  agency  has  the  authority  to  deal  with  the 
problem,  but  that’s  not  clearly  settled.  Conversely,  we  see  areas 
where  the  FTC  already  has  clear  authority  and  needs  to  do  more 
to prosecute unfair and deceptive practices. I would note recent ex-
amples of cable companies who are terminating consumers because 
they’re using too much bandwidth. If a consumer buys a particular 
Internet plan, companies can cap them at that bandwidth, no more 
and no less than what they purchased. We’re not arguing that con-
sumers  should  get  unlimited  bandwidth,  just  that  they  should  get 
whatever  bandwidth  they’ve  been  sold.  A  spokesman  for  the  cable 
company that was terminating these subscribers wouldn’t even tell 
people  what  the  real  limit  of  their  plans  were.  If  that’s  not  unfair 
and  deceptive  practices,  I’m  not  sure  what  is.  I  don’t  understand 
how a company can advertise a particular high-speed capacity, and 
then refuse to tell subscribers what they bought. 

So,  I  would,  again,  argue  that  it’s  critical,  not  just  in  the  area 
of common carrier services, but, now that we see these full bundles, 
we  need  to  eliminate  the  common  carrier  exemption,  and  we  need 
to have an expectation that the FTC is going to deal with truth in 
broadband advertising across the full bundle. 

Turning to the digital TV transition, we need the FTC to help de-
fend against the digital up-sell. As the Committee is aware, in 2009 
consumers’  analog  television  sets  will  no  longer  work  for  over-the- 
air broadcast without a digital converter box. Consumer awareness 
of the transition is low, and it’s confusing even for those consumers 
who  are  aware  of  it.  What  equipment  will  they  need?  Will  cable 
and  satellite  subscribers  need  a  converter  box?  Will  they  need  a 
high-definition  television  set?  Will  they  need  a  digital  cable-ready 
television  set?  Or  will  an  analog  set  with  this  converter  box  that 
we’re going to see a coupon for, will that be sufficient? 

Alongside  this  confusion  are  the  inevitable  incentives  to  up-sell. 
You’ve  got  cable  companies  who  want  to  get  people  to  buy  their 
service.  You’ve  got  consumer  electronics  manufacturers  who  want 
to  get  people  to  buy  new  televisions.  The  incentives  are  various, 
and  the  combination  of  low  consumer  awareness,  technological 
complexity,  and  financial  incentives  to  up-sell  creates  a  situation 
ripe for deceptive practices. We would ask that the FTC pay special 
attention to advertising during this transition period, to make sure 
that consumers are given the whole truth. 

On  identity  theft  and  privacy,  I’ll  note  briefly  that  the  FTC  has 
conducted  numerous  workshops  to  explore  privacy  issues.  One  im-
portant workshop is planned this fall regarding online collection of 
consumer  behavioral  data  for  marketing  uses.  Consumers  are  pay-
ing  an  increasing  price  for  the  convenience  of  shopping  online,  as 
marketers, data-mining companies, are creating near-complete pro-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

61 

files of consumer behaviors, matched with public data on zip codes 
and  incomes.  We  commend  the  FTC  also  for  evaluating  the  impor-
tant  privacy  issues  raised  by  the  Google-Doubleclick  merger,  and 
the growing concern over behavioral tracking. 

Finally, I’ll remind the Committee that the National Do Not Call 
Registry  is  required  to  purge  its  numbers  every  5  years,  meaning 
that  everybody  who  signed  up  for  this  list  is  going  to  have  to  sign 
up  for  it  again,  unless  Congress  takes  action.  Consumers  who 
joined  this  enormously  popular  program  will  again  encounter  the 
annoyance  of  advertising  at  the  dinner  table,  beginning  in  June 
2008. With this annoyance will also come another round of expend-
itures  for  the  Federal  Government  to  publicize  the  availability  of 
the  list  and  the  necessity  of  signing  up  again.  Congressman  Doyle 
announced, this week, that he will introduce a vehicle in the House 
to make the Do Not Call Registry permanent, and it’s my hope that 
Members  of  this  Committee  might  introduce  a  parallel  bill  and 
pass it expeditiously. 

I can’t help actually just to note, in passing, one of our deep dis-
appointments  with  the  Federal  Trade  Commission  has,  indeed, 
been  this  net  neutrality  report.  The  notion  that  markets  are  going 
to  discipline  the  right  player  here  is  curious.  I  was  on  the  inside 
of  Madison  River,  one  of  the  few  incidents  where  we’ve  seen  docu-
mented blocking, and what we saw there—it was sheer dumb luck 
that  we  discovered  the  blocking  in  the  first  place,  because  we  had 
a  network  engineer  as  one  of  the  customers  who  was  blocked.  He 
ran a trace route, and he called the company up, and the company 
told  him  they  were  blocking  our  packets  because  they  wanted  to 
make  more  from  their  own  service.  That  is  not  going  to  repeat 
itself.  We  believe  we’ve  seen  blocking  in  other  instances.  It’s  just 
incredibly  difficult  to  document.  And  the  problem  is,  the  market 
disciplines  the  wrong  player.  If  somebody  has  trouble  with  their 
Internet  phone  service,  who  do  they  call?  Do  they  call  their  Inter-
net  service  provider  and  say,  ‘‘Hey,  you  should  sign  a  better  deal 
with  AT&T’’?  No,  they  call  their  Internet  phone  provider  and  say, 
‘‘Why is your service junk?’’ 

And the notion that competition is going to prevent this behavior, 
I  think,  is  also  a  little  bit  laughable.  I  live  2  miles  north  of  the 
White House, in Washington, D.C., and I have a choice of precisely 
one provider. I’m not able to get cable modem service in my neigh-
borhood.  And  so,  I’m  not  quite  sure  how  I,  as  a  consumer,  would 
do anything. And, while I hear, ‘‘Ninety percent of consumers have 
a  choice  between  two,’’  I  just  find  that  really  difficult  to  believe 
those  numbers,  when,  you  know,  here  I  am,  in  downtown  Wash-
ington, D.C., in a relatively affluent neighborhood, and I don’t have 
a choice of two providers. 

I thank you for the opportunity to testify today. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Murray follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF CHRIS MURRAY, SENIOR COUNSEL, CONSUMERS UNION 
Subcommittee  Chairman  Dorgan,  Ranking  Member  DeMint,  and  Members  of  the 
Subcommittee,  I  am  grateful  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  before  you  today  rep-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

62 

resenting  Consumers  Union,  the  nonprofit  publisher  of  Consumer  Reports  maga-
zine.1 

The Federal Trade Commission (FTC) serves as a key line of defense against un-
fair  and  deceptive  practices  and  anti-competitive  behavior.  Today  I  will  highlight 
some  of  the  barriers  in  the  Commission’s  authority  and  enforcement  powers  that 
hinder its ability to protect consumers as well as note a few priority areas in which 
the FTC could do more. 

Given  the  FTC’s  broad  authority  to  protect  consumers,  Consumers  Union  inter-
sects  with  the  FTC  in  many  ways.  One  notable  area  in  which  the  FTC  has  led  is 
in  the  area  of  ‘‘Exclusion  Payments,’’  or  ‘‘pay  for  delay’’  settlements,  where  generic 
drug manufacturers are paid by brand name drug makers to keep generic drugs out 
of  a  market.  The  agency  prevailed  on  cases  to  end  the  practice  of  paying  off  drug 
competitors not to compete, until it was reversed by the 11th circuit in the Schering 
case.2 We  support  legislation  to  end  these  anti-consumer  practices  and  applaud  the 
FTC  for  conducting  more  investigations  with  an  eye  toward  bringing  more  cases. 
These ‘‘pay for delay’’ deals cost consumers billions every year. I hope Congress will 
also act expeditiously to end this practice. 

Today  I’ll  turn  my  attention  primarily  to  the  telecommunications  and  media  sec-
tors,  and  what  can  be  done  to  improve  the  FTC’s  ability  to  protect  consumers  in 
these areas. 
Eliminating the Common Carrier Exemption, Policing Truth in Broadband 

Advertising 

First, Congress should eliminate the constraints of the common carrier exemption, 
as it was crafted for a time when a single monopoly telephone provider was tightly 
regulated  by  the  Federal  Communications  Commission  (FCC).  As  the  marketplace 
evolves with a broader array of services, and the FCC steadily backs away from reg-
ulating the full bundle of communications that consumers are buying, there is a void 
that  is  critical  for  the  FTC  to  fill—and  Congress  should  provide  the  FTC  authority 
to fill it. 

What happens when a telephone company advertises a misleading promotion that 
bundles  a  service  that  is  today  exempt,  such  as  landline  telephone,  with  a  service 
that  is  not,  such  as  broadband  Internet?  We  would  argue  that  the  agency  has  au-
thority  to  deal  with  the  problem,  but  this  would  likely  be  litigated  before  it  is  set-
tled, consuming already scarce agency resources. 

For example, in the Verity case, the agency brought an action against an overseas 
firm  billing  illegally  for  ‘‘adult  videotext’’  services  that  consumers  didn’t  even  know 
had been accessed through their phone lines. The company attempted to evade FTC 
jurisdiction  by  claiming  the  common  carrier  exemption.  While  the  FTC  eventually 
prevailed, it required litigation at the district and appellate court levels, and Verity 
even attempted an appeal to the Supreme Court, but the case was not accepted. 

When  we  see  carriers  using  aggressive  bundling  tactics,  advertising  ‘‘unlimited’’ 
services that are sharply limited, and promoting plans that are not reflective of ac-
tual costs, the case for FTC jurisdiction could not be more clear. 

And  the  FTC  should  prosecute  ‘‘unfair  and  deceptive’’  practices  wherever  they 
may  lurk,  especially  where  the  agency  already  has  clear  authority.  We  saw  recent 
examples  of  cable  companies  offering  high-speed  Internet  to  their  customers,  and 
terminating those who use ‘‘too much’’ bandwidth. We’re not arguing that consumers 
should have unlimited bandwidth by any means, just that they should get whatever 
bandwidth  they’ve  been  sold.  If  a  consumer  buys  a  certain  amount  of  connectivity, 
then  cap  them  at  amount—no  more,  no  less  than  what  was  advertised.  In  a  Wash-
ington Post article,3 a spokesman for this particular company wouldn’t even disclose 
to its subscribers how much is ‘‘too much’’! They argue that if limits were disclosed, 
then subscribers would use right up to that maximum capacity. 

1 Consumers Union is a nonprofit membership organization chartered in 1936 under the laws 
of  the  State  of  New  York  to  provide  consumers  with  information,  education  and  counsel  about 
goods,  services,  health,  and  personal  finance.  Consumers  Union’s  income  is  solely  derived  from 
the  sale  of  Consumer  Reports,  its  other  publications  and  from  noncommercial  contributions, 
grants  and  fees.  In  addition  to  reports  on  Consumers  Union’s  own  product  testing,  Consumer 
Reports  (with  approximately  4.5  million  paid  circulation)  regularly  carries  articles  on  health, 
product safety, marketplace economics and legislative, judicial and regulatory actions that affect 
consumer welfare. Consumers Union’s publications carry no advertising and receive no commer-
cial support. 

2 Schering-Plough Corp. v. Federal Trade Commission, 2005 U.S. App. LEXIS 3811, (11th. Cir. 

2005). 

3 Hart, Kim. ‘‘Shutting Down Big Downloaders,’’ Washington Post (September 7, 2007). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

63 

I  simply  don’t  understand  how  a  company  can  advertise  a  particular  high-speed 
capacity,  and  then  refuse  to  tell  subscribers  what  they  really  bought.  If  that’s  not 
an unfair and deceptive practice, I can’t imagine what would be. 

The  agency  needs  to  act  to  ensure  that  consumers  get  truth  in  broadband  and 
communications  advertising,  and  Congress  needs  to  give  the  FTC  clear,  concurrent 
jurisdiction  with  the  FCC  to  deal  with  the  full  range  of  communications  services, 
whether common carrier or otherwise. 
Digital Television Transition—Defending against the ‘‘Digital Upsell’’ 

The  digital  television  transition  creates  unique  vulnerabilities  for  consumers  and 
therefore unique opportunities for businesses to mislead them. Not only is consumer 
awareness of the transition low, the transition is confusing for even those consumers 
who  are  aware  of  it—consumers  lack  clarity  on  what  equipment  they’ll  need  under 
what  circumstances.  Will  cable  subscribers  need  a  converter  box?  For  those  who 
need  a  new  television  now,  do  they  need  a  digital  television?  A  digital  cable-ready 
television? An analog set with a converter box? 

Along with these complexities are strong incentives by a variety of market players 
to  upsell  to  consumers.  Cable  companies  have  an  incentive  to  encourage  non-sub-
scribers to purchase their service, and to upsell current subscribers to digital cable. 
Retailers and manufacturers have an incentive to sell high-end HDTVs rather than 
more  affordable  lower  definition,  smaller-screen  digital  sets.  And  they  have  no  in-
centive  to  inform  consumers  that  their  analog  sets  will  continue  to  receive  digital 
broadcasts as long as they have a converter box. 

The combination of low consumer awareness, technological complexity, and finan-
cial  incentives  to  upsell  creates  a  situation  ripe  for  deceptive  practices.  For  vulner-
able  populations—such  as  the  elderly  or  low-income  households—the  potential  for 
being misled, intentionally or unintentionally, is significant. 

Last  week  the  cable  industry  launched  a  $200  million  ad  campaign  to  educate 
consumers  about  the  DTV  transition.  The  ads,  which  urge  cable  customers  to  relax 
because  ‘‘cable  will  take  care  of  them’’  in  the  digital  transition,  fail  to  indicate 
whether  cable  will  convert  all  digital  broadcast  signals,  or  whether  consumers  will 
need  to  pay  more  for  a  set  top  box  or  other  services  that  make  it  possible  for  con-
sumers to continue using their analog cable services. 

The  cable  industry  has  made  a  voluntary  commitment  to  offer  both  digital  and 
analog  signals  to  their  customers  for  3  years—but  they  have  not  committed  to  do 
this nationwide. Their public statements indicate that they would not provide these 
signals to customers in a significant part of the country, including rural areas. After 
this  3  year  dual  carriage  period  ends,  it  is  not  clear  that  consumers  will  not  have 
to purchase new equipment or pay more for digital cable service. 

Congress and the FTC should take an aggressive stance to ensure that consumers 
are  not  taken  advantage  of.  In  the  last  Congress,  this  Committee  reported  (in  the 
Communications  Opportunity  Promotion  and  Enhancement  Act)  an  amendment  of-
fered by Sen. Nelson of Florida that imposed on retailers the duty to adequately in-
form  consumers,  and  made  it  a  violation  of  law  to  fail  to  adequately  inform  con-
sumers about the availability of digital-to-analog converter boxes or to provide mis-
leading  information  about  the  availability  and  cost  of  such  converter  boxes.  Con-
sumers Union supported that provision and encourages Congress to make such fail-
ure a violation of Section 5 of the FTCA subject to civil penalties. 
Rulemaking and Enforcement Authority 

Despite its broad jurisdiction to take action against unfair and deceptive practices 
by  most  types  of  businesses  and  its  broad  rulemaking  authority  to  issue  specific 
trade rules, the Commission faces significant procedural and judicial hurdles in pro-
posing  and  adopting  new  rules  and  in  taking  enforcement  action  against  unlawful 
practices. 

Preventative Rules: The Commission faces significant statutory restrictions in pro-
posing  and  adopting  rules  to  prevent  unfair  and  deceptive  practices  before  they 
occur.  First,  rulemaking  is  encumbered  by  significant  procedural  requirements,  in-
cluding  judicial  review  according  to  a  higher  review  standard  than  most  agencies 
face. Second, in order to propose such rules, the Commission must make a showing 
that the practice it seeks to correct is prevalent or widespread. The apparent inter-
nal  Commission  policy  not  to  issue  such  rules,  coupled  with  its  theoretically  broad 
but  practically  cramped  authority,  means  that  consumers  cannot  rely  on  FTC  rules 
to  prevent  unfair  and  deceptive  practices  before  they  occur.  Thus,  Congress  must 
be more aggressive in ensuring that consumers are protected by mandating that the 
Commission  develop  rules  that  protect  consumers  from  unfair  and  deceptive  prac-
tices in the emerging priority areas, some of which are outlined below. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

64 

Enforcement  Authority:  The  Commission’s  enforcement  authority  is  likewise  con-
strained. Section 5 of the FTCA empowers the FTC to take action against those who 
engage in unfair and deceptive practices. For example, the Commission has author-
ity to seek civil penalties against those businesses and individuals that violate Sec-
tion  5,  but  only  after  it  has  issued  a  cease  and  desist  order,  a  court  has  enjoined 
a practice and the order or injunction has been violated.4 This slap on the wrist ap-
proach  sends  a  clear  message:  ‘‘It’s  OK  to  break  the  law  until  you  get  caught,  and 
when you do, just don’t do it again.’’ 

The combination of few preventative rules and enforcement limitations encourage 
those who engage in unfair or deceptive practices to roll the dice in hopes that FTC 
resources  and  enforcement  limitations  will  limit  their  financial  exposure,  assuming 
they are ever caught. Congress must step in to ensure that at least for high priority 
issues, the Commission is fully empowered to prevent consumer harm by mandating 
that  FTC  issue  tough  regulations  or  making  explicit  that  certain  practices  violate 
Section  5  explicitly  and  by  strengthening  FTC’s  enforcement  powers  by  authorizing 
it to seek strong civil penalties for initial violations. 
Identity Theft and Privacy 

The  FTC  plays  an  important  role  in  preventing  identity  theft,  encouraging  im-
proved  data  security  measures,  and  enforcing  elements  of  some  key  privacy  laws. 
FTC has conducted numerous workshops to explore privacy issues; one important 
workshop  is  planned  this  fall  regarding  online  collection  of  consumer  behavioral 
data  for  marketing  uses.  Consumers  will  pay  an  increasingly  heavy  price  for  the 
convenience of shopping for goods and services online as marketers, researchers and 
data-mining  companies  grow  ever  closer  to  creating  near-complete  profiles  of  con-
sumer behaviors, easily matched with public data on zip codes and incomes. We also 
commend  FTC  for  evaluating  the  important  privacy  issues  raised  by  the  Google- 
Doubleclick merger, and the growing concern over behavioral tracking. 

The  Commission  also  manages  the  Identity  Theft  Data  Clearing  House  and  con-
ducts important consumer education on prevention of ID theft and mitigation of its 
harms. We are pleased that the FTC has updated its website to provide information 
about  state  ‘‘security  freeze’’  laws—state  laws  giving  consumers  the  right  to  freeze 
access  to  their  credit  files—that  39  states  have  now  enacted.  The  security  freeze  is 
a  key  tool  in  preventing  new  account  fraud.  Given  the  essential  nature  of  this  pro-
tection,  more  prominent  placement  of  freeze  rights  information  would  strengthen 
FTC educational efforts. And finally, the Commission has taken enforcement action 
under Section 5 against databrokers, retailers and other businesses who fail to live 
up to their privacy promises to protect and secure consumers’ personal information, 
or who fail to employ reasonable and appropriate security practices.5 

While  the  Commission’s  action  to  date  to  improve  data  security  and  deter  decep-
tive privacy disclosures is laudable, more must be done to protect consumer privacy 
both by the Commission and by Congress. Continued reliance of FTC’s Section 5 au-
thority,  with  its  significant  enforcement  limitations  (discussed  above),  leave  con-
sumers  vulnerable  to  deceptive  and  unfair  practices  that  put  them  at  significant 
risk of ID theft. 

4 Although the Commission’s Section 13(b) authority allows it to avoid the lengthy administra-
tive  enforcement  process  by  filing  a  case  directly  in  Federal  district  court,  except  where  explic-
itly  authorized  by  statute,  rule  or  court  decree,  the  Commission  cannot  seek  civil  penalties  for 
initial violations. 

Examples  of  these  enforcement  difficulties  abound.  When  the  Commission  filed  its  complaint 
against  ChoicePoint  for  its  security  breach,  it  was  able  to  seek  civil  penalties  against  the  com-
pany  only  because  they  were  authorized  under  the  Fair  Credit  Reporting  Act.4 Had  the  com-
plaint  been  premised  solely  on  the  company’s  Section  5  violations,  the  Commission  could  have 
sought only equitable and monetary relief—damages suffered in cases where the breach caused 
ID  theft.  Without  the  threat  of  FCRA-based  civil  penalties,  it  is  unlikely  that  the  Commission 
would  have  successfully  achieved  its  record-setting  $15  million  settlement  agreement.  And  in 
some  cases,  the  actual  monetary  damages  to  consumers  may  be  limited,  difficult  to  assess  and 
prove  or  otherwise  inadequate  to  provide  for  a  strong  deterrent  to  unlawful  actions.  One  such 
example  is  telephone  pretexting,  an  issue  which  this  Committee  attempted  to  address  in  the 
109th  Congress.  The  Commission  has  sought  explicit  civil  penalty  authority  from  Congress  to 
enforce  violations  of  this  type  of  deceptive  practice.4 Such  authority  is  important  because  when 
consumers  phone  records  are  obtained  through  pretexting,  although  there  may  be  a  severe  pri-
vacy invasion (as in the case of the Hewlett-Packard board members whose phone records were 
obtained),  monetary  damages  may  be  scant.  In  such  cases,  Section  13(b)  provides  little  deter-
rence  effect  and  thus  is  as  limited  as  FTC’s  administrative  enforcement  options.  Borrowing  the 
words  of  Commissioner  Liebowitz  in  his  dissent  in  FTC’s  DirectRevenue  case,  in  such  cases, 
FTC enforcement action becomes merely ‘‘a cost of doing business.’’ 4 

5 For an accounting of FTC’s actions against companies that fail to comply with their own pri-

vacy policies, see http://www.ftc.gov/privacy/privacyinitiatives/promiseslenf.html. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

65 

Unfortunately, currently the Commission has explicit authority to issue data secu-
rity  rules  only  for  those  entities  regulated  under  the  Gramm-Leach-Bliley  Act.  Ex-
cept  under  its  general  rulemaking  authority—which,  as  noted  above,  the  Commis-
sion  is  reluctant  to  use—the  FTC  does  not  have  an  explicit  Congressional  mandate 
to  issue  rules  governing  the  privacy  and  data  security  practices  of  non-GLBA  enti-
ties. 

We  urge  Congress  to  provide  the  FTC  with  new  enforcement  authority  for  new 
Federal  data  security  mandates  for  any  business  operating  in  interstate  commerce 
that collects, stores, or otherwise uses consumers’ sensitive personal information. S. 
1178,  reported  by  the  Senate  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation  Committee 
earlier  this  year,  takes  an  important  first  step  in  applying  FTC’s  GLBA  data  secu-
rity rules adopted by FTC to all such businesses. If the rule is violated, the Commis-
sion  will  have  authority  to  seek  civil  penalties  for  the  initial  violation,  creating 
greater  incentives  to  secure  data.  Unfortunately,  despite  the  generality  of  the  data 
security requirements under S. 1178 and FTC’s GLBA data security rules, the legis-
lation  also  displaces  state  data  security  safeguard  rules  that  require  stronger  or 
more  explicit  security  measures.  We  urge  the  Committee  not  to  displace  stronger 
state protections in this area, or to significantly strengthen data security safeguard 
mandates. 

But  data  security  requirements  are  not  enough.  Consumers  also  deserve  notice 
when  the  security  of  their  sensitive  personal  information  held  by  others  has  been 
breached  so  they  can  take  steps  to  protect  themselves.  Consumers  Union  strongly 
supports the security freeze provisions of S. 1178 and urges their adoption. We urge, 
however,  that  Congress  strengthen  the  notice  of  breach  requirement  in  the  bill. 
Under the legislation, notice obligations are not triggered unless the breached entity 
determines that there is a reasonable risk of identity theft. Such ‘‘trigger’’ notice will 
leave consumers in the dark when there is inadequate data for the breached entity 
to  evaluate  the  level  of  risk.  Moreover,  the  legislation  weakens  existing  protections 
because  it  displaces  far  stronger  state  notice  laws  that  now  protect  more  than  half 
of  all  American  consumers.  The  more  consumer  protective  approach  to  notice  of 
breach  provided  in  S.  495  better  ensures  that  businesses  cannot  evade  notice  when 
the security of sensitive consumer data has been breached. 

Finally, it is essential that both Congress and the FTC step up protection of con-
sumers  Social  Security  Numbers  (SSNs).  SSNs  provide  the  key  to  a  consumer’s  fi-
nancial  identity.  As  a  result,  the  widespread  availability  and  use  of  SSNs  by  the 
private  and  public  sector  increases  consumers’  vulnerability  to  ID  theft  by  making 
it easier for thieves to obtain the information. 

In  comments  filed  last  week  by  CU  before  the  Commission  as  part  of  its  inquiry 
regarding  private  sector  use  of  SSNs,  CU  reported  that  in  its  recent  national  con-
sumer survey, nearly four in five adults reported that they had been asked for their 
SSN  by  a  business  or  government  entity  in  the  last  year.  Most  consumers  clearly 
understood the dangers of providing the number but feared the consequences of re-
fusing  to  provide  it.  And  nearly  all  survey  respondents  supported  new  laws  that 
would restrict the use, sale, purchase, and solicitation of their SSNs. 

Consumers  Union  encourages  adoption  of  laws  creating  new  Federal  protections 
for SSNs to reduce consumers’ vulnerability to identity thieves. The SSN protection 
provisions of S. 1178 provide a starting point, but we have strong concerns that the 
numerous exceptions provided to prohibitions on solicitation, sale, purchase and dis-
play swallow the rule and leave consumers unprotected. We also urge the FTC take 
more  aggressive  action  under  its  existing  Section  5  authority  to  prevent  collection, 
use,  sale  and  purchase  of  SSNs  except  for  credit,  investment,  tax  and  employment 
purposes. 
Spam/Spyware 

Consumers Union, in its 2007 ‘‘State of the Net’’ survey found that more than 34 
percent  of  survey  respondents  reported  a  spyware  infection  in  the  prior  6  months. 
The chances of being infected with spyware is one in three. One of every eleven con-
sumers infected suffers serious damage. In addition to hardware and software dam-
age, spyware poses grave risks to consumer privacy. 

Consumers  will  pay  an  increasing  personal  price  for  the  convenience  of  shopping 
for goods and services online as marketers, researchers and data-mining companies 
grow  ever  closer  to  creating  near-complete  profiles  of  consumer  behaviors,  easily 
matched  with  public  data  on  zip  codes  and  incomes.  Badware  at  best  assaults  con-
sumers  computers  with  unwanted  pop-up  advertising  and,  at  worst,  may  unknow-
ingly render their computers a tool for cybercriminals who use thousands of infected 
machines to steal identities, rob banks, and even cripple the Internet with malicious 
denial-of-service attacks. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

66 

We  commend  FTC  for  its  aggressive  stance  on  spyware,  bringing  at  least  eleven 
actions  in  the  past  2  years,  although  some  settlements  have  produced  disappoint-
ingly low fines. But more must be done to protect consumer privacy. 

In addition to new authorities for FTC, the agency, despite its good work, can take 
yet  a  more  aggressive  stance  beyond  enforcement  of  Section  5  violations.  It  should 
investigate the online marketplace in light of new developments in the field, expose 
marketing  practices  that  compromise  user  privacy,  issue  the  necessary  injunctions 
to  halt  current  practices  that  abuse  consumers,  and  craft  policies  and  recommend 
Federal legislation that prevents such abuses in the future. 
National Do Not Call Registry 

Finally,  I’ll  note  that  the  National  Do  Not  Call  Registry  is  required  to  purge  its 
numbers  every  5  years,  meaning  all  consumers  who  signed  up  for  it  will  have  to 
sign up for it again, unless Congress takes action. Consumers who signed up for this 
enormously  popular  program  will  again  encounter  the  annoyance  of  advertising  at 
the  dinner  table,  beginning  in  June  2008.  And  with  this  will  come  another  round 
of  marketing  expenditures  for  the  Federal  Government  to  publicize  the  availability 
of the List and necessity of signing up yet again. 

132 million citizens put their home and mobile telephone numbers on the list, and 
I’m  confident  those  voters  will  be  distressed  to  find  out  that  they  are  again  facing 
telemarketing calls unless Congress acts. 

Congressman  Doyle  announced  this  week  that  he  will  introduce  a  vehicle  in  the 
House  to  make  the  Do  Not  Call  Registry  permanent;  it  is  my  hope  that  members 
of  this  Committee  will  introduce  a  parallel  bill,  and  seek  its  expeditious  passage. 
The Federal Trade Commission is a critical line of defense against unfair and de-
ceptive  practices  and  anti-competitive  behavior.  The  Committee  should  act  to  im-
prove  the  agency’s  ability  to  accomplish  its  mission,  especially  by  eliminating  the 
common  carrier  exemption.  We  look  forward  to  supporting  the  agency’s  efforts  on 
consumer  privacy,  spam  and  spyware,  the  Do  Not  Call  List,  and  would  urge  the 
agency  to  take  a  closer  look  at  advertisements  concerning  the  Digital  Television 
Transition to ensure that consumers are not misled. 

Thank you Chairman Dorgan. 

Senator DORGAN. Mr. Murray, thank you very much. 
Finally,  next  we  will  hear  from  Mr.  Schwartz.  Mr.  Schwartz  is 

representing the Center for Democracy and Technology. 

Mr. Schwartz, you may proceed. 

STATEMENT OF ARI SCHWARTZ, DEPUTY DIRECTOR, 

CENTER FOR DEMOCRACY AND TECHNOLOGY 

Mr. SCHWARTZ. Thank you very much, Chairman Dorgan. Thank 
you for holding this public hearing today and inviting CDT to par-
ticipate. 

As  more  consumers’  services  move  online,  consumer  protection 
agencies are facing new challenges. The Federal Trade Commission 
has  played  a  leadership  role  to  meet  these  challenges,  including 
overcoming  such  difficulties  as  locating  the  perpetrators  of  online 
schemes, keeping up with the rapid pace of technological evolution, 
and  following  the  increasing  financial  motivation  of  Internet 
fraudsters. 

In particular, the FTC has been the lead law enforcement agency 
in the world in the fight against spyware. Spyware has become one 
of  the  most  serious  threats  to  the  Internet’s  future.  Consumer  Re-
ports magazine estimates that consumers will lose $1.7 billion this 
year to spyware attacks alone. The magazine estimates that almost 
1  million  consumers  simply  gave  up  fixing  their  spyware-riddled 
computers and had to throw them away. 

The  good  news  is  that  consumer  losses  are  down  dramatically 
from 2006, when they peaked at $2.6 billion. The main reasons for 
this  decrease  in  the  spyware  threat  are,  first,  the  improvement  in 
anti-spyware  technology;  second,  the  public  pressure  on  companies 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

67 

advertising  with  nuisance  or  harmful  adware;  and,  finally,  the  en-
forcement  of  consumer  protection  law,  led  by  the  work  of  the  FTC 
and some State attorneys general. 

The FTC recognized the profound threat posed by the rising tide 
of spyware early, and actively moved to limit its spread. The Com-
mission  has  been  the  leading  enforcer  against  spyware,  pursuing 
11  cases  to  fruition  in  the  past  two  and  a  half  years,  including 
three based, at least in part, on the petitions brought my organiza-
tion,  the  Center  for  Democracy  and  Technology.  CDT  has  learned, 
through  our  own  research,  that,  as  consumer  fraud  increases,  the 
FTC’s  ability  to  work  internationally  becomes  more  important. 
Congress  passed  the  SAFE  WEB  Act  late  last  year  to  provide  the 
FTC  powers  to  promote  international  cooperation.  The  FTC’s  abil-
ity  to  use  this  new  law,  and  staff  resources  that  it  will  need,  will 
be very important to monitor. 

In  fact,  in  general,  the  Commission  staff  has  not  grown  in  equal 
proportion  to  its  new  responsibilities,  such  as  SAFE  WEB,  the 
FACT Act, Gramm-Leach-Bliley, CAN–SPAM, and more. 

Mr. Chairman, you mentioned, earlier, that, according to its own 
statistics, in 2008 the FTC will only be about three-fifths of the size 
that  it  was  almost  30  years  ago,  in  1979,  well  before  the  Internet 
explosion, and decades before the growth of online fraud. For online 
consumer  protection  to  be  truly  effective  in  the  future,  Congress 
will  need  to  appropriate  resources  commensurate  with  the  FTC’s 
new responsibilities. 

Finally,  CDT  would  like  to  impress  upon  the  Committee  the  im-
portant  role  that  the  FTC  has  played  in  promoting  good  privacy 
practices  online.  While  progress  has  been  made  by  many  of  the 
good  actors  in  the  industry  in  this  regard,  CDT  continues  to  ac-
tively urge Congress to take a more comprehensive approach to pri-
vacy to ensure that consumers are protected in the new networked 
economy. 

Last year, we were joined in this effort not only by privacy advo-
cates,  but  also  by  14  major  companies,  including  eBay,  Microsoft 
and  HP.  The  FTC’s  experience  on  privacy  will  be  essential  as  this 
effort moves forward. In particular, the Commission will need ade-
quate resources to participate in the discussion to implement what-
ever  legislation  emerges  from  this  process.  We  hope  that  this  com-
mittee will be the leader on the general privacy issue, and will con-
tinue to promote the urgency of privacy matters with the Commis-
sion and on the rest of the Congress, moving forward. 

Thank  you  for  your  attention,  and  I  look  forward  to  your  ques-

tions. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Schwartz follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF ARI SCHWARTZ, DEPUTY DIRECTOR, 

CENTER FOR DEMOCRACY AND TECHNOLOGY 

Chairman  Dorgan,  Ranking  Member  DeMint  and  Members  of  the  Committee, 
thank  you  for  holding  this  public  hearing  on  the  Reauthorization  of  the  Federal 
Trade  Commission  (FTC).  The  Center  for  Democracy  and  Technology  (CDT)  is 
pleased  to  have  the  opportunity  to  participate.  CDT  is  a  nonprofit  public  interest 
organization dedicated to preserving and promoting privacy, civil liberties and other 
democratic  values  on  the  Internet.  CDT  has  been  a  widely  recognized  leader  in  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

68 

policy  debate  about  spyware,  phishing  and  related  privacy  threats  to  the  Internet.1 
As we have worked to build trust on the Internet, we have worked closely with the 
Consumer Protection Bureau at the Federal Trade Commission. The Bureau’s work 
is essential to the protection of consumer privacy online. 
Summary 

The FTC’s consumer protection mission with respect to the Internet is expanding 
and becoming increasingly complex. The Commission’s jurisdiction over Internet-re-
lated laws has expanded including new laws to fight spam, identity theft and more. 
At  the  same  time,  the  rapid  pace  of  technological  change,  the  increasing  financial 
pay-off for malicious actors and complicated nature of international cooperation has 
increased  the  complexity  of  enforcement  and  the  need  for  adequate  resources.  Five 
years  ago,  CDT  foresaw  these  emerging  issues  when  we  urged  this  subcommittee 
to  reauthorize  the  FTC  and,  in  doing  so,  to  ‘‘use  its  new  resources  to  stop  unfair 
information  practices  as  well  as  deceptive  ones.’’ 2 While  the  Commission  has  not 
been reauthorized since 1996, it has, under Chairman Majoras, begun to bring more 
cases  using  its  unfairness  powers  and  has  assumed  a  lead  law  enforcement  agency 
role in online consumer protection. 

In  particular,  the  FTC  has  taken  the  lead  law  enforcement  role  in  fighting 
spyware, one of the most serious threats to the Internet’s continued usefulness, sta-
bility and evolution. The Commission should be commended for recognizing early on 
the  profound  threat  posed  by  the  rising  tide  of  spyware  and  for  actively  moving  to 
limit its spread. 

As  consumer  Internet  fraud  increases,  the  FTC’s  ability  to  work  with  its  inter-
national counterparts becomes ever more important. At the request of the Commis-
sion  and  with  support  from  groups  like  CDT,  Congress  passed  the  SAFE  WEB  Act 
late last year to provide the FTC with powers to promote international cooperation. 
Yet, while the Commission clearly recognizes the importance of the new law, we will 
need to closely monitor the Congressional reporting on the law to see if those powers 
are being used effectively to improve international cooperation. 

CDT  would  also  like  to  impress  upon  the  Committee  the  important  role  that  the 
FTC has played in promoting good privacy practices online. In particular, the Com-
mission has promoted industry best practices and also shown that it will take action 
when laws are broken. 

For the last decade, CDT has actively urged Congress to take a more comprehen-
sive  approach  to  privacy.  Last  year,  we  were  joined  in  the  call  for  comprehensive 
privacy  legislation,  not  only  by  privacy  advocates,  but  also  by  14  major  companies. 
CDT  urges  this  Committee  to  take  up  general  consumer  privacy  legislation  and 
make  it  clear  that  the  FTC’s  unfairness  jurisdiction  includes  violations  of  the  pri-
vacy  rights  of  American  consumers.  As  the  discussion  about  privacy  legislation 
moves forward, the FTC’s expertise and experience on privacy will be essential. 

Finally, it is important to note that while the Internet revolution and the growth 
of  digital  technologies  have  heightened  the  FTC’s  importance  to  consumer  protec-
tion,  the  resources  available  to  the  Commission  have  declined.  When  adjusted  for 
inflation,  the  Commission’s  staff  in  2008  will  only  be  62  percent  of  the  size  that  it 
was almost 30 years earlier in 1979, well before the Internet explosion.3 For online 

1 See,  e.g.,  CDT  leads  the  Anti-Spyware  Coalition  (ASC),  a  group  of  anti-spyware  software 
companies, academics, and public interest groups dedicated to defeating spyware; In 2006, CDT 
Deputy  Director  Ari  Schwartz  won  the  RSA  Award  for  Excellence  in  Public  Policy  for  his  work 
in  building  the  ASC  and  other  efforts  against  spyware;  ‘‘Eye  Spyware,’’  The  Christian  Science 
Monitor,  Apr.  21,  2004  [‘‘Some  computer-focused  organizations,  like  the  Center  for  Democracy 
and Technology, are working to increase public awareness of spyware and its risks.’’]; ‘‘The Spies 
in  Your  Computer,’’  The  New  York  Times,  Feb.  18,  2004  [‘‘Congress  will  miss  the  point  (in 
spyware legislation) if it regulates specific varieties of spyware, only to watch the programs mu-
tate into forms that evade narrowly tailored law. A better solution, as proposed recently by the 
Center  for  Democracy  and  Technology,  is  to  develop  privacy  standards  that  protect  computer 
users  from  all  programs  that  covertly  collect  information  that  rightfully  belongs  to  the  user.’’]; 
John  Borland,  ‘‘Spyware  and  its  discontents,’’  CNET  News.com,  Feb.  12,  2004  [‘‘In  the  past  few 
months,  Ari  Schwartz  and  the  Washington,  D.C.-based  Center  for  Democracy  and  Technology 
have leapt into the front ranks of the Net’s spyware-fighters.’’]. 

2 Testimony of Ari Schwartz, Associate Director, Center for Democracy and Technology on ‘‘Re-
authorization  of  the  Federal  Trade  Commission’’  before  the  Senate  Committee  on  Commerce, 
Science,  and  Transportation  Subcommittee  on  Consumer  Affairs,  Foreign  Commerce  and  Tour-
ism,’’ July 17, 2002. 

3 According to the FTC, the Commission had 1,746 FTEs in 1979 (see http://www.ftc.gov/ftc/ 
oed/fmo/fte2.htm)  and  requested  1,019  FTEs  in  2008  (see  http://www.ftc.gov/ftc/oed/fmo/ 
budgetsummary08.pdf). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

69 

consumer  protection  to  continue  to  be  effective,  Congress  will  need  to  appropriate 
resources commensurate with the FTC’s new responsibilities. 

I. Growth of Internet Commerce Has Led to New Roles for FTC 

The  exponential  growth  of  Internet  commerce  has  delivered  enormous  benefits  to 
consumers. With low barriers to entry and a profusion of tools for comparing various 
sellers,  e-commerce  has  lowered  prices  and  expanded  consumer  choice.  Users  also 
benefit  from  the  enormous  convenience  e-commerce  provides,  conducting  trans-
actions  from  their  home  offices,  laptop  computers  and  increasingly  even  mobile  de-
vices like PDAs and phones. 

These  benefits,  however,  are  being  undermined  by  the  rise  in  privacy  intrusions, 
fraud  and  abuse.  An  entire  shadow  industry  has  arisen  with  the  sole  purpose  of 
gathering  personal  information  on  Internet  users—often  surreptitiously  through 
invasive  means  such  as  spyware.  Most  of  this  information  ends  up  being  used  to 
bombard  users  with  unwanted  marketing,  but  in  the  wrong  hands  it  also  may  be 
used  for  more  malicious  purposes,  such  as  identity  theft,  the  fastest  growing  crime 
in the United States. 

Consumers  also  are  subjected  to  a  constant  barrage  of  annoying  and  frequently 
offensive spam e-mail. Some of this spam is sent by fraudsters posing as legitimate 
e-commerce  sites  and  financial  institutions,  These  ‘‘phishing’’  e-mails  typically  try 
to  dupe  consumers  into  visiting  fake  websites  where  they  are  prompted  to  submit 
passwords and personal information, such as a Social Security numbers, which can, 
in  turn,  be  used  for  identity  theft.  Making  matters  worse,  many  of  these  scams 
originate overseas, out of reach of U.S. law enforcement. 

Consumers are increasingly alarmed about these kinds of scams, Internet privacy 
intrusions,  fraud  and  abuse.  In  an  April  2006  poll  conducted  by  the  Center  for 
American Progress, 69 percent of respondents indicated they were very or somewhat 
worried  about  having  their  identities  stolen,  making  it  the  most  widely  cited  risk 
category  from  a  list  that  included  getting  cancer,  being  victimized  by  violent  crime, 
and being hurt or killed in a terrorist attack.4 

The FTC is the lead Federal agency responsible for protecting consumers against 
spam, spyware, identity theft and other Internet fraud and is responsible for enforc-
ing the: 

• Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act 
• CAN–SPAM Act 
• Fair and Accurate Credit Transactions Act 
• Do Not Call List 
• Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act 
The  Commission  also  plays  a  lead  role  in  addressing  the  growing  threats  related 

to: 

• Identity theft 
• Spyware 
• Phishing 
• General Internet fraud 
The  FTC  is  also  engaged  in  evaluating  and  developing  responses  to  changes  in 
the online marketplace that may affect consumer protection. One example is behav-
ioral  advertising,  which  involves  the  compilation  of  detailed  profiles  of  consumers’ 
online activities for the purposes of serving targeted advertising. Although this prac-
tice  is  not  new,  the  FTC  has  recognized  that  the  evolution  of  technology  and  the 
online  marketplace  require  that  the  Commission  take  a  fresh  look  at  behavioral 
advertising’s privacy and consumer protection implications. The FTC has scheduled 
a  town  hall  meeting  in  November  to  address  the  issue.  In  this  and  many  other 
areas,  the  FTC  is  constantly  looking  to  educate  itself  and  the  public  about  devel-
oping threats online. 

When we take into account the scope of the FTC’s responsibilities it becomes obvi-
ous  that  maintaining  aggressive  enforcement  and  comprehensive  consumer  edu-
cation  requires  additional  resources  for  the  FTC.  The  online  marketplace  will  be-
come  both  more  complex  and  more  essential  over  time.  The  FTC  has  been  and  will 

4 Poll conducted April 13–20, 2006, by Greenberg Quinlan Rosner Research for the Center for 
American  Progress;  Center  for  Responsible  Lending;  National  Military  Family  Association;  and 
AARP. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

70 

continue  to  be  a  critical  force  in  maintaining  consumer  trust  in  the  Internet.  In-
creased resources are a vital part of making that happen. 

II. New Challenges in Investigating Malicious Internet Actors 

In  the  early  days  of  Internet  crime,  a  vast  number  of  offenses  amounted  to  little 
more  than  virtual  vandalism.  Hackers  would  often  circumvent  Internet  security  as 
a  way  of  showing  off  to  their  friends  and  proving  their  skills.  That  trend  has  long 
been on the decline, as malicious actors on the Internet are increasingly going after 
financial gain first and foremost.5 This means that more consumers are losing more 
money than ever before either as a direct or indirect result of malicious activity on-
line, and that malicious hackers have more financial resources than ever before. As 
a  result,  the  FTC’s  consumer  protection  mission  is  at  its  most  vital  moment.  Com-
pensating  consumers  who  have  been  harmed  and  putting  a  stop  to  fraudulent 
schemes  becomes  ever  more  important  as  fraud  and  monetary  loss  become  more 
widespread. 

As  the  FTC’s  role  in  fighting  new  fraud  increases,  its  job  becomes  more  com-
plicated.  One  of  the  great  paradoxes  of  the  Internet  is  that  while  most  Internet 
users  are  having  their  movements  tracked  and  traced  in  ways  never  before  imag-
ined, those that are willing to take the time and energy can hide the tracks of their 
online activities in ways that make them very difficult to find. While this is a huge 
boon  for  free  expression  around  the  world,  it  also  can  help  criminals  and  malicious 
Internet  operations  to  evade  the  grasp  of  law  enforcement.  Using  just  a  few  simple 
tools, criminals and scammers can quickly and easily cloak their identities and loca-
tions.  Tracking  them  down  may  require  the  assistance  of  multiple  network  opera-
tors, applications providers and technical experts to unravel a complex web of online 
identities and cloaking services. 

Tracking individuals online is made more complicated by the fact that many mali-
cious  Internet  schemes  involve  groups  of  companies,  affiliates,  and  individuals  act-
ing together to defraud consumers. Not only must the identities and locations of all 
of these actors be traced, but the business arrangements and relationships between 
them must also be sorted out before law enforcers can act. The Internet’s distributed 
nature lends itself to arrangements wherein multiple parties each contribute to form 
a  complete  operation  or  business  plan.  This  characteristic  has  helped  to  provide  a 
wide range of new services, but it may be exploited just as easily for malevolent pur-
poses  as  for  benevolent  ones.  The  complexity  of  these  arrangements  will  likely  con-
tinue  to  grow  as  malicious  Internet  users  realize  that  working  with  many  different 
parties complicates enforcement and spreads liability to multiple entities. 

The  global  nature  of  the  Internet  further  complicates  the  task  of  apprehending 
malicious  online  actors.  Internet  scams  are  increasingly  based  overseas  or  in  mul-
tiple countries at once, adding a whole new dimension to enforcement investigations. 
Law  enforcers  must  cultivate  relationships  with  their  foreign  counterparts  in  order 
to  increase  cooperation  when  it  comes  time  to  conduct  investigations.  The  same  is 
true  for  domestic  enforcement  across  multiple  states.  The  FTC  has  always  had  the 
authority  and  the  willingness  to  cooperate  with  state  attorneys  general  on  enforce-
ment matters, and the Internet makes these cases ever more likely since consumers 
from  many  different  states  may  be  affected  by  a  single  online  scam.6 In  order  to 
be fruitful, this cooperation requires all parties to expend extra resources. 

Because  of  the  rapid  changes  involved  with  Internet  scams,  investigations  of 
Internet  fraud  are  becoming  increasingly  technologically  intensive.  Although  vast 
resources  may  not  have  been  required  when  the  FTC  first  began  investigating  on-
line scams, technological advances over the past few years have heightened the level 
of  sophistication  necessary  for  successful  investigations.  If  the  FTC  is  to  continue 
as a leader in online enforcement, it must keep pace with these changes. The Inter-
net  revolution  also  complicates  FTC  oversight  of  completed  cases.  Before  digital 
technologies  became  pervasive,  it  was  much  easier  for  the  FTC  to  monitor  whether 
former  defendants  were  complying  with  the  provisions  of  their  settlement  agree-
ments or court orders. The Internet provides simple means for such actors to quickly 
and easily setup new schemes under new monikers in new locations, making it dif-
ficult  for  the  FTC  to  draw  links  to  former  businesses  or  identities  and  determine 
compliance. 

All of this technological evolution impacts FTC resources in four ways: 
• Training  and  consultations  with  outside  experts  may  be  necessary  in  order  to 

strengthen the knowledge base of FTC investigators. 

5 Krebs, Brian, ‘‘The Computer Bandit,’’ The Washington Post Magazine, Feb. 19, 2006. 
6 See,  e.g.,  ‘‘FTC,  Washington  Attorney  General,  Sue  to  Halt  Unfair  Movieland  Downloads,’’ 

Federal Trade Commission, Aug. 15, 2006, http://www.ftc.gov/opa/2006/08/movieland.htm. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

71 

• Sophisticated  equipment  may  be  needed  in  order  to  track  and  understand  the 
intricacies  of  online  schemes,  and  also  for  the  purposes  of  evidence  gathering. 
• The amount of time necessary to conduct investigations may increase due to the 
technical  complexities  of  determining  and  proving  how  a  particular  malicious 
enterprise  works  and  who  is  behind  it.  The  same  is  true  for  oversight,  where 
monitoring functions may become increasingly resource-intensive. 
• The  pool  of  resources  dedicated  to  consumer  education  must  be  expanded.  Fre-
quent and rapid changes in technology can be difficult for consumers with mini-
mal  technical  expertise  to  comprehend,  and  the  FTC  is  a  major  source  of  guid-
ance for consumers looking to protect themselves online. 

In  all  of  these  ways,  the  fast  pace  of  technological  change  demonstrates  the  need 

for the FTC to expend new resources in order to stay up to speed. 

III. FTC’s Leading Role in Spyware Enforcement: 

Setting An Example for the Future 

Five  years  ago,  very  few  people  were  familiar  with  the  term  ‘‘spyware.’’  Con-
sumers  were  just  beginning  to  witness  the  effects  of  unwanted  software  that  ap-
peared  unexpectedly  on  their  home  computers.  Since  that  time,  consumers  have 
been  increasingly  deluged  with  programs  that  they  never  knowingly  installed  on 
their computers. Often these programs make themselves difficult to remove, expose 
users’  personal  data,  open  security  holes,  and  undermine  performance  and  stability 
of their systems. The FTC was one of the first law enforcement bodies to take note 
of  this  menace.  Since  then,  the  Commission  has  been  leading  the  charge  in  the 
spyware fight in three key ways: engaging in enforcement actions, developing guid-
ing principles for enforcers, and establishing industry standards. 

The  Commission  filed  the  Nation’s  first  spyware  lawsuit  by  a  law  enforcement 
agency  in  late  2004  against  a  network  of  deceptive  adware  distributors  and  their 
affiliates.7 This  case  struck  at  the  heart  of  one  of  the  most  nefarious  spyware 
schemes  on  the  Internet.  The  scammers  involved  were  secretly  installing  software 
that  left  consumers’  computers  vulnerable  to  hackers,  and  then  duping  those  same 
users  into  purchasing  fake  security  software  to  help  repair  their  systems.  Not  only 
did  the  FTC  succeed  in  the  case—obtaining  a  $4  million  order  against  the  primary 
defendant  and  over  $300,000  in  disgorgement  from  the  other  defendants—but  the 
investigations in the case opened up several additional leads that contributed to the 
FTC’s  pursuit  of  other  malicious  software  distributors.  In  the  3-years  since  launch-
ing  this  first  suit,  the  FTC  has  engaged  in  a  total  of  11  spyware  enforcement  ac-
tions,  all  of  which  have  ended  with  settlements  or  court  orders  that  benefit  con-
sumers. 

In prosecuting these cases, the FTC has used its broad authority to challenge un-
fair  and  deceptive  practices,  recognizing  that  many  spyware  behaviors  are  illegal 
under  existing  law.  However,  the  FTC  has  not  been  haphazard  in  choosing  which 
cases  to  pursue.  As  the  common  characteristics  of  spyware  began  to  reveal  them-
selves,  the  FTC  established  three  principles  to  guide  its  spyware  enforcement  ef-
forts: 8 

• A  consumer’s  computer  belongs  to  him  or  her,  not  to  the  software  distributor. 
This means that no software maker should be able to gain access to or use the 
resources of a consumer’s computer without the consumer’s consent. 
• Buried disclosures do not work. Communicating material terms about the func-
tioning  of  a  software  program  deep  within  an  End-User  License  Agreement 
(EULA) does not meet high enough standards for adequate disclosure. 
• Consumers must be able to uninstall or disable software that they do not want. 
If  a  software  distributor  places  an  unwanted  program  on  a  consumer’s  com-
puter, there should be a reasonably straightforward way for that program to be 
removed. 

In addition to serving as a guide for the FTC, these principles have helped to di-
rect  state  law  enforcers  who  have  begun  to  take  on  spyware  cases.  The  spyware 
space  is  fraught  with  gray  areas—software  behaviors  that  may  be  perfectly  legiti-
mate  in  one  circumstance  may  be  considered  highly  malicious  in  another.  Some 
states  have  passed  specific  spyware  statutes  to  help  clarify  these  distinctions,  but 

7 FTC  v.  Seismic  Entertainment,  Inc.,  et  al.,  No.  04–377–JD,  2004  U.S.  Dist.  LEXIS  22788 

(D.N.H. Oct. 21, 2004). 

8 Remarks of Deborah Platt Majoras, Chairman, Federal Trade Commission, Anti-Spyware Co-
alition  Public  Workshop,  Feb.  9,  2006,  http://www.ftc.gov/speeches/majoras/060209cdtspy 
ware.pdf. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

72 

several  of  the  states  that  have  been  most  active  in  spyware  enforcement  have  no 
such  laws  in  place.  The  FTC’s  guiding  principles  provide  a  simple,  understandable 
baseline for current and future law enforcers as they wade into spyware issues with 
which  they  may  be  unfamiliar.  In  this  way,  the  leadership  of  the  FTC  has  been  a 
vital  component  in  expanding  the  nationwide  pool  of  law  enforcement  resources 
dedicated to combating spyware. 

The  FTC  has  also  played  an  integral  role  in  establishing  standards  for  the  soft-
ware  industry  as  a  whole.  In  two  of  its  most  recent  enforcement  efforts,  the  FTC 
reached settlement agreements with adware distributors that required the distribu-
tors  to  clearly  and  conspicuously  disclose  material  terms  about  their  adware  pro-
grams  outside  of  any  End-User  License  Agreement  (EULA).9 With  these  require-
ments  the  FTC  has  set  a  disclosure  guideline  that  can  be  applied  across  the  soft-
ware  industry,  for  the  benefit  of  consumers.  Not  only  were  the  adware  distributors 
themselves forced to abandon deceptive or nonexistent disclosures, but software ven-
dors  throughout  the  industry  were  also  put  on  notice  about  what  constitutes  legiti-
mate behavior. The FTC’s leadership in this respect has helped to curb uncertainty 
in the software industry while creating a better online experience for consumers. 

The  FTC  has  also  played  key  roles  in  other  areas  that  have  helped  to  quell  the 
rise  of  spyware  infections.  For  example,  Chairman  Majoras  has  been  actively  sup-
portive of the adoption of user-control technologies such as anti-spyware programs.10 
The Commission, under the leadership of Commissioner Liebowitz, has warned com-
panies about advertising with nuisance or harmful adware programs.11 

Consumers  have  already  seen  the  benefits  of  the  FTC’s  action  against  spyware 
working in concert with improved anti-spyware technology, self-regulatory programs 
and  work  by  other  law  enforcement  officials  such  as  the  state  attorneys  general. 
Consumer  Reports  magazine  estimates  that  consumers  will  lose  $1.7  billion  from 
spyware  in  2007  as  opposed  to  $2.6  billion  in  2006.12 While  these  figures  are  still 
astoundingly large and consumers are still very much at risk, spyware is one of the 
few areas of Internet fraud that is clearly headed in the right direction. 

The  effectiveness  of  the  FTC’s  spyware  enforcement  program  in  all  of  these  re-
gards—pursuing spyware purveyors, developing guiding enforcement principles, and 
establishing  industry  standards—has  been  made  possible  by  two  important  charac-
teristics  of  FTC  consumer  protection  operations.  The  first  is  that  the  Commission 
had  the  freedom  to  delve  into  uncharted  territory  when  the  threat  of  spyware  first 
became apparent. This flexibility allowed the FTC to build its knowledge of spyware 
early  enough  to  keep  pace  with  the  evolution  of  the  threat  that  it  posed.  Second, 
the  FTC  was  afforded  sufficient  resources  to  engage  in  the  complex,  technology-in-
tensive investigations that were necessary to identify unfair and deceptive practices 
and track down the perpetrators of those practices. Having the training and techno-
logical  expertise  to  identify  and  locate  spyware  purveyors  has  been  critical  to  the 
FTC’s success in this area. 

Freedom  to  chart  a  new  course  and  sufficient  resources  to  engage  in  technology- 
intensive investigations will undoubtedly be essential to the FTC’s consumer protec-
tion  mission  as  new  online  threats  arise.  Internet  scams  are  increasingly  complex, 
multi-national,  and  financially  motivated.  This  makes  enforcement  an  even  greater 
challenge that will require the FTC to think, act, and use its resources in new ways. 
The  success  of  the  FTC  spyware  enforcement  program  shows  what  a  strong  leader 
the  Commission  can  become  when  it  is  afforded  the  flexibility  and  resources  nec-
essary to tackle an emerging enforcement problem. As the FTC budget and perform-
ance plans are set for the coming years, these two aspects of FTC consumer protec-
tion  operations  should  be  fully  supported  and  augmented  as  necessary  to  ensure 
that  future  enforcement  efforts  may  be  as  successful  as  the  spyware  program  has 
been. 

9 See  In  the  Matter  of  Zango,  Inc.,  formerly  known  as  180solutions,  Inc.,  Keith  Smith,  and 
Daniel  Todd,  FTC  File  No.  052  3130  (filed  Nov.  3,  2006),  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/os/ 
caselist/0523130/index.htm;  In  the  Matter  of  DirectRevenue  LLC,  DirectRevenue  Holdings  LLC, 
Joshua Abram, Daniel Kaufman, Alan Murray, and Rodney Hook, FTC File No. 052 3131 (filed 
Feb. 16, 2007), available at http://ftc.gov/os/caselist/0523131/index.htm. 

10 I applaud the efforts that industry has made to develop and deploy new technologies to com-
bat spyware, and I hope that these efforts are just the beginning.’’ Chairman Majoras, ASC Pub-
lic Workshop, Feb. 9, 2006. 

11 Cindy  Skrzycki,  ‘‘Stopping  Spyware  at  the  Source,’’  Washington  Post,  March  6,  2007,  D01. 
12 ‘‘State  of  the  Net  2006,’’  ConsumerReports.org,  Sept.  2006,  http://www.consumer 

reports.org:80/cro/electronics-computers/online-protection–9–06/state-of-the-net/0609lonline- 
protlstate.htm,  and  ‘‘State  of  the  Net  2007,’’  ConsumerReports.org,  Sept.  2007,  http:// 
www.consumerreports.org/cro/electronics-computers/computers/internet-and-other-services/net- 
threats-9-07/overview/0709lnetlov.htm. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

73 

IV. International Cooperation is Essential 

The profusion of global commerce over the Internet complicates enforcement of on-
line  consumer  protections.  A  victim  of  Internet  crime  might  reside  in  the  United 
States, but the perpetrator might be overseas, outside the reach of U.S. law enforce-
ment. To protect against global fraud, the FTC was recently granted special author-
ity  to  work  with  its  counterparts  in  other  countries  by  the  U.S.  SAFE  WEB  Act. 
Collaboration  with  other  countries  requires  a  staff  that  is  knowledgeable  about 
cross-border  issues,  foreign  legal  regimes  and  processes,  and  broader  international 
issues pertinent to resolution of fraud questions. Building this knowledge base may 
necessitate  staff  exchanges,  so  that  staff  become  familiar  with  foreign  operations 
and build relationships with overseas counterparts. Domestically, the FTC will need 
to develop similar partnerships with U.S. investigative organizations—including the 
Department of Justice—that work on cross-border fraud. 

It is important to note that these partnerships also can be applied to address pri-
vacy  violations  that  occur  both  within  and  outside  of  the  United  States.  Privacy 
principles developed by the Asia Pacific Economic Cooperative (APEC), for example, 
anticipate the resolution of privacy violations that occur between the United States 
and countries in Asia.13 The resources, authority, and staff expertise required to ad-
dress  cross-border  fraud  will  be  similarly  required  to  address  privacy  violations 
across international borders. 

The U.S. SAFE WEB Act requires the FTC to undertake a comprehensive report-
ing  plan  and  deliver  updates  to  Congress  within  3  years  of  the  Act’s  passage.  Be-
cause there has been no public reporting of the Commission’s use of the Act to date, 
these Congressional reports will be essential in understanding how these powers are 
being used and if they are effective. 

V. Increased Privacy Threats Will Require Congressional Action 

Privacy  is  at  the  heart  of  online  consumer  protection.  Since  the  advent  of  wide-
spread  computing,  the  Internet  and  distributed  databases,  it  has  become  far  easier 
for businesses to collect, store and exchange information about their customers. Fre-
quently,  the  information  collected  includes  sensitive  or  personally  identifying  data, 
which,  if  not  properly  secured,  can  become  a  tool  for  identity  theft.  Companies  also 
may  use  this  data  to  track  consumer  preferences  and  behavior,  often  without  the 
consumer’s knowledge or permission. 

Despite this unprecedented threat, there is still no single comprehensive law that 
spells  out  consumer  privacy  rights.  Instead,  a  confusing  patchwork  of  distinct,  and 
sometimes  inadequate  or  nonexistent,  standards  has  developed  over  the  years,  pro-
ducing more than a few oddities. For example, we reserve our strongest privacy pro-
tections for cable and video records, while travel records and online purchasing data 
are  left  disturbingly  vulnerable,  financial  privacy  laws  have  major  exceptions,  and 
some important uses of ‘‘public records’’ are left unregulated. 

Over  the  past  9  years,  CDT  has  urged  Congress  to  enact  a  single  consistent  re-
gime,  based  on  fair  information  practice  principles.  Specifically,  consumers  should 
be able to: 

and 

transaction; 

• know which companies are collecting information from them; 
• provide only information necessary for a transaction; 
• find  out  what  companies  are  doing  with  this  information  beyond  the  original 
• know who else might have access to their personal data; 
• check to ensure that the data held about them is timely, accurate and complete; 
• obtain assurance that their information is held securely by all third parties. 
We believe that these protections are crucial to address the new threats faced by 
online consumers. Consumers need to be put back in control of their personal infor-
mation, so that privacy is preserved and fraud and abuse prevented. 

We urge the Senate Committee on Commerce, Science, and Transportation to once 
again  take  up  this  issue  to  ensure  that  consumers  are  adequately  protected.  The 
FTC  will  need  greater  resources  to  take  the  lead  on  implementing  such  legislation, 
but first Congress will need to provide the Commission with the backing authoriza-
tion to move forward. 

13 APEC  Privacy  Framework,  16  APEC  Ministierial  Meeting,  Nov.  2004,  http://www.apec 

.org/apec/newslmedia/2004lmedialreleases/201104lapecminsendorseprivacyfrmwk.html. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

74 

VI. Addressing the Common Carrier Exemption 

Another issue of growing concern that CDT raised at the last FTC reauthorization 

hearing has also remained unaddressed. 

The FTC for many years has asked that the exemption that prevents the Commis-
sion from exercising general jurisdiction over telecommunications ‘‘common carriers’’ 
be  rescinded.  The  idea  of  creating  a  level  playing  field  is  appealing,  particularly 
when  some  communications  services  fall  within  the  jurisdiction  of  the  FTC.  In  par-
ticular, lifting the restriction in certain areas—such as billing, advertising and tele-
marketing—would  ensure  that  the  agency  with  the  most  expertise  in  these  areas 
is taking a leading role. 

However, rescinding the exemption completely could lead to duplication of govern-
ment regulation and/or confusion for consumers in certain areas. For example, tele-
communications  companies  are  already  subject  to  the  Customer  Proprietary  Net-
work  Information  (CPNI)  rules  administered  by  the  Federal  Communications  Com-
mission,  which  limit  reuse  and  disclosure  of  information  about  individuals’  use  of 
the  phone  system  including  whom  they  call,  when  they  call,  and  other  features  of 
their phone service. At this point, we are not sure it would be wise to take this issue 
away  from  the  FCC.  Similar  questions  may  arise  with  other  issues:  Which  agency 
would  take  the  lead?  By  which  rules  would  a  complaint  about  deceptive  notice  be 
addressed? How will these decisions be made? 

The  FTC  has  been  thoughtful  in  these  areas  in  the  past,  so  it  is  likely  that  any 
concerns  could  be  addressed.  If  this  proposal  should  move  further,  the  Commission 
would  need  to  be  able  to  have  a  detailed  examination  and  plan  for  dealing  with 
similar areas of overlap including the kind of resources needed to dispatch its newly 
expanded  duties  in  the  telecommunications  space.  Congress  should  also  take  part 
in studying this issue further. 

VII. Conclusion 

mission. 

CDT  strongly  urges  the  Congress  to  finally  reauthorize  the  Federal  Trade  Com-

The  Internet  has  touched  every  sector  of  the  FTC’s  consumer  protection  mission, 
and  although  digital  innovations  have  simplified  some  tasks,  they  bring  their  own 
new  challenges  in  training,  education,  oversight,  and—perhaps  most  intensely—en-
forcement.  The  Commission  has  aptly  demonstrated  its  leadership  in  online  con-
sumer protection, and yet it is surviving with pre-Internet staffing. 

As privacy threats increase and become more international, demands on the Com-
mission will only grow. The Committee’s oversight of the FTC’s consumer protection 
mission increases in importance as more individuals move their activities online and 
we  thank  the  members  of  the  Subcommittee  for  recognizing  its  importance  and  in-
viting  us  to  address  these  issues  today.  We  look  forward  to  working  with  you  on 
these issues in the near future. 

Senator DORGAN. Mr. Schwartz, thank you very much. 
Next we will hear, finally, from Martin Abrams, who is the Exec-

utive Director of the Center for Information Policy Leadership. 

Mr. Abrams, thank you very much. 

STATEMENT  OF  MARTIN  E.  ABRAMS,  EXECUTIVE  DIRECTOR, 
CENTER  FOR  INFORMATION  POLICY  LEADERSHIP,  HUNTON 
& WILLIAMS LLP 
Mr.  ABRAMS.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  am  honored  to  be 

asked to testify on FTC reauthorization. 

I lead the Center for Information Policy Leadership, a think tank 
that develops policy solutions in an information age. We are located 
at the law firm of Hunton & Williams, and supported by 40 leading 
companies.  My  comments,  though,  are  my  own,  and  do  not  nec-
essarily  reflect  the  views  of  the  Center’s  members,  Hunton  &  Wil-
liams,  or  its  clients.  And  we  will  be  looking  forward  to  the  ques-
tions. 

Mr.  Chairman,  information  policies’  complexity  will  accelerate 
over the next 5 years like a race car on the first lap of the Indian-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

75 

apolis  500.  And  if  we  start  now  in  developing  governance  struc-
tures,  we  will  be  lucky  to  catch  up.  We  will  collect  more  data  in 
ways  we  never  anticipated,  just  yesterday.  More  of  that  data  will 
be  usable  by  analytic  systems,  and  those  analytic  systems  will  be 
used by more people in more places to answer more questions than 
we ever thought possible. Business analytics will be critical to busi-
ness success, international competitiveness, and meeting consumer 
expectations.  Global  teams  will  use  the  same  data  set  in  15  dif-
ferent  locations  all  at  the  same  time  without  worry  about  national 
borders,  and  consumers  need  to  be  protected  in  this  information- 
driven economy. 

The  FTC,  without  explicit  mandate  from  Congress,  has  done  a 
laudable  job  over  the  past  decade  as  the  government’s  information 
policy  development  agency.  They  have  anticipated  issues,  held 
hearings,  workshops,  town  halls,  and  requested  comments  nec-
essary to assure a fair market where consumers’ privacy and secu-
rity is protected. Mr. Chairman, we can no longer develop informa-
tion  policy  as  an  inferred  responsibility  related  to  a  consumer  en-
forcement  mandate.  Information  policy  in  an  information  age  is  as 
important as monetary policy in a capitalist society. The FTC reau-
thorization  must  include  information  policy  development  as  an  ex-
plicit responsibility for the agency. It must be funded at a level pro-
portionate to its importance to our economy. 

Information  policy  needs  to  be  staffed  by  a  mixture  of  expertise 
necessary to work with the best and the brightest in business, civil 
society,  and  academia.  And,  last,  the  function  needs  Congressional 
oversight  to  assure  the  FTC  does  the  job  necessary  to  protect  con-
sumers while maintaining a platform for successful commerce. This 
policy development function needs to look at new enforcement mod-
els  where  the  FTC  gives  oversight  to  bodies  empowered  to  resolve 
consumer  issues.  This  function  needs  the  stature  to  interface  with 
foreign  officials  on  equal  footing.  This  function  is  critical  to  a  safe 
and growing economy over the next 10 years. 

Thank you, and I would be pleased to respond to questions. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Abrams follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF MARTIN E. ABRAMS, EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, CENTER FOR 

INFORMATION POLICY LEADERSHIP, HUNTON & WILLIAMS LLP 

Distinguished Chairman, honorable Committee Members, I am Martin E. Abrams, 
Executive  Director  of  the  Center  for  Information  Policy  Leadership.  I  am  honored 
to  testify  on  information  policy,  and  the  opportunities  and  risks  to  maintaining  a 
safe marketplace for American consumers raised by new developments in the infor-
mation economy. 

The Center for Information Policy leadership was founded in 2001 by leading com-
panies and Hunton & Williams LLP. The Center was established to develop innova-
tive,  pragmatic  solutions  to  privacy  and  information  security  issues  that  reflect  the 
dynamic and evolving nature of information intensive business processes and at the 
same  time  respect  the  privacy  interests  of  individuals.  Since  its  establishment,  the 
Center  has  addressed  such  issues  as  conflicting  national  legal  requirements,  cross- 
border  data  transfers,  and  government  use  of  private  sector  data,  with  a  view  to 
how the future direction of business practices and emerging technologies will impact 
those issues. 

The Center and its forty-one member companies believe that difficult information 
policy issues must be resolved in a responsible fashion if we are to fully realize the 
benefits  of  an  information  age.  Center  experts  and  staff,  however,  speak  only  for 
themselves. My comments today reflect my views, and do not necessarily reflect the 
views  of  the  Center’s  member  companies,  Hunton  &  Williams  LLP,  or  any  firm  cli-
ents. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

I. Summary 

76 

The Federal Trade Commission is charged with many responsibilities as it carries 
out  its  mission  of  maintaining  a  safe  marketplace  for  American  consumers.  The 
Center has been privileged to work with the FTC on issues related to consumer pro-
tection  and  information  policy  development,  and  my  comments  today  focus  on  that 
aspect of the Commission’s work. 

The FTC is to be applauded for undertaking serious work to helping policymakers 
and  the  public  understand  issues  around  information  privacy  and  security  and  for 
its thoughtful, rigorous enforcement that improves the safety of the digital market-
place.  The  FTC  has  taken  on  complex,  fast-emerging  issues  and  taken  important 
steps  to  address  those  issues  through  policy  development  and  consumer  education. 
Going  forward,  however,  information  privacy  and  security  issues  will  only  become 
more complex and surface more quickly. 

• The  FTC  must  be  equipped  to  address  issues  related  to  information  security 
and  privacy  that  are  more  challenging  than  ever.  Emerging  technologies  for 
data  collection,  rapid  advances  in  business  analytics,  and  the  international  na-
ture  of  data  flows  challenge  traditional  frameworks  of  governance  and  make 
new demands on enforcement mechanisms. 
• FTC’s  role  in  enforcing  legal  requirements  for  privacy  and  information  security 
remains critical. Moreover, to foster consumer trust, the FTC must be prepared 
to  undertake  oversight  of  alternative  methods  of  enforcement  that  respond  to 
immediate  consumer  complaints  regarding  information  use  and  resolve  con-
sumer disputes with companies. 
• The FTC activity in development of information policy internationally is key to 
the  protection  of  American  consumers  in  the  global  marketplace.  The  Commis-
sion’s work in this area should be recognized and supported. 

Congress’ Reauthorization of the FTC should specifically acknowledge the growing 
importance  of  the  Commission’s  information  policy  development  mission,  and  fund 
its  expansion  to  match  the  complexity  of  the  information  marketplace.  As  part  of 
that  mission,  it  should  encourage  FTC  work  on  alternative  mechanisms  to  address 
consumer disputes related to information misuse as an adjunct to its traditional en-
forcement  role.  Congress’s  Reauthorization  should  recognize  and  encourage  the 
FTC’s  prominent  role  in  international  information  policy  development.  Having 
charged the agency with this mission, Congress should also provide oversight to en-
sure that it is successfully carried out. 
II.  The  FTC  must  be  equipped  to  address  increasingly  complex  and 
challenging  issues  related  to  information  security  and  privacy  that 
arise  from  rapid  developments  in  technology,  business  analytics  and 
international data flows 

The Commission plays a key role in the enforcement of laws governing the privacy 
and  security  of  information  and  in  the  development  of  forward-looking  public  pol-
icy—both  domestically  and  internationally—to  address  emerging  information  gov-
ernance  issues.  The  FTC  has  done  an  admirable  job  in  helping  policymakers  and 
the  public  understand  and  respond  to  issues  surrounding  information  privacy  and 
security  through  its  enforcement  actions  and  through  its  extensive  work  in  work-
shops, requests for comments and hearings to explore how best to act on these ques-
tions. It has provided clear guidance to the market while still allowing time for the 
market and self-regulation to respond. 

In  this  role,  the  FTC  has  taken  on  difficult  issues  related  to  companies’  compli-
ance  with  privacy  policies,  data  security  and  data  breach,  emerging  technologies 
such as RFID, and how to write privacy notices that effectively communicate to con-
sumers. 

The  complexity  of  these  issues,  however,  will  pale  in  comparison  to  those  on  the 
horizon, when digital personally identifiable information is ubiquitous, the marginal 
cost  of  collecting  and  aggregating  it  approaches  zero,  and  society  relies  even  more 
heavily on it for business, government, education, and health care. 

This  complexity  is  driven  in  large  part  by  three  developments:  the  emergence  of 
new  technologies  for  data  collection,  the  rapid  advances  in  business  analytics,  and 
the international nature of data flows. 
A. The Emergence of New Technologies for Data Collection 

The  collection  of  information  about  people  is  not  new.  Companies  have  collected 
data  by  phone,  at  points  of  sale,  online,  and  through  credit  applications.  Public 
record  information  collected  and  sorted  by  the  government  is  used  by  companies; 
businesses  and  organizations  also  purchase  information  compiled  by  other  compa-
nies about consumers. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

77 

New  data  collection  technologies,  however,  dramatically  change  the  way  and  the 
places  from  which  information  about  consumers  is  gathered.  They  vastly  increase 
the  amount  of  information  available  to  businesses.  Radio  devices  such  as  mobile 
telephones, global positioning systems, radio frequency identification tags and wire-
less  sensor  networks  collect  information  about  an  individual’s  location,  and  often 
their activity when they are at that location. Data accessed through search engines 
from social networks identify relationships between people, their interests and other 
individuals.  Information  collection  often  occurs  in  ways  that  do  not  involve  the  ac-
tive  engagement  of  the  consumer,  through  highway  toll  tags,  keystroke  monitoring, 
and security cameras. 

In  many  cases  these  technologies  make  it  unnecessary  for  businesses  to  engage 
in  collection,  compilation  and  organization  of  data  as  we  traditionally  think  about 
it.  Rather,  information  can  be  immediately  useful  as  it  is  accessed  through  the 
search  of  online,  publicly  available  resources  and  websites.  The  search,  matching 
and use of this information can occur dynamically and in real time. 

This ability to gather information in new environments, in real time, and without 
consumer  engagement  significantly  changes  the  interaction  between  the  data  col-
lector  and  the  individual,  and  strains  our  traditional  notions  of  how  best  to  protect 
the  privacy  interests  of  individuals  in  information  that  pertains  to  them.  Increas-
ingly  the  FTC  will  need  to  understand  this  new  dynamic  and  to  consider  creative, 
more  effective  approaches  to  protecting  the  consumers’  interest  in  the  privacy  of 
their personal information. 
B. The Rapid Development of Business Analytics 

The application of analytics enables businesses to use information to create value. 
Business  analytics  includes  data  warehousing,  data  mining,  business  intelligence, 
enterprise  performance,  management  and  data  visualization.  The  analysis  applied 
by credit reporting organizations to the data they received was an early application 
of  data  analytics  about  people,  allowing  credit  grantors  to  offer  credit  to  consumers 
of  more  widely  varied  credit  backgrounds  while  still  managing  and  making  appro-
priate decisions about risk. 

Today, businesses of all sizes use information analytics to predict response, profit-
ability, return visits, and price tolerance. Government agencies use analytics to pre-
dict risk and evaluate passengers for flight security and safety, and to manage fraud 
related to health care reimbursement. 

In his paper, ‘‘The Future of Business Analytics,’’ Bruce McCabe 1 describes a 10- 
year  view  of  emerging  analytics  technologies  and  how  they  will  impact  industries, 
organizations  and  the  workplace.  The  paper  offers  detailed  predictions  about  the 
way  in  which  we  will  analyze  and  use  data  to  predict  consumer  behavior,  enhance 
marketing,  and  meeting  consumer  needs.  He  predicts  that  analysis  of  the  informa-
tion gathered through location tracking devices will enable organizations to gain en-
tirely new insights about their assets, staff, customers, and products. Analysis of in-
formation  gathered  through  audio  and  video  will  quickly  grow  in  importance.  Busi-
ness  analytics  systems  will  be  able  to  take  advantage  of  new  algorithms  to  draw 
inferences  from  material  in  discussion  forums,  customer  feedback,  and  e-commerce 
and  auctions  sites,  to  infer  overall  positive  or  negative  sentiment  about  companies 
and products. 

McCabe  asserts  that  analytic  applications—now  only  in  their  infancy—will  grow 
significantly  because  of  three  factors.  First,  the  cost  of  technology  will  continue  to 
go  down  as  its  power  increases.  Second,  the  volume  of  data  available  for  analysis 
will  continue  to  grow.  Finally,  unstructured  data  that  is  not  usable  today,  such  as 
digital  pictures,  will  feed  analytic  engines  as  a  result  of  improvements  in  natural 
language processing, search, inference and categorization. 
C. The International Nature of Data Flows 

Almost  all  business  processes  have  become  international.  Consumer  services  are 
supplied  out  of  India,  accounts  payable  out  of  Costa  Rica,  software  development  is 
conducted  in  the  Ukraine,  and  clinical  trials  are  conducted  in  as  many  as  twenty 
countries all at the same time. One global team meeting might require twenty pro-
fessionals  to  an  look  at  the  same  data  sets  originating  from  servers  in  twenty  dif-
ferent countries. Industries as diverse as pharmaceuticals, automotive, software de-
velopment and cosmetics all rely on global teaming and global sourcing. These busi-

1 Bruce  McCabe  is  the  managing  director  of  S2  Intelligence  Pty  Ltd,  a  company  he  founded 
in 2002 to research technology issues for Australian executives and policy-makers. Before found-
ing  S2,  McCabe  held  senior  research  positions  at  Gartner  and  IDC.  His  paper,  sponsored  by 
Business Object Australia, is attached for the Committee’s review. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00081 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

78 

ness  processes  require  massive  flows  of  data  across  international  borders  in  order 
to work. 

All  of  this  data  must  be  protected  from  loss  and  alteration,  and  all  of  it  must  be 
used  appropriately  no  matter  where  in  the  world  it  is  accessed.  The  FTC  has  ap-
plied the Gramm-Leach-Bliley safeguards rule 2 to global sourcing whether managed 
by the company or outsourced to a third party company. 

The  U.S.  SAFE  WEB  Act 3 passed  by  the  last  Congress  gives  the  FTC  authority 
to  work  with  privacy  enforcement  agencies  in  other  countries  to  protect  American 
consumers.  Criminals  in  other  countries  use  the  Internet  to  prey  on  American  con-
sumers, and the SAFE WEB Act gives the FTC the authority to pursue those crimi-
nals. 

Because of the international nature of these data flows, the FTC must be involved 
in  development  of  international  frameworks  for  data  protection.  It  must  be  empow-
ered  within  those  frameworks  to  protect  American  consumers  when  their  data  is 
overseas. 

The  FTC’s  international  office  and  FTC  Commissioners  have  also  participated  in 
meetings at the Asia Pacific Economic Cooperative (APEC) and the Organization for 
Economic Cooperation and Development (OECD). This will be a growing function for 
the FTC if the Commission is to effectively promote American interests in providing 
balanced protections for information and ensure that consumers have redress when 
their privacy has been compromised. 
III. The FTC must continue its enforcement under Section 5 of the FTC Act, 
and  begin  to  undertake  an  oversight  role  for  alternative  consumer 
complaint and dispute resolution mechanisms. 

The  FTC  has  a  well  deserved  reputation  in  the  United  States  and  around  the 
world  as  a  tough  enforcer  of  privacy  and  information  security  requirements.  The 
Commission  has  used  its  power  under  the  Federal  Trade  Commission  Act,4 as  well 
as specific laws such as CAN–SPAM,5 Fair Credit Reporting Act,6 and the Gramm- 
Leach-Bliley-Act.7 

This  enforcement  role  is  key  to  fostering  consumer  trust  in  the  marketplace. 
Using  its  authority  under  these  laws,  the  FTC  protects  consumers  by  enforcing  the 
law against bad actors for their specific illegal practices. In doing so, it sends a clear 
message about appropriate business practices related to information privacy and se-
curity,  encouraging  the  reliability  and  trustworthiness  of  the  information  market-
place. However, as a fairly small agency with limited resources, the FTC cannot in-
vestigate  every  occurrence  of  market  abuse.  Moreover,  it  has  neither  the  authority 
nor the resources to resolve individual consumer complaints. 

However, trust in the marketplace remains an important issue to consumers and 
critical  to  the  health  of  the  information-fueled  market.  Research  conducted  by 
Yankelovich  in  2004 8 about  consumer  attitude  toward  industry  information  prac-
tices  demonstrates  that  consumer  trust  in  the  information-driven  marketplace  is 
limited.  At  the  core  of  these  trust  issues  is  the  consumer’s  inability  to  resolve  dis-
putes about instances of misuse or mishandling of their personal information. 

While the FTC is not the place to bring consumer complaints, it is well positioned 
to  oversee  market  mechanisms  to  resolve  consumer  complaints  about  information 
practices. In the future accountability agents—entities to oversee business practices 
and  assist  consumers  who  are  unable  attain  satisfactory  resolution  of  complaints— 
will  likely  fill  the  gap  of  consumer  dispute  resolution.  For  example,  industry  safe 
harbors, will incorporate mechanisms not only to enforce safe harbor provisions, but 
also to resolve complaints brought by consumers related to inappropriate use or fail-
ure to protect their information.9 This new FTC role as a regulator of accountability 
agents  could  be  substantially  similar  to  the  oversight  of  the  Securities  and  Ex-
change Commission for self-regulatory bodies that enforce securities regulations. 

2 15 U.S.C. § 6801 through 15 U.S.C. § 6809. 
3 Pub. L. No. 109–455. 
4 15 U.S.C. §§ 41–51. 
5 15 U.S.C. 7701., et seq. 
6 15 U.S.C. § 1681 et seq. 
7 15 U.S.C. Sec. 6801–6809. 
8 Yankelovich, Re-building the bonds of trust: state of consumer trust, crisis of confidence Pre-
sented to: 10th Annual Fred Newell Customer Relationship Management Conference 2004 avail-
able  at  www.compad.au/cms/prinfluences/workstation/upFiles/955316.StateloflConsumerl 
TrustlReportlFinal for Distribution.pdf. 

9 Accountability  agents  will  likely  be  very  similar  to  self-regulatory  enforcement  bodies  that 
currently  exist  for  securities  regulation  and  that  are  overseen  by  the  Securities  and  Exchange 
Commission. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00082 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

79 

This  Commission’s  role  is  anticipated  in  the  APEC  Privacy  Framework,  adopted 
by  APEC  leaders  in  2004.  The  APEC  Framework  calls  for  the  transfer  of  data  in 
the Asia Pacific region based on corporate cross-border privacy rules. Under the cur-
rent  vision  for  the  Framework’s  implementation,  rules  would  be  approved  by  ac-
countability  agencies  in  the  various  APEC  economies,  including  the  United  States. 
The  FTC  and  other  privacy  regulating  agencies  in  the  United  States  would  oversee 
these  accountability  agencies.  In  the  context  of  the  APEC  discussions,  the  FTC  has 
been considering how it would best execute that role. 
IV.  The  FTC  must  continue  its  role  in  policy  development,  both 

domestically and internationally 

The FTC plays a key role in the development of effective, forward-thinking infor-
mation  policy  in  the  United  States  and  around  the  world.  The  FTC  embraced  this 
role  when  it  held  its  first  workshop  on  privacy-related  issues  more  than  a  decade 
ago. Its domestic policy development work continues with its recent request for com-
ments on the issue of public sector use of the Social Security number and the town 
hall meeting on behavioral marketing on the Internet scheduled for November 1 and 
2. 

While policy development is not explicitly articulated in the FTC Act as a role for 
the  Commission,  continued  FTC  involvement  in  this  work  is  critical  to  the  success-
ful  development  of  sound  public  policy  and  effective,  efficient  consumer  protection 
related to information issues. 

This policy development role is especially necessary as the United States and the 
world  economy  continues  to  move  more  deeply  into  an  economy  fueled,  structured 
and motivated around the collection, use, analysis and sharing of information. This 
transition  fundamentally  challenges  application  of  laws  and  regulations  originally 
enacted  to  respond  to  the  demands  of  an  industrial  economy  and  the  early  years 
of  computerization.  The  FTC  has  become,  and  should  continue  to  be,  a  key  venue 
for  development  of  policies  to  address  new  developments  in  the  information  econ-
omy. 

The  FTC  has  been  significantly  involved  in  the  development  of  global  processes 
to protect consumers in global markets. Just as data flows and valuable uses of data 
occur  across  borders,  criminals  also  can  act  regardless  of  national  boundaries.  The 
FTC has been actively participating in alliances to develop international governance 
structures  for  international  data  flows.  Led  by  Commissioner  William  Kovacic,  it 
works  through  the  OECD  Working  Party  on  Information  Security  and  Privacy 
(WPISP) to develop protocols to enable cooperation between law enforcement bodies 
of various countries to promote privacy protection. The FTC also works with the Ca-
nadian  Federal  Privacy  Commissioner  to  foster  cooperation  with  this  leading  trade 
partner. 

Additionally,  the  Commission  has  been  deeply  involved  in  development  of  the 
APEC  Global  Framework.  The  FTC  is  an  active  participant  in  the  APEC  Data  Pri-
vacy  Subgroup,  and  part  of  the  Subgroup’s  Working  Party  on  Cross-border  Privacy 
Rules. Ministers of APEC countries, including the United States, approved a project 
to  develop  protocols  for  approving  corporate  rules  covering  the  transfer  of  data 
across  borders  just  2  weeks  ago.  Once  developed,  these  mechanisms  would  protect 
American  consumers  as  data  that  pertains  to  them  moves  throughout  the  Asia  Pa-
cific  region.  Under  Commissioner  Pamela  Harbor’s  leadership,  the  FTC  has  taken 
a leadership role in developing these protocols, demonstrating to other APEC econo-
mies the serious commitment of the United States to ensuring the privacy and secu-
rity of its citizen’s data and the APEC Privacy Framework. 

To  facilitate  these  efforts,  the  FTC  restructured  its  staff  this  year  to  merge  all 
international activities into a common office that reports to the Office of the Chair-
man.  The  FTC’s  work  in  international  forums  should  be  acknowledged  as  part  of 
the reauthorization and supported in future FTC budget requests. 
V. Conclusion 

The  challenges  raised  by  the  fast  approaching  developments  in  the  information 
economy  cannot  be  met  with  yesterdays  solutions.  Protecting  the  privacy  and  secu-
rity  of  consumers’  information  will  require  robust  information  policy  that  responds 
quickly  and  effectively  to  the  issues  raised  by  emerging  technologies,  business  ana-
lytics  and  international  exposure.  The  FTC  began  the  information  policy  process  in 
the  United  States  over  a  decade  ago.  That  effort  has  been  an  adjunct  to  its  con-
sumer protection mission, and while admirably carried out, not sufficient for tomor-
row’s challenges. 

Development  of  solid  information  policy  guidance  requires  a  better-funded  FTC 
with a defined mission to develop information policy guidance for the United States 
and  to  participate  in  international  policy  development  related  to  privacy  and  secu-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00083 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

80 

rity.  It  also  requires  research  into  new,  creative  mechanisms  for  enforcing  privacy 
and security requirements in a rapidly evolving marketplace. It means staffing with 
technologists and other experts who will work with academia, industry and civil so-
ciety to develop tomorrow’s answers. The FTC must find ways to delegate and over-
see  mechanisms  to  resolve  consumer  disputes.  Finally,  this  mission  must  include 
participation  in  international  policy  forums  in  a  capacity  co-equal  to  international 
data protection authorities. Congress’ role in this effort is to clearly charge the FTC 
with this mission and encourage its success through regular oversight. 

Thank you again for the opportunity to testify. The Center looks forward to work-
ing  with  the  Committee  and  the  Commission  to  develop  innovative,  balanced  solu-
tions to information privacy and security issues that foster a vital, safe marketplace. 

ATTACHMENT 

S2 Intelligence—May 2007 

THE FUTURE OF BUSINESS ANALYTICS 

Bruce McCabe 

The  rate  at  which  digital  information  is  being  produced  is  increasing  exponen-
tially.  At  the  same  time,  computer  scientists  are  making  it  possible  for  machines 
to  navigate  new  information  landscapes,  conduct  deeper  and  more  sophisticated 
analysis  of  what  they  find,  and  deliver  the  results  in  more  usable  and  timely  ways 
to  managers.  This  paper  looks  at  how  business  analytics  will  change  over  the  next 
10  years,  the  impact  of  these  changes  on  organisations,  and  how  this  will  lead  to 
new opportunities and challenges in the workplace. 
Introduction 

In  recent  years,  business  analytics  has  become  a  topic  of  particular  interest  for 
managers; the combination of new software capabilities and large amounts of usable 
data  has  been  delivering  consistently  good  results  for  organisations  in  every  indus-
try. A study of IT projects delivering greatest value in Australia identified business 
analytics as one of three dominant themes 1 and global companies such as Amazon, 
Capital  One,  Marriot  International,  UPS  and  Proctor  &  Gamble  have  secured  sub-
stantial  competitive  advantages  through  superior  analysis  of  their  data  assets.2 
Analytics  solutions  (there  is  usually  more  than  one)  can  be  found  in  every  corpora-
tion and every major government agency, and IT managers are discovering, to their 
surprise,  that  the  investment  needed  is  often  relatively  modest  compared  to  the 
value  returned.  Common  applications  of  analytics  in  organisations  are  listed  in 
Table 1. 

Table 1.—Common Applications of Business Analytics 

Sales trends and forecasts 
Cross-sell/up-sell recommendation 
Marketing campaign effectiveness 
Product mix in stores 
Retail layout, shelf allocation 
Contextual placement of advertising 
Website structuring and linking 
Shopping patterns, purchasing triggers 
Capacity utilisation in airlines, hotels 
Service priority in call centres 
Call centre efficiency 
Frequently asked questions generation 
Expense budgeting 
Procurement optimisation 
Distribution channel selection 
Logistics modelling 
Scheduling and routing of vehicles 

Production scheduling 
Inventory optimisation 
Supply chain bottlenecks 
Product quality analysis 
Predictive machine maintenance 
Manufacturing process costing 
Asset deployment/utilisation 
Human resource benchmarking 
Salary/productivity benchmarking 
Warranty trends 
Network security/threat detection 
Assessing operational risk 
Fraud detection 
Money laundering detection 
Credit risk for loan approvals 
Loss risk in insurance 
Likelihood of future illness 

This  paper  sets  out  to  examine  the  future  and  answer  the  question:  How  will 
emerging technologies shape the way analytics are used in business over the next 10 

1 McCabe, B., 2003, High Value Projects in Australian Enterprises, S2 Intelligence. 
2 See  Davenport,  H.,  2006,  ‘‘Competing  on  analytics,’’  Harvard  Business  Review,  vol.  84,  no. 

1, pp. 98–107. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00084 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

81 

years?  It  is  written  for  business  people.  The  main  focus,  therefore,  is  on  business 
outcomes, not IT projects; all managers can use it as they plan for emerging oppor-
tunities, challenges and changes through to 2017. 
Sponsorship 

The publication of this paper was kindly sponsored by Business Objects Australia 
Pty  Ltd,  a  supplier  of  business  analytics  solutions.  More  information  can  be  found 
at www.australia.businessobjects.com. 
Using this document 

The  discussion  in  this  paper  is  presented  in  two  parts.  Part  I  describes  the  key 
technology  trends  shaping  the  future  of  analytics.  Part  II  describes  how  analytics 
will shape the future of business. 

Predictions are made throughout this paper. Predictions are valuable for planners 
because  they  force  the  researcher  to  distil  complex  ideas  into  best  guesses,  based 
on  what  is  known  now,  and  give  the  lay  person  a  single  crystallised  picture  of  a 
likely future. They offer a point that can be communicated and debated, and which 
can trigger new ideas. 

To  get  the  most  out  of  this  document,  managers  are  encouraged  to  discuss  these 
predictions  with  colleagues  in  the  context  of  the  products,  services,  markets,  com-
petitors and goals applicable to their own organisation. 

While  the  predictions  are  written  as  if  factual  statements  about  the  future,  they 
are, of course, nothing of the sort. Many assumptions—about the pace of technology 
development,  commercial  value,  social  acceptance  and  rate  of  deployment—lie  be-
hind each. The only prediction that can be made with absolute certainty is that real 
outcomes will vary in scale, detail and timing—especially timing. 

Managers  are  encouraged,  therefore,  to  also  read  through  the  underlying  tech-
nology trends described in Part I. By being conscious of these trends, they can equip 
themselves  to  adjust  their  plans  when  they  encounter  new  technologies  and  hear 
about new breakthroughs. 
Terminology 

The  most  useful  way  to  discuss  the  future  is  to  set  boundaries  broadly  enough 
to  capture  everything  that  matters.  For  the  purposes  of  this  document,  therefore, 
S2 Intelligence defines business analytics as computer analysis of information to as-
sist managers with business decisions. 

This definition includes data warehousing, data mining, business intelligence, en-
terprise performance management, date visualisation, executive dashboards, supply- 
chain  analytics  and  many  other  themes  current  in  business  today.  It  is  also  broad 
enough to include future, yet to be seen analytics methods and applications. 

When the word routine is used in predictive statements (e.g., ‘‘managers will rou-
tinely track online sentiment ratings’’) it refers to when a technology or practice has 
been adopted by a wide range of organisations (i.e., not just leaders and early adopt-
ers) for everyday use. 

A  knowledge  worker  is  a  person  that  works  primarily  with  information  (as  op-

posed to applying physical or manual skills) in their day to day activities. 

When  referring  to  the  size  of  organisations,  the  following  Australian  Bureau  of 
Statistics  derived  conventions  are  used:  small  enterprises  employ  1–19  people;  me-
dium  enterprises  employ  20–200  people;  large  enterprises  employ  200  or  more  peo-
ple. 
Methods 

The primary source of data for this report was the repository of approximately 700 
face-to-face  and  telephone  interviews  conducted  by  S2  Intelligence  with  computer 
scientists, IT practitioners, researchers, business executives, policy-makers and tech-
nology leaders since 2005. 

Secondary sources include academic journals, conference proceedings, websites re-
lating to emerging analytics products and services, and previous S2 Intelligence re-
search  where  business  analytics  has  emerged  as  a  theme.  These  are  referenced  in 
the text. 

On  completion,  a  draft  copy  of  this  paper  was  sent  to  18  computer  scientists,  re-
searchers  and  product  managers  with  expertise  in  various  aspects  of  business  ana-
lytics.  Feedback  received  from  them  was  incorporated  into  the  final  version  before 
publication. 
Feedback 

S2 Intelligence continuously revises and updates its forecasts: all comments, ideas 
and alternative viewpoints on this document are warmly welcomed and can be sent 
to Info@s2intelligence.com.au. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00085 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

82 

Part I: Technology Trends 

The  key  technology  trends  shaping  the  future  of  business  analytics  relate  to  the 
information  that  can  be  analysed,  the  sophistication  of  analysis  that  can  be  per-
formed,  and  improvements  in  how  results  can  be  delivered.  These  may  be  thought 
of as analogous to the same three themes that define the capabilities of all computer 
applications—input, processing and output. 
1. Processing and storage hardware 

The  cost  of  processing  power  and  computer  storage  will  continue  to  fall  steadily. 
This is a fundamental trend that underpins advances in all types of computer appli-
cations.  It  will  be  driven  in  part  through  continuing  advances  in  design  sophistica-
tion and manufacturing processes. It will also be driven by increasingly efficient use 
of hardware as organisations move to server and storage farms and apply new tech-
niques to allocate workload more evenly across these assets. 
2. Information volume 

The  volume  of  digital  information  being  produced  will  continue  to  grow  at  an  ex-
tremely  rapid  rate.  No-one  can  quantify  this  exactly,  but  we  can  get  some  sense  of 
scale  from  a  2003  study  that  estimated  the  amount  of  new  information  being  cre-
ated  every  year,  and  stored  on  print,  film,  magnetic,  and  optical  storage  media,  to 
be 5 exabytes per annum—an amount equal to the information contained in 37,000 
libraries the size of the U.S. Library of Congress.3 The majority of this is stored on 
hard  disk  drives,  and  annual  production  is  estimated  to  be  growing  by  30  percent 
year-on-year. These calculations, it should be noted, apply only to new information- 
they exclude duplication of existing information. 

Wherever new pools of business information are created in digital form, new ana-
lytics  opportunities  will  follow  closely.  An  example  of  this  has  been  in  the  creation 
of purchasing data. Early adopters of electronic requisitioning and procurement sys-
tems reported their biggest financial benefit came not from efficient use of supplier 
discounts or fewer purchasing errors, but from analysing the new data they had on 
their  purchasing.4 Other  new  pools  of  data  include  audio,  video  and  spatial  data, 
described in the pages below. 

Not  all  digital  information,  however,  is  analysable  by  computers.  We  can  think 
of this in terms of the illustration in Figure 1. The outer cloud represents the total 
pool  of  digital  information-growing  fast  but  much  of  it  off  limits  to  computer-based 
analysis. The inner cloud represents the pool of analysable information, which is ex-
panding  as  (a)  software  gets  better  at  dealing  with  unstructured  data,  and  (b)  ma-
chine-friendly structure is added to some types of information. 
3. Unstructured information 

Most  new  digital  information  exists  in  the  form  of  text,  images,  audio  and  video 
that  has  little  structure  or  organisation.  While  it  is  relatively  easy  for  humans  to 
analyse  small  portions  of  it  (by  browsing  the  web,  reading  through  documents  and 
making notes, for example), computers run into difficulties because they are best at 
processing  information  that  is  highly  structured  (organised,  for  example,  using 
standardised formats, fields, records, labels and hierarchies). 

An  especially  important  trend,  therefore,  will  be  steady  improvement  in  the  abil-
ity for computers to navigate and process unstructured information through natural 
language processing, search, inference and categorisation.5 
4. Structured information 

Separately,  more  structure  is  being  added  to  various  information  landscapes 
through  wider  application  of  machine-readable  labels,  tags  and  rules  (metadata) 
that act as signposts for computers, enabling them to contextualise the information 
that they find. 

Adding  structure  data  in  this  way  is  powerful,  but  it  also  requires  agreement  on 
labels,  tags  and  rules  by  all  interested  parties.  Consequently,  industry  wide  stand-
ards  initiatives—which  must  factor  for  competing  needs  across  thousands  of 
organisations—will  remain  slow.  Faster  progress  will  be  concentrated  where  there 
is especially strong value in undertaking this work, and where a few dominant play-
ers  can  force  the  pace.  Where  industry  wide  initiatives  gain  traction  (the  strongest 

3 See  How  much  information?  2003  at  http://www2.sims.berkeley.edu/research/projects/ 

4 McCabe, B., 2003, Supplier Relationship Management in Australia and New Zealand, S2 In-

howmuch-info-2003/. 

telligence. 

5 GeneWays is an example of natural language processing applied to analyse unstructured re-
search  articles  (in  this  case  to  identify  molecular  pathways  for  healthcare,  bioinformatics,  and 
pharmaceuticals purposes). See http://geneways.genomecenter.columbia.edu/. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00086 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

candidates are health and life sciences) they will significantly boost the possibilities 
for computer-based analysis.6 

83 

5. Location 

Location-based  (spatial)  digital  information  will  increase  exponentially.  Much  of 
this will be accompanied by time-based information. A key driver is the proliferation 
of  spatially  aware  radio  devices—mobile  telephones,  WiFi,  GPS,  radio-frequency 
identification  (RFID)  tags,  wireless  sensor  networks—as  the  costs  of  these  tech-
nologies fall. Other drivers include the dramatically improved usability of online lo-
cation-based  services  (especially  via  spatial  browsers  such  as  Google  Earth/Maps). 
These  enable  businesses  to  ‘‘mash-up’’  information,  services  and  maps  and  publish 
these to any employee or customer that has access to a browser, for almost no cost. 
As  location-aware  devices  and  services  proliferate,  so  too  will  the  amount  of  useful 
data  stored  within  organisations,  most  of  it  in  a  structured  form  that  lends  itself 
well to analytics. 
6. Images, audio and video 

The  ability  to  interpret  the  contents  of  digital  images  will  improve  steadily.  Ana-
lytics  software  will  move  beyond  mining  textual  metadata  associated  with  images 
(i.e.,  the  descriptions  and  tags  stored  with  them)  to  analysing  the  content  of  many 
images on the fly.7,8 

Continuous  media,  in  the  form  of  audio  and  video  files,  are  extremely  rich  in  in-
formation.  At  the  same  time,  however,  they  are  notoriously  difficult  for  computers 
to navigate and interpret. Business analysis is typically limited to what human op-
erators can watch/listen to and write up in reports. For most businesses this means 
audio and video is excluded from computer-based analysis. 

Steady progress is being made in technologies to navigate and analyse continuous 
media  files.  The  quantity  and  value  of  this  information,  especially  collected  via  the 
call centre, and posted on the web, provides a strong imperative to apply it in busi-
ness. 

Developments  in  the  application  of  natural  language  technologies  to  transcribe 
the  speech  found  within  continuous  media  files  are  especially  important.  When 
soundtracks  are  converted  to  text  they  can  be  much  more  easily  searched  and 
analysed. A ready benchmark for progress here is the quality of current online serv-
ices for searching video.9 

Structure  is  also  being  added  to  continuous  media  files.  Researchers  have  devel-
oped  new  languages  for  describing  and  time-stamping  events  within  clips,  and  new 

6 The  Semantic  Web  is  an  important  set  of  initiatives  aimed  at  applying  more  structure  to 
the  web  to  make  it  easier  for  computers  to  navigate.  See  http://www.w3.org/2001/sw/  for  in-
formation on current activities. 

7 See  Polar  Rose,  www.polarrose.com,  for  an  application  of  analytics  to  online  images  today. 
8 A  recent  paper  about  the  cutting  edge  of  image  search  and  retrieval  is  Carneiro,  G.,  Chan, 
A.B., et al, 2007, Supervised Learning of Semantic Classes for Image Annotation and Retrieval, 
IEEE Transactions on Pattern Analysis and Machine Intelligence, Vol 29, No 3, pp 394–410. 

9 See, for example, www.blinkx.tv. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00087 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

.

s
p
e
1
M
A
R
B
A
2
1
9

84 

containers  for  keeping  descriptions  with  the  audio  or  video  component.10 As  these 
mature,  continuous  media  files  will  be  transported  across  the  web  with  fully  tran-
scribed,  time-sequenced  audio  tracks,  and  will  become  as  easy  to  analyse  as  ordi-
nary text. 
7. Social links 

Social  networks  are  important  targets  for  analysis.  Identifying  relationships  be-
tween  people,  their  interests,  and  other  people  is  extremely  valuable  in  business, 
and the proliferation of websites offering services built around sharing, collaboration 
and  networking,  a  phenomenon  sometimes  labelled  ‘‘Web  2.0’’  is  driving  an  expo-
nential increase in information relating to connections between people. 

This  type  of  information  is  already  associated  with  structures  that  can  help  com-
puter navigation, including e-mail directories, links through citations, dates on blog 
entries,  and  common  membership  of  online  communities 11 and  business 
workgroups.  Semantic  web  initiatives  will  play  a  role  in  providing  structure  as 
well.12 

Computer  scientists  are  making  rapid  progress  in  analysing  this  type  of  data  for 
business  purposes.  An  example  is  conflict  of  interest  detection,  where  experimental 
systems  are  detecting  potential  conflicts  by  analysing  multiple  online  social  net-
works together.13 
8. Search 

The  link  between  developments  in  search  technologies  and  developments  in  busi-
ness  analytics  will  get  stronger.  Computers  must  be  able  to  find  data  before  they 
can analyse it. Each step forward in refining the outputs of search engines also rep-
resents an improvement in the data that can be sourced for analytics engines. Spe-
cialist  audio  mining  tools  already  allow,  for  example,  keyword  searches  of  news 
clips,  earnings  announcements  and  recorded  briefings.  This  also  applies  to  search 
within organisations: enterprise search is rapidly improving in scale and sophistica-
tion  and  soon  every  knowledge  worker  will  have  the  contents  of  their  PC  indexed 
by  a  desktop  search  engine.  The  parallels  with  search  extend  to  interfaces,  with 
analytics  software  progressively  adopting  the  flexibility  and  familiarity  of  search 
interfaces to improve accessibility by non-specialist employees. 
9. Broader, deeper insights 

Computer  scientists  are  pushing  ahead  in  a  range  of  fields—machine  learning, 
data modelling, simulation, categorisation, abstraction, inference engines, heuristics 
and constraint programming—that will make computer analysis deeper, more accu-
rate, and more useful. 

Analytics  systems  will  be  able  to  consider  more  variables  when  producing  rec-
ommendations. Advances in constraint programming will see business computer sys-
tems  consider  more  variables  when  producing  recommendations.  The  quality  of 
analysis of the complex, multivariate problems common in logistics, scheduling, and 
rostering will improve steadily. 

The emphasis in analytics systems will steadily shift from measuring to modelling 
business  trends  and  processes.  Machine  learning  methods  will  help  computers  gen-
erate their own data models, instead of being constrained to human-generated mod-
els  when  trying  to  identify  correlations  and  relationships.14 Analytics  systems  will 
progressively incorporate the ability to identify gaps in their own knowledge. 
10. Presentation and usability 

In  business  situations,  timely  approximations  can  be  invaluable,  while  analysis 
that  arrives  after  a  decision  has  been  made  is  worthless.  As  the  scale  and  com-
plexity  of  information  fed  into  business  analytics  increases,  so  too  will  the  impor-
tance  of  abstraction,  summarisation,  delivery  and  presentation.  The  most  valuable 
systems  will  be  those  that  distil  data  from  many  sources  into  simple  pictures  that 
managers can digest and act on quickly. Technology developments will produce sys-
tems that become progressively better at: 

• Producing simpler and more visual data views and reports. 

10 An important example is www.annodex.org. 
11 E.g., LinkedIn and MySpace at www.linkedin.com and www.myspace.com. 
12 See, for example, The Friend-of-a-Friend (FOAF) Project, www.foaf-project.org. 
13 See, for example: Alaman-Meza, B., Nagarajan, M., et. al,, 2006, ‘‘Semantic Analytics on So-
cial  Networks:  Experiences  in  Addressing  the  Problem  of  Conflict  of  Interest  Detection,’’  Pro-
ceedings  of  the  15th  international  conference  on  the  World  Wide  Web,  pp  407–416,  Edinburgh. 
14 The  STaRControl  project  exemplifies  advanced  modelling  and  machine  learning  in  the  con-
text  of  traffic  analysis.  See  http://nicta.com.au/director/research/projects/sltolz/star/ 
starcontrol.cfm. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00088 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

85 

more specific recommendations. 

and priority that individual users prefer. 

• Allowing  data  views  and  reports  to  be  generated  by  non-specialist  employees. 
• Abstraction  and  summarisation,  to  give  managers  more  concise  output  and 
• Learning  from  previous  requests  so  that  information  is  displayed  in  the  order 
• Assessing  timing,  so  that  software  fades  into  the  background  during  ‘‘business 
as  usual’’  periods  but  actively  pushes  information  to  users  when  it  is  of  high 
relevance or urgency. 
• Tailoring  output  to  suit  the  device  (e.g.,  phone,  PDA,  laptop,  web  browser)  and 
context (static, mobile, making a tactical decision or preparing a strategic plan). 
• Being  easily  accessible  from  familiar  and  everyday  applications  such  as  Micro-

soft Office. 

11. Software as a service 

An  increasing  proportion  of  all  business  software  will  be  provided  to  customers 
in  the  form  of  a  service  that  is  accessed  over  the  web,  as  opposed  to  a  product  in-
stalled in the customer’s business. This is a gradual, but fundamental IT trend. The 
important  technical  drivers  are  improvements  in  software  architecture,  integration 
technologies (see Section 12) and network infrastructure. 

Economic drivers are equally important. Decision makers are attracted to the no-
tion  of  no  upfront  investment,  predictable  annual  costs,  and  leaving  the  manage-
ment of software, including upgrades and patches, to providers. Pricing and service 
models will mature rapidly through the next 5 years. 
12. Web services 

Global take-up of web services—ubiquitous web based standards for software inte-
gration—will  make  connecting  software  applications  within  and  between 
organisations  dramatically  more  cost  effective.  As  the  cost  of  integration  falls,  and 
major  software  suppliers  gradually  move  to  supply  their  products  in  more 
modularised form, it will become easier to connect analytics engines with financials, 
office  productivity  software,  specialised  purchasing  software,  planning  and  collabo-
rative tools, CRM packages other analytics systems and any number of applications 
and information services available on the web. 

This trends applies to individuals as well as organisations: it will become steadily 
easier for any individual to put together and publish their own integrated combina-
tions  of  web  applications,  as  we  are  seeing  with  mash-ups  of  mapping  services 
today. 
13. Privacy preserving technologies 

The  maturation  of  technologies  that  allow  rapid  analysis  of  distributed  data  will 
make  it  much  easier  for  organisations  to  analyse  shared  information.  Shared  anal-
ysis  will  get  easier  for  individuals,  collaborating  workers,  and  public  communities 
of interest.15 

An  especially  important  driver  will  be  privacy  preserving  technologies  that  auto-
matically strip identifying data from customer records. These are already being ap-
plied  in  the  healthcare  domain  to  help  researchers  locate,  aggregate  and  simulta-
neously  analyse  patient  data  residing  in  many  different  hospitals,  institutions  and 
laboratories.16 Advances in software integration (Section 12) will also be important. 
There  is  a  strong  imperative  to  do  this  better:  shared  analysis  is  important  be-
tween trading partners that collaborate closely (between big retail chains, for exam-
ple,  and  their  suppliers  of  fast  moving  consumer  goods),  but  is  slowed  by  negotia-
tions and manual data preparation and cleaning procedures. 
14. Human inputs 

Analytics systems will incorporate more inputs directly from humans. When work-
ers combine on-the-spot observations with what they know about the global picture 
their  personal  analysis  is  very  valuable.  Steady  improvements  in  interfaces,  ma-
chine  learning  and  inference-making  will  see  more  of  this  captured  by  systems  to 
refine  reports,  forecasts  and  recommendations.  Community  effects,  as  pioneered  in 
blogs,  wikis  and  other  collaborative  models  on  the  web,  will  also  be  harnessed  this 
way. 

Sophisticated  combinations  of  human  and  machine  analysis  are  already  found  in 
hybrid share trading systems that combine algorithmic trading with decisions made 

15 Swivel  and  Many  Eyes  are  examples  of  open  websites  for  shared  exploration  and  analysis 

of data. See www.swivel.com and http://services.alphaworks.ibm.com/manyeyes/home. 

16 See  the  Health  Data  Integration  project  at  http://e-hrc.net/hdi/  and  the  CSIRO’s  Privacy 

Preserving Analytics at http://www.csiro.au/science/ps59.html. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00089 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

86 

by  human  brokers  in  the  securities  industry.  Specialist  solutions  are  also  emerging 
to  analyse  combinations  of  objective  and  subjective  data  for  human  resource  man-
agement.17 

15. Affordability 

Research and development of new analytics technologies will continue to be driven 
in  sectors  where  there  is  highest  value.  As  with  most  information  technologies, 
broader adoption will follow as technologies mature, fall in price, and become avail-
able from more providers. 

The very large relative research and development investments mean that defense 
and  healthcare  in  particular  will  continue  to  provide  leading  indicators  for  tech-
nologies that will eventually find their way into all businesses. 

New  technologies  will  generally  follow  a  top-down  progression  from  initial  adop-
tion by corporations to adoption by medium and then finally small businesses. Some 
will  become  consumer  technologies.  A  similar  progression  will  apply  within 
organisations  as  it  becomes  cost  effective  to  deploy  analytics  to  more  departments, 
employees and devices. 
16. An expanding ecosystem 

Based  on  many  of  these  trends,  we  can  picture  analytics  systems  as  ecosystems, 
as  illustrated  in  Figure  2,  that  are  accepting  inputs  from  an  ever  wider  range  of 
sources, and producing outputs for an ever wider range of destinations. 

Part II: Business Impacts 

This section describes how analytics will shape the future of business. The discus-
sion  moves  back  and  forth  between  three  levels:  industry—changes  to  interactions 
between  organisations;  organisation—how  organisational  capabilities,  routines  and 
norms  will  change;  and  individual—changes  that  individual  workers  will  experi-
ence. 
17. Embarrassment of riches 

Through 2017 the data coming online and made available for businesses will out-

strip the capacity to analyse it. 

All  organisations  will  continue  to  balance  infrastructure  investments  against  the 
analytics  capabilities  they  would  like  to  build.  Falling  costs  in  storage,  servers  and 
network bandwidth will be insufficient to keep up with demand to perform complex 
analysis  more  often,  on  more  data,  by  more  employees.  Companies  will  constantly 
be surprised by the sheer volume of data they are generating and collecting. 

17 An  example  of  this  combination 

knowhow.com). 

is  found 

in  the  Mentor  system  (www.corporate 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00090 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

.

s
p
e
2
M
A
R
B
A
2
1
9

87 

By  2010,  the  notion  of  the  information  lifecycle,  with  limits  placed  on  how  long 

some types of information should be retained, will become very important. 

Today, on average, companies only utilise 42 percent of internal data that relates 
to  their  customers.18 In  2010,  because  the  data  pool  is  so  much  larger,  they  will 
struggle to improve on this figure. 

By  2011,  almost  all  large  organisations  will  have  dispensed  with  ‘‘keep  every-
thing’’  strategies  for  business  data.  Managers  will  routinely  consider  one  of  their 
major IT challenges to be choosing what data to throw away, lest they use up stor-
age capacity too rapidly. 

More  and  more  companies  will  turn  to  service  providers  (see  Section  18)  so  they 

can access storage and processing power on an on-demand basis. 

Through 2013, at least one in two organisations that invest in business analytics 
as a key corporate strategy will experience problems with projects that attempt too 
much too fast. 

By  2014,  industry  leaders  will  be  defined  as  much  by  the  data  they  choose  not 

to use as by the data that they use. 

In  2017,  even  leading  proponents  of  business  analytics  will  rarely  exploit  more 
than  10  percent  of  the  quality  business  data  that  is  both  available  and  relevant  to 
their context. 
18. The analytics economy 

We  will  see  rapid  shifts  as  businesses  capitalise  on  opportunities  to  provide  data 
services,  and  perform  data  analysis,  on  behalf  of  other  companies.  Many  of  these 
‘‘analytics  service  providers’’  will  aggregate  data  and  translate  it  between  formats 
as part of the value they deliver. 

The most successful analytics service providers will offer access to deep expertise, 
specialist skills and experience. Their value proposition will be further enhanced by 
superior  IT  infrastructure  and  the  processing  power  they  can  bring  to  bear  on  a 
problem, and they will invest in (or partner with providers of) large-scale server and 
storage facilities. 

Through  2009,  most  online  analytics  services  will  be  aimed  at  people  who  will 

manually navigate to them and access their analysis using browsers. 

By  2011,  significant  online  data  brokers  will  be  found  in  every  industry  sector. 
Many will have a background in market research, consulting or finance where they 
built up rich repositories of specialist data. Online retailers will also be pioneers in 
online analytics services. 

By 2012, most specialist research companies (e.g., automotive, demographic, build-

ing, real-estate research firms) will be online analytics service providers. 

By 2013, almost all analytics services with business value will be computer acces-
sible,  where  customers  can  connect  their  software  directly  to  the  service  over  the 
web.  Very  sophisticated  services  will  have  emerged.  All  competitive  market  re-
search,  news,  media  and  advertising  businesses  will  be  analytics  service  providers. 
Leading  finance  companies  will  have  adapted  in-house  market  analysis  systems  to 
make  them  available  externally  as  online  services  to  customers.  Much  of  the  value 
provided by advertising companies will be in pre and post advertising analysis. 

By  2015  there  will  be  a  substantial  global  economy  built  up  around  merchants 

that buy, sell and rent out their accumulated data on the web. 

At this time, dominant trading partners in every industry will make healthy prof-
its from providing analytics services for other organisations. Specialist insurers will 
sell  data  and  risk  analysis  services  to  companies  in  other  sectors.  Transportation 
companies will sell data and analysis to other companies for logistics planning pur-
poses. 

By  2016,  organisations  will  routinely  blend  collections  of  internal  analytics  en-
gines and hosted analytics services in such a way that the sources are indistinguish-
able to users. 
19. Collective insights 

Organisations that work closely together in partnerships and alliances will stead-
ily find themselves pooling more of their data for combined analysis. These networks 
will be underpinned by commercial arrangements that specify rental fees and recip-
rocal rights. These will lead to additional revenues for data-rich companies and new 
costs for data poor companies. 

Through 2011, data sharing arrangements will expand between large retail chains 
and  manufacturers  with  strong  consumer  brands.  Early  adopters  of  multi- 
organisational  analytics  will  also  be  found  in  the  insurance  industry  (e.g.,  sharing 

18 CIO  Insight,  The  30  most 

www.cioinsight.com. 

important  IT 

trends 

for  2007,  November  17,  2006, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00091 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

88 

across  insurance  alliances),  finance  (e.g.,  sharing  between  finance  companies  and 
mortgage  brokers),  and  business  services  (e.g.,  sharing  between  providers  of  com-
plementary services). 

By  2013,  conducting  cross-organisational  data  analysis  will  be  as  routine  as  con-

ducting cross department data analytics is today. 

By 2014, data sharing networks will exist that span industries, and facilitate ag-
gregated  analysis  of  information  owned  by  hundreds  of  organisations  at  a  time. 
Manufacturers  will  analyse  data  owned  by  retailers,  airlines  will  access  datasets 
distributed  across  many  travel  agents,  and  automotive  manufacturers  will  access 
datasets  distributed  across  car  dealerships.  Allied  groups  of  insurance  brokers  will 
generate significant new business through the combined analysis of their social net-
works. 

By 2016, data sharing will be taking unusual forms and coming from unexpected 
places. Taxi companies, toll operators and courier companies, for example, may pool 
analysis of vehicle movements to gain deeper insights. 

By  2017,  industry  networks  will  exist  that  routinely  analyse  data  stored  in  more 

than a thousand small businesses. 
20. From microscopes to telescopes 

Although the customer data owned by an organisation will remain one of its most 
valuable  assets,  the  vast  amounts  of  external  information  available,  and  increased 
capacity  for  systems  to  analyse  it,  means  that  the  external  data  pool  will  quickly 
outstrip the internal one in scale. All businesses will end up analysing significantly 
more data residing outside their organisations. 

By  2011,  managers  in  leading  organisations  will  understand  that  competitive 
business  insights  depend  more  on  how  they  interact  with  an  ecosystem  of  external 
service providers than on how they process internal data. 

By 2013, managers in large enterprises will routinely receive computer generated 

recommendations based on a thousand times more external than internal data. 

By 2017, managers in large enterprises will routinely receive computer generated 
analysis and recommendations based on a million times more external than internal 
data. 

At this time, companies in the travel industry will monitor cost trends for all des-
tinations  they  service  by  crawling  massive  numbers  of  web-based  data  points  on 
room prices, vacancy rates, retail prices and bus and train fares. 
21. David becomes Goliath 

Medium  and  small  businesses  will  rarely  own  as  much  information  as  large  cor-
porations.  Nor  will  they  be  interested  in  the  same  types  of  analysis  because  there 
is less scope for optimisation in less complex organisations. 

Many  kinds  of  analysis  will  be  valuable,  however,  regardless  of  business  size,  in-
cluding customer profiling, sentiment analysis and market trends analysis. Smaller 
businesses  will  also  have  access  to  the  same  data  ecosystems,  and  the  same  tools 
as these become accessible as services over the web. 

New  opportunities  for  small  businesses  will  also  come  from  ‘‘scaling  down’’  the 
cost and complexity of systems that are only practical for large organisations today. 
By 2010, managers in one in five mid-sized companies will access computer anal-

ysis of customer and sales data on a daily basis. 

By  2013,  managers  in  mid-sized  companies  will  routinely  access  computer  anal-

ysis of sales, production, and supply-side information on a daily basis. 

At this time, managers in a third of small businesses will routinely access at least 

one online analytics service on a weekly basis. 

By 2014, small business managers will routinely reference benchmarks developed 
by  pooling  data  from  hundreds  of  their  peers.  These  benchmarks  will  typically  be 
accessed from within their regular accounting software. 
22. Location-aware enterprise 

The explosion in location-aware chips, tags and devices will see organisations gain 

entirely new insights on their assets, staff, customers and products. 

By 2010, analysis of real time spatial data for mobile and in-the-field assets such 
as vehicles and heavy equipment will be routine in transportation, logistics, mining 
and agriculture. 

By 2013, medium and large manufacturers will routinely analyse data on the loca-

tion, distribution and utilisation of containers, palettes and roll cages. 

By 2015, organisations in supply chains for big retail chains will routinely analyse 

the movements of hundreds of thousands of fast moving consumer goods. 

By  2017,  asset  managers  in  large  finance  and  business  services  companies  will 
routinely  analyse,  from  a  single  console,  the  distribution  and  movement  of  all  cor-
porate assets worth more than ten dollars. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00092 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

23. Walls have ears 

89 

Audio  and  video  will  quickly  grow  in  importance.  Sources  will  come  from  within 
the  organisation  as  well  as  from  outside.  An  especially  widely  used  source  will  be 
audio data from the call centre. 

Images  will  begin  to  constitute  an  important  source  of  business  data,  especially 
where they are associated with identifying events or changing conditions in a build-
ing or commercial environment, or with identifying people and places. 

By  2009,  insurance  companies  will  routinely  use  systems  that  analyse  speech  for 
stress and produce real-time risk indicators during calls into claims processing cen-
tres. These systems will substantially reduce fraud rates. 

By  2011,  personal  voice  risk  analysis  will  be  routinely  used  by  sales  representa-
tives  in  all  industries  to  help  verify  customer  buying  intentions  over  the  phone. 
Many of them will do this without the knowledge of clients or their managers.19 

By 2014, more than half of large businesses will routinely analyse recorded audio 

in call centres to zero in on anomalies, problem products and customer gripes. 

By  2015,  the  automated  analysis  of  foot  traffic  via  CCTV,  once  only  available  to 
managers  in  casinos  and  supermarket  chains,  will  be  available  as  a  cheap  webcam 
plug-in and routinely used by small retailers routinely to optimise window and shelf 
displays. 

By 2016, audio data mining will be used by one in two large organisations to tune 

the methods of tele-sales and over-the-counter sales people. 

By 2016, large organisations will routinely use software that recognises voice pat-

terns to produce rich insights on when and how customers contact them. 
24. Sentiment tracking 

Business  analytics  systems  will  be  able  to  take  advantage  of  new  algorithms  to 
draw inferences from material in discussion forums, customer feedback, e-commerce 
and auction sites, news clips and analyst reports to infer overall positive or negative 
sentiment about companies and products. 

As sentiment analysis develops and becomes more realistic, it will turn into a key 
metric  that  is  monitored  daily  in  all  businesses  and  industries.  Investors  and  con-
sumers  will  change  their  behaviours  based  on  the  sentiment  analysis  available  to 
them. 

By  2010,  online  sentiment  analysis  will  be  routinely  offered  as  a  service  by  mar-

ket research and advertising companies. 

By  2012,  sentiment  analysis  will  be  routinely  used  by  companies  to  analyse  cus-
tomer feedback and recorded audio from the call centre, to improve customer service 
outcomes. 

By 2013, managers working in companies with high profile consumer brands will 
routinely perform sentiment analysis of audio, video and textual news feeds. During 
periods  of  adverse  publicity  (e.g.,  product  recalls)  they  will  benchmark  impact 
against  preceding  months,  and  monitor  progress  as  public  relations  campaigns  try 
to repair the damage. 

By  2014,  corporate  sentiment  analysis  will  incorporate  continuous  crawling  of 
blogs,  product  rating  websites,  news  services  and  social  networking  websites  for 
mentions  of  the  company  and  its  products,  scoring  relevant  comments  as  they  go. 
Managers  will  routinely  monitor  changes  in  goodwill  and  market  sentiment  on  a 
weekly basis, not only for their company but also for their biggest competitors. 

At  this  time,  brokers  will  routinely  use  sentiment  analysis  in  valuations  and 
share trading. Sentiment analysis will be widely applied by individuals to score on-
line feedback posted about hotels, restaurants, airlines and travel destinations. 

By 2015, high profile professionals and executives will routinely monitor ‘‘personal 
brand  awareness’’  based  on  how  frequently  their  name  is  mentioned  and  in  what 
context. 

By  2016,  random  online  searches  for  information  on  products  will  be  returned 
with  customer  satisfaction  ‘‘meter  readings’’  for  both  the  target  item  and  nearest 
equivalent products from alternative suppliers. 

By  2017,  executives  and  company  spokespeople  will  routinely  face  shareholders 
that  call  up,  with  a  few  mouse  clicks,  an  overall  analysis  of  everything  they  have 
ever said publicly on a topic. 
25. Reputation wars 

The developments described above will lead companies to move beyond monitoring 

to using technology to actively manage and influence online sentiment. 

19 AVS  is  an  example  of  a  commercial  voice  risk  analysis  solution  (www.digilog.com),  and 
Kishkish  is  another,  available  as  a  downloadable  plug-in  for  Skype  users  (www.kishkish.com). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00093 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

90 

By 2014, companies in the public relations industry will routinely offer automated 

services to help skew online sentiment results and boost online reputations. 

By  2015,  the  ‘‘reputation  wars’’  between  reviewer  and  reviewed  will  take  on  the 
resemblance of a subtle but ongoing arms race. Leading providers of sentiment anal-
ysis  services  will  be  continuously  refining  their  methods  for  detecting  manipulated 
data,  and  for  assessing  the  trustworthiness  and  integrity  of  online  sources.  They 
will routinely exploit social networking data to detect relationships between the re-
viewer and the reviewed. 
26. Knowing who you know 

Managers will get very powerful outcomes from social network analysis. Early ap-
plications  will  continue  to  have  an  inward  facing  flavour,  but  sophisticated  online 
tools  will  also  open  up  a  world  of  new  insights.  This  will  produce  new  social  chal-
lenges. 

By  2009,  large  organisations  will  routinely  analyse  the  structured  information  in 
e-mail and internal directories to help find people with specialised knowledge, or so-
cial connections relevant to a task. 

By  2010,  a  variety  of  services  will  be  available  online  that  automatically  produce 

social network analyses on any person for anyone that wants it—for free. 

By  2011,  entrepreneurs  will  routinely  use  web-profiling  to  find  social  connections 
to  secure  deals.  Sales  reps  will  automatically  profile  prospects  before  calling.  Man-
agers  and  employment  companies  will  profile  job  candidates  as  a  matter  of  course. 
At  this  time,  managers  in  companies  of  all  sizes  will  routinely  use  online  tools 

to mine people and associations from news stories, blogs and company websites. 

By  2012,  online  conflict  of  interest  detection  will  be  undertaken  routinely  and 
automatically during legal disputes, company acquisitions, hiring and selecting con-
tractors. 

By  2013,  online  social  network  analysis  will  routinely  incorporate  information  on 

the identity of people that appear in digital photographs. 

At  this  time,  job  candidates  will  often  find  themselves  confronted  with  interview 
questions  about  associations  with  ‘‘undesirable’’  people  or  organisations,  even  if 
these associations were made accidentally. 

By  2017,  large  companies  will  routinely  mine  digital  recordings  of  internal  semi-
nars, training sessions and planning meetings to improve the mapping of social net-
works and knowledge associations between employees. 

The  analysis  of  social  network  and  unstructured  data  within  organisations  will 
produce new workplace challenges. Many organisations will experience disruption as 
employees object to having their e-mail archives mined for associations. Other chal-
lenges  will  come  from  increased  scrutiny  of  personal  activities  and  connections. 
Companies that execute well will be careful to preserve privacy and give individuals 
strong personal control over information sources that are analysed. 
27. ROI-per-customer 

The notion of being able to quantify the value of individual customers, something 
that  already  exists  in  many  organisations,  will  become  much  more  comprehensive. 
Analytics systems will produce insights on cost, risk and profitability for individual 
customers,  taking  into  account  such  things  as  call  volumes,  preferred  communica-
tion channels, product mix, location and sentiment analysis. 

By  2011,  dashboards  used  by  customer  service  and  sales  personnel  in  banks  will 

routinely emphasise predicted customer value over current/historical value. 

By  2013,  large  organisations  will  routinely  use  data  from  their  customer  base  to 
model projected take-up, rate of return and profitability for new products and serv-
ices. 

By  2017,  businesses  will  routinely  use  projected  ROI-per-customer  as  inputs  to 

their long term planning. 

These developments will create new social challenges as ROI-per-customer metrics 
change  the  behaviour  of  service  and  contact  centre  personnel.  Many  organisations 
will  experience  customer  backlash  and  adverse  publicity  as  the  service  levels  begin 
to  mirror  customer  scores.  Advanced  organisations  will  quickly  learn  to  accompany 
deployments with new procedures and significant training and education programs. 
28. Bottom-up optimisation 

Local analytics systems will connect and collaborate with one another across com-
plex supply chains and business networks. Such arrangements will allow managers 
to make decisions based not only on rich local information, but also armed with in-
sights  about  the  impact  of  their  decisions  on  other  links  in  the  chain.  By  empow-
ering local decision-makers this way, connected analytics systems will help optimise 
trading systems from the ‘‘bottom up.’’ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00094 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

91 

By 2012, supply networks in transportation, fresh food distribution, and fast mov-
ing consumer goods will routinely employ distributed analytics systems that interact 
and  exchange  information  with  one  another.  Businesses  in  these  networks  will  sig-
nificantly improve profit outcomes during adverse events and changeable conditions. 
By  2016,  distributed  analytics  systems  will  be  deployed  in  all  types  of  collabo-
rative  trading  networks  (including  in  services  sectors)  that  are  complex  or  change-
able and cannot be modelled from the top down. 
29. People meters 

While  human  resources  (HR)  management  will  remain  a  domain  dominated  by 
subjective assessments of factors such as morale, job congruence, performance, skill 
levels, leadership and peer collaboration, computer analysis will play a growing role. 
By 2009, managers in large organisations will routinely reference computer anal-

ysis when reviewing sales performance, salaries and expenses. 

By  2012,  comprehensive  H.R.  analytics  solutions  will  be  routinely  deployed  by 
management  consulting  companies  as  part  of  their  organisational  change  meth-
odologies. 

By  2013,  managers  in  large  enterprises  will  routinely  use  dashboards  that  com-
bine  quantitative  and  qualitative  human  resource  metrics  for  individual  depart-
ments  and  projects.  These  will  provide  actionable  insights  on  where  to  invest  in 
training, where reporting structures are inefficient, and where changes to work allo-
cation and staff roles need to be made to address bottlenecks. 

By  2016,  as  H.R.  benchmarking  becomes  more  sophisticated,  and  bigger  datasets 
are  collected,  large  enterprises  will  build  whole-of-company  models  to  analyse 
human resources allocation and performance, and senior managers will routinely ac-
cess cost versus return estimates for individual employees. 

In  organisations  where  these  tools  are  applied  well,  employees  will  find  them-
selves in a more attractive workplace where managers are armed with new and cre-
ative  ideas,  where  there  is  a  feeling  of  constant  refinement  of  management  prac-
tices, and where individual strengths are better recognised and utilised. 

Considerable  learning  will  be  required,  however,  and  many  organisations  will 
apply these metrics poorly. In these workplaces, employees will find themselves sti-
fled  by  managers  that  frequently  defer  to  standardised  benchmarks  at  the  expense 
of a deeper understanding of individual strengths and motivations. 
30. 360≥ performance reviews 

Performance  reviews  will  progressively  become  more  realistic.  The  notion  of  scor-
ing  performance  and  paying  bonuses  based  solely  on  targets  set  at  the  beginning 
of  the  year  will  disappear.  This  will  impact  the  way  performance  is  measured  for 
all  managers  and  employees,  but  through  the  next  10  years  the  main  focus  will  be 
on sales representatives and senior executives. 

As  these  practices  become  more  common  they  will  transform  expectations.  Top 
performing  executives  and  sales  people,  for  example,  will  only  want  to  work  for 
organisations where performance is analysed realistically. 

By  2015,  sales  representatives  will  be  routinely  compensated  for  performance 
against  a  basket  of  metrics  that  include  the  performance  of  peers,  competitors,  and 
the market as a whole. 

By  2018,  customer  service  personnel  will  be  routinely  compensated  for  perform-
ance  against  a  basket  of  metrics  including  indices  of  customer  satisfaction  before 
and  after  calls,  overall  satisfaction  across  the  client  base,  and  an  online  sentiment 
index. 
31. Latency and velocity 

Analysis  will  become  more  tightly  linked  to  information  sources  over  time,  with 
fewer instances of people having to manually write-up, summarise or reenter infor-
mation. 

The automation of information collection will be one factor. Examples include pal-
ettes  and  containers  broadcasting  their  location  and  status  in  warehouse,  loading 
bays  or  trucks  via  RFID  chips,  and  moisture,  salinity  and  temperature  data  feeds 
from  distributed  sensor  networks  in  agriculture.  Additionally,  as  integration  be-
comes easier and cheaper, we will see more connections between machines that sup-
ply information and machines that analyse information. 

Managers  will  receive  insights  that  are  progressively  more  timely.  By  exploiting 
information  much  sooner  after  it  is  created,  they  will  make  earlier  and  more  effec-
tive  decisions.  Delays  in  critical  business  information  will,  however,  remain  a  fact 
of life. 

Outside  the  organisation,  shareholders  and  analysts  will  receive  increasingly 
timely  analysis  and  will  also  embed  this  in  their  decisionmaking.  A  side  effect  will 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00095 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

92 

be  a  further  shift  toward  ‘‘day  trading’’  and  some  increased  volatility  in  financial 
markets. 

By  2009,  executives  in  the  mining  sector  will  routinely  access,  on  a  daily  basis, 
accurate  analysis  of  the  profitability  of  each  mine  site.  This  will  be  calculated  from 
continuous  monitoring  of  data  on  input  costs,  deployment  of  assets  and  personnel, 
excavation rates and processing yields. 

By 2012, managers will routinely access analysis on the status of manufacturing, 
warehousing,  transportation  and  direct  sales  operations  that  is  accurate  to  within 
5 minutes. 

By  2013,  more  than  65  percent  of  Australian  Stock  Exchange  trades  will  be  exe-

cuted by autonomous and semi-autonomous dealing systems. 

By  2015,  leading  organisations  will  see  more  than  half  of  the  digital  information 
created in an organisation imbedded in analysis used by senior managers within 48 
hours of it being created. 

In  2017,  near  real-time  analytics  will  be  widely  available  in  specific  operations, 
but no large organisation will have achieved a capability where senior managers can 
access up-to-the minute assessments of financial position for the business. 

Much  is  made  of  the  goal  of  the  ‘‘real  time  enterprise,’’  so  why  won’t  it  happen? 
Some of the inhibiting factors have been described below in Section 34. Additionally, 
it  will  be  impossible  to  eliminate  human  delays—in  updating  information  like 
progress reports, new hires, expense claims, etc—and also delays in receiving infor-
mation from channel partners and contractors. More importantly, the imperative to 
have real time access to the ‘‘big picture’’ is imaginary. Senior managers don’t need 
(and  won’t  pay  for)  systems  that  tell  them  the  financial  status  of  a  business  on  an 
hourly  basis:  at  that  level  of  granularity  they  cannot  distinguish  between  fluctua-
tions  and  trends,  and  the  organisation  is  incapable  of  reacting  that  quickly  to  deci-
sions. 
32. Bottlenecks within 

As  speed  of  information  becomes  an  ever  greater  competitive  necessity,  analytics 

will increasingly be applied to the efficiency of information systems themselves. 

By 2010, businesses will routinely benchmark the time it takes for sales and serv-
ice  staff  to  access  key  information  (including  analytics  outputs)  while  in  the  field. 
By 2011, large enterprises will routinely use computer analysis to isolate unneces-
sary/problematic  traffic  to  improve  e-mail  practices  and  reduce  ‘‘e-mail  overload’’ 
problems. 

By  2014,  top-100  companies  will  routinely  embed  analytics  in  business  process 
outsourcing arrangements. Software will continuously monitor request and response 
times.  Partner  managers  will  review  service  performance  metrics  on  a  daily  basis. 
The  same  metrics  will  be  mirrored  to  the  customer  relationship  manager  working 
for the outsourcer. 
33. Goodbye to budgets 

Organisations  will  move  slowly  toward  budget-less  management,  where  fixed  an-
nual  budgets  are  abandoned  and  replaced  by  continuous  analysis  of  spend  versus 
return.  This  will  progressively  free  personnel  from  onerous  bottom-up  budgeting, 
and will make organisations more adaptable and responsive to change. 

By  2011,  large  companies  will  routinely  analyse  whole-of-enterprise  procurement 
data  to  identify  opportunities  to  consolidate  purchases  and  get  additional  discounts 
‘‘on the fly.’’ These insights will be imbedded in requisitioning systems and accessed 
by purchasing officers when they place orders. 

By 2014, at least a quarter of large businesses will routinely use budget-less man-

agement in selected projects. 

By 2017, at least a quarter of large businesses will routinely use budget-less man-
agement  in  one  or  more  business  units.  In  advanced  organisations,  accounting  de-
partments  will  morph  into  support  services,  spending  most  of  their  time  providing 
on-demand ROI projections to managers. 
34. Cultures of confidence 

Data  quality,  and  ensuring  managers  can  trust  the  outputs  of  analytics  systems, 

will continue to be an important challenge. 

A contributing factor will be the continuous addition of new sources of information 
(especially  external  sources  where  there  will  be  duplication,  and  big  variations  in 
quality and consistency). Mergers and acquisitions will play a role as well. 

At the same time, analytics systems will become better at calculating and commu-
nicating  confidence  levels  and  probabilities  associated  with  their  outputs.  Greater 
transparency  of  confidence  levels  in  computer  analysis  will  build  trust  in  them, 
which will in turn accelerate adoption. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00096 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

93 

By  2009,  large  services  organisations  will  routinely  offer  company-wide  training 

on best practices in information management. 

By  2011,  many  businesses  will  have  simple,  organisation-wide,  terms  for  describ-

ing quality and confidence levels associated with reports and forecasts. 

By  2013,  these  will  be  routinely  institutionalised  in  policies  and  decision  proc-
esses.  Certain  product  decisions  will  only  be  allowed,  for  example,  if  predictions 
reach  a  ‘‘Level  1’’  (high)  confidence  level,  while  market  communications  will  be  ad-
justed  mid-campaign  on  ‘‘Level  3’’  recommendations  if  they  are  the  best  available. 
By 2013, the proliferation of external analysis services being used by different de-
partments will make selecting and quality controlling external data resources a key 
focus in large businesses. 

By  2014,  specialist  knowledge  workers  will  routinely  look  up  the  confidence  and 

quality levels for their business reports with a few mouse clicks. 

Managers in retailers, logistics centres and mine sites will routinely click through 
reports  to  see  archived  CCTV  and  web  cam  footage  that  provides  a  deeper  under-
standing of the causes of changes or adverse events. 

By 2016, senior executives will routinely view aggregated confidence levels for top- 

level financial analysis with a few mouse clicks. 

In  2017,  large  companies  will  still  be  striving  for,  but  never  achieving,  ‘‘one 
version  of  the  truth’’  where  everyone  in  the  organisation  references  the  same  ana-
lytics derived from the same high-quality and universally consistent sources. 
35. Silicon and cerebrum 

Organisations  will  get  steadily  better  at  combining  analysis  made  by  people  with 
analysis  made  by  computers.  Human  inputs  will  become  an  important  way  to  im-
prove  quality  of  analysis.  Analysis  and  collaborative  planning  tools  will  merge.  Dif-
ferentiating between human and machine contributions will become impossible. 

By  2011,  knowledge  workers  will  routinely  share  insights  with  one  another  by 
posting  ad  hoc  analysis,  data  visualisations  and  comments  on  web  pages.  Popular, 
useful creations will then be adopted widely within organisations. 

At  this  time,  organisations  will  routinely  link  software  to  websites  that  exploit 
‘‘wisdom  of  crowds’’  principles  via  popular  tagging  or  voting,  or  facilitate  analysis 
mash-ups, to create new sources of business intelligence. 

By  2013,  when  managers  get  together  to  make  quarterly  sales  projections,  they 
will not only take into consideration computer predictions, but their projections will 
also  become  inputs  to  the  analytics  system.  Each  will  inform  the  other  to  improve 
accuracy over time. 

By  2015,  managers  in  leading  organisations  will  routinely  submit  new  monthly 

reports in forms designed to be read as easily by machines as by people. 

By  2016,  workers  will  routinely  note  any  discrepancies  between  what  computer 
analysis is telling them and what they are actually seeing. Their inputs, along with 
comments  on  likely  causes,  will  be  used  to  continually  refine  quality  of  analysis.  A 
point  of  sale  manager  in  a  retail  chain  may  note  that  sales  of  some  items  go  up 
when  it  rains  and  others  only  when  petrol  prices  are  high;  shortly  afterwards,  an 
administrator  will  be  prompted  to  add  24-hour  weather  and  fuel  price  data  feeds 
into the system. 

By 2017, top level managers will routinely use combined human and machine pro-

jections to model industry scenarios for long term strategic planning. 

By 2018, one in five large enterprises will combine the management of human and 

computer knowledge in the organisation into one strategy. 
36. Knowing what you don’t know 

Self-learning capabilities will be progressively incorporated into mainstream busi-

ness systems, moving them beyond predictions based on static models. 

By  2012,  managers  in  telecommunications  companies  will  routinely  access  sys-
tems that become better at predicting profitability for handset/plan combinations by 
self  modelling  handset  cost,  network  cost,  call  volumes,  call  times,  mix  of  local  and 
long  distance,  use  of  non-voice  services,  credit  risk,  handset  upgrades,  and  network 
upgrades. 

By  2013,  managers  in  transportation,  logistics  and  distribution  companies  will 
routinely use systems that automatically accumulate knowledge about the effects of 
urgency, loading times, different types of goods, traffic congestion, vehicle reliability 
and weather. 

By  2017,  analytics  systems  will  routinely  send  suggestions  to  the  IT  department 
for  trials,  experiments  and  new  data  sources  that  can  fill  knowledge  gaps,  produce 
deeper insights and generate better predictions. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00097 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

37. Securing information experts 

94 

The new opportunities presented by business analytics will have an effect on roles 

and responsibilities at all levels in the organisation. 

The  role  of  the  most  senior  IT  executive  will  progressively  see  more  emphasis  on 
information  over  technology,  making  the  title  of  ‘‘Chief  Information  Officer’’  a  more 
accurate reflection of the role. We will see a trend toward multiple senior technology 
managers,  each  specialising  in  either  strategic  innovation,  systems  operations,  and 
information management. 

Although systems will become vastly more usable by non-specialist personnel, de-
mand for specialist skills will still rise. Information and knowledge management ex-
perts  will  enjoy  a  higher  status  as  the  quality  and  relevance  of  computer  analysis 
becomes  more  business  critical.  The  responsibility  for  finding,  evaluating,  selecting 
and  managing  external  data  services  will  grow  in  importance,  as  will  the  need  to 
institutionalise procedures to continuously improve data quality. 

At  all  levels  we  will  see  growing  emphasis  on  analytical,  mathematical  and  soft-
ware  skills  associated  with  managing  information.  The  average  knowledge  worker 
will  not  be  asked  to  become  a  statistician,  but  experience  relating  to  information 
management will become more valuable on any resume. 

Like their counterparts in larger organisations, small business managers will also 
find that new skills are required to compete effectively. The ability to bring together 
diverse  information  sources  quickly  and  effectively  will  become  a  more  significant 
asset. 

By  2011,  most  large  companies  will  have  established  competency  centres  to  help 

business units extract more value from analytics. 

By 2013, the analytics capabilities of a large organisation will be limited more by 
its ability to find and keep suitable staff than by its ability to maintain quality data 
and software. 

At this time, analytics experts will rank among the highest paid IT specialists em-

ployed by large organisations. 

By 2014, competition for people will see senior analytics roles most often filled by 
crossing traditional boundaries. Services companies will hire logistic specialists from 
transport  companies,  retailers  will  employ  spatial  information  experts  from  mining 
companies, and manufacturers will source social network analysts from media com-
panies. Experts in defence intelligence and health analytics will find lucrative career 
paths in mainstream business. 

By  2016,  organisations  will  routinely  employ  experts  in  knowledge  management, 
collaboration and human-computer interaction as they try to blend human and com-
puter  knowledge  practices,  achieve  continuous  quality  improvements,  and  promote 
a culture of good information practices at all levels. 
38. Insights at your fingertips 

Analytics  applications  will  become  a  factor  in  all  aspects  of  business  operations. 
At the same time, however, they will not be an intrusive or dominant part of work-
ing  life.  They  will  become  progressively  better  blended  into  the  everyday  working 
environment and hidden behind the scenes. 

Workers will use analytics more often in their personal decision-making, although 
they will not always be aware of it. Websites will provide richer analysis to support 
buying,  financial  planning  and  career  decisions,  and  social  analytics  will  help  ca-
reers by connecting them to more people and communities with the same interests. 
Life  will  be  as  complicated  as  ever:  10  years  from  now,  knowledge  workers  will 
still be complaining about ‘‘information overload’’ and will rate the inability to man-
age information as one of their most significant challenges. 

Some  organisations  will  fail  to  appreciate  the  importance  of  blending  analytics 
into  the  background.  A  common  mistake  will  be  promoting  ‘‘metatag  cultures’’  by 
encouraging  employees  to  add  descriptive  tags  to  everything  they  produce—docu-
ments,  spreadsheets,  web  pages,  bookmarks,  images  and  e-mails.  This  onerous  ap-
proach  will  produce  poor  results.  More  advanced  organisations  will  concentrate  on 
using  software  to  scan  documents,  monitor  how  they  are  used,  and  automatically 
append meaningful metadata. 

By  2009,  sales  representatives  will  routinely  call  up  customer  analysis  while 

working onsite. 

By  2011,  one  in  ten  knowledge  workers,  in  all  businesses  and  industries,  will  ac-

cess analytics software on a daily or weekly basis. 

By 2013, sales representatives will routinely access customer analysis as they are 
driving  to  meetings,  and  more  than  two-thirds  of  analytics  queries  in  organisations 
will  be  made  from  within  the  familiar  environments  of  the  spreadsheet,  browser  or 
word processor. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00098 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

95 

By  this  time,  instead  of  always  working  to  make  computer  analysis  more  acces-
sible,  leading  organisations  will  be  spending  equal  time  assessing  where  analytics 
are distracting or counterproductive. 

By  2014,  one  in  five  knowledge  workers  will  access  analytics  software  on  a  daily 

or weekly basis. 

By  2016,  nineteen  out  of  every  twenty  analytics  queries  will  be  made  with  free 
form  text  entered  into  interfaces  that  are  as  simple  as  Google’s  is  today.  Workers 
will retrieve even highly structured reports by entering a few keywords—enough for 
systems to suggest a likely match. 

By  2017,  senior  executives  will  routinely  access  analysis  that  has  been  distilled 
into one line recommendations (e.g., ‘‘initiate a clearance sale to run down inventory 
on Product A’’) with the option to drill down to the metrics underneath. 
39. Ministry of metrics 

Developments in analytics technologies will impact governments as much as busi-
nesses.  Dominant  themes  will  remain  improving  service  delivery  (in  all  types  of 
services, but healthcare will continue to merit special focus), making government op-
erations more efficient, reducing welfare and tax fraud, and national security. 

Information  boundaries  will  gradually  come  down  between  departments  and  be-
tween  levels  of  government.  Whole  of  government  analytics  will  eventually  become 
routine.  Despite  public  concerns,  citizen  data  will  be  routinely  analysed  across  de-
partments and this will produce new challenges. 

By 2012, hospitals will routinely offer services that blend continuous home health 

monitoring with analysis capabilities hosted at the hospital. 

By 2013, the government will be an important player in the provision of external 
analytics  services  for  businesses.  Agencies  with  trade,  customs  and  industry  devel-
opment  responsibilities  will  routinely  offer  hosted  online  services  relating  to  mar-
kets, trends, opportunities, environmental monitoring, social and economic data. 

At  this  time,  most  agencies  will  institute  strong  internal  access  policies  for  ana-
lytics systems because of new exposures relating to privacy and unauthorised/illegal 
use. 

By  2014,  computer  analysis  of  e-health  records  will  produce  dramatic  improve-
ments  in  early  diagnosis  and  early  outbreak  detection,  and  will  be  applied  inten-
sively to improve quality of care. 

At this time, a variety of online services will continuously track public sentiment 
relating  to  policy  and  politicians.  Changes  to  baseline  metrics  (e.g.,  after  new  poli-
cies  are  announced,  interest  rates  rise,  etc.)  will  be  monitored  on  a  daily  basis  in 
government.  These  services  will  compliment,  but  not  replace,  formal  polling  of  the 
electorate. 

Purchasing officers will routinely access whole-of-government analytics to improve 

sourcing and procurement practices. 

By  2016,  workers  in  security  agencies  and  police  forces  will  routinely  generate 
automated  risk  profiles  for  individual  citizens  based  on  data  in  the  public  domain. 
By 2017, a national health network will exist that allows researchers to routinely 
analyse pooled health data sets spanning all public and private hospitals, all health 
research institutions and all government health departments. 
40. Environmental analytics 

An important new application for businesses will be environmental sustainability 
reporting,  involving  measurement  and  analysis  of  information  relating  to  such 
things as energy utilisation, water usage and carbon emissions.20 

Governments  will  steadily  raise  the  bar  for  detailed  and  timely  reporting.  Envi-
ronmental  analytics  systems  will  be  increasingly  direct-connected  to  regulatory  au-
thorities and energy companies. 

By  2010,  agricultural  businesses  will  routinely  use  computer  analysis  to  optimise 

water use and distribution across land assets. 

By  2012,  analytics  systems  drawing  upon  distributed  sensor  networks  will  be 
adopted by a wide range of government agencies, councils, farmers and manufactur-
ers. 

By  2014,  all  types  of  organisations  will  routinely  use  combinations  of  analytics, 
sensors  and  smart  meters  to  monitor  and  optimise  energy  use  in  office  buildings. 
By  2016,  governments  will  consolidate  and  standardise  the  electronic  sustain-
ability reporting requirements for businesses across state, local and Federal jurisdic-
tions. 

20 An  early  example  of  a  carbon  tracking  and  reporting  tool  is  CarbonView.  See  www.supply- 

chain.com.au. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00099 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

96 

Conclusion 

The value of analytics systems will continue to rise rapidly through the next dec-
ade. This will be driven by new data sources, continuing improvements in computer 
methods  and  the  development  of  richer  and  more  convenient  ways  of  accessing  the 
outputs. 

For large businesses, the application of analytics to sales, finance, operations, pur-
chasing,  quality  control  and  even  human  capital  is  already  a  universal  competitive 
necessity.  Within  a  few  years,  sophisticated  analysis  will  be  equally  indispensable 
in medium sized companies, and before long to many small businesses. At the same 
time, business analytics will become an enterprise-wide phenomenon where all types 
of  managers  and  knowledge  workers  benefit  from  richer  methods  of  analysing  dig-
ital information. 

A strange and exciting new world awaits. By 2017, audio, video, image and spatial 
information  will  be  incorporated  in  mainstream  business  analysis  everywhere.  So-
cial  network  information  will  be  aggressively  mined  for  patterns  and  relationships, 
and  the  vast  pool  of  commentary  and  news  found  on  the  web  will  be  trawled  daily 
by  machines  that  benchmark  sentiment  and  monitor  reputations.  Many  companies 
will have taken steps toward eliminating annual budgeting altogether. 

An  analytics  economy  will  spring  up.  Data  rich  organisations  will  enjoy  lucrative 
revenues  from  renting  out  their  information  assets,  and  combined  analysis  of  cus-
tomer  data  will  be  routine  between  business  partners  in  every  sector.  In  complex 
supply chain networks, analytics solutions will communicate across company bound-
aries to help optimise the ebb and flow of products from the bottom up. 

These shifts will mean that some aspects of IT management will be turned upside 
down.  Managing  information  will  itself  become  much  more  critical  than  managing 
the  technology  that  processes  it,  and  the  volume  of  data  sourced  externally  will 
dwarf  the  amount  owned  by  the  organisation.  By  2017,  it  will  become  quite  impos-
sible, in many business situations, to distinguish between human and computer gen-
erated insights. 

The future of business analytics will bring with it new human, social and cultural 
challenges. The detailed insights about us that can be gleaned from public data will 
often  make  us  uncomfortable.  Roles  and  workplace  routines  will  everywhere  need 
to adapt to accommodate and exploit new capabilities. For organisations, having the 
right skills will be most critical, and leading companies will always stand out more 
for  the  qualities  of  their  people  than  the  raw  power  of  their  information  systems. 
Analytics  leaders  will  do  a  lot  of  learning.  This  learning  will  define  competitive 
advantage  because  it  will  be  context  specific  and  impossible  to  buy.  Late  starters 
may  be  able  to  tap  into  vast  quantities  of  external  data,  and  will  certainly  access 
powerful solutions, but they will find no short cuts to building a culture that under-
stands  data  quality,  knows  the  limitations  of  machine  analysis,  and  strives  to  con-
tinuously improve how the outputs are used to support everyday business decisions. 

Senator DORGAN. Mr. Abrams, thank you very much. 
All of you have provided interesting and, in some cases, provoca-

tive, and certainly useful information to us. 

The  task  of  reauthorizing  the  Federal  Trade  Commission  re-
quires  us  to  take  a  look  at  what  works  and  what  doesn’t,  what 
kinds of things might be necessary to add to the responsibilities of 
the  Federal  Trade  Commission.  I  started,  today,  asking  about  the 
resources.  I  think  the  resources  are  a  problem  we  need  to  resolve, 
this  is  clear  from  the  testimony  that  some  of  you  have  provided. 
And  with  respect  to  the  common  carrier  exemption,  we  do  need  to 
respond,  because  times  have  changed,  and  there  is  no  reason  to 
prevent the Federal Trade Commission from working and being ag-
gressive in those areas. 

I  think  much  of  the  success  of  an  agency,  whether  it  is  FERC, 
as  I’ve  described  it  earlier,  or  the  Federal  Trade  Commission,  or 
any number of agencies, has a lot to do with the interest that they 
have  in  pursuing  issues  aggressively.  Frankly,  I’ve  been  here  long 
enough to see some people assume the leadership of certain organi-
zations  who  don’t  believe  in  the  organizations,  don’t  like  govern-
ment, believe there should be no referee or no regulatory authority, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00100 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

97 

and all of a sudden they’re appointed to head the agency. So, what 
happens?  The  agency  dies  from  the  neck  up,  does  nothing  except 
collect paychecks and strut around and act like it’s important. And 
especially given these days and these times, I think we need some-
thing  much,  much  more.  The  Federal  Trade  Commission  is  a  com-
mission  under  the  jurisdiction  of  this  Committee,  and—I’m  not  as-
serting,  by  the  way,  that  my  example  was  the  FTC,  but  I  am  say-
ing  that  I  think  it’s  very  important  that  the  regulatory  authority 
be  exercised  aggressively  and  with  some  impatience  toward  prac-
tices that disadvantage and injure our consumers. 

Mr.  Calhoun,  the  point  you’ve  made  is  really  pretty  stunning, 
about subprime lenders not disclosing, and not required to disclose, 
the  escrow  requirements  that  will  have  to  be  borne  by  the  con-
sumer.  I  mean,  that  clearly,  it  seems  to  me,  is  deceptive.  Would 
you agree? 

Mr. CALHOUN. Yes. And it’s also counterintuitive, because, for ex-
ample,  if  you  look  in  the  prime  market,  Fannie  Mae  and  Freddy 
Mac  typically  require  escrows  on  prime  loans,  unless  there  is  a 
very  large  downpayment,  and  prime  borrowers  usually  have  a 
greater capacity to absorb payment—— 

Senator DORGAN. Right. 
Mr.  CALHOUN.—shocks.  In  the  subprime  market,  these  would  be 
the last loans where you would not escrow. But we talk to brokers 
and lenders, and they say, ‘‘Well, if we do include the escrow, other 
people  come  out  and  deceptively  undercut  us  by  excluding  the  es-
crow.’’ 

Senator  DORGAN.  Let  me  ask—because  I  am  not  as  knowledge-
able  about  this  area  as  perhaps  you  are,  you’ve  done  a  lot  of  re-
search—for  a  company  like  Countrywide,  which  I  think  was  the 
largest lender—is that the case? 

Mr. CALHOUN. They’re the largest mortgage lender—— 
Senator DORGAN. Yes. 
Mr. CALHOUN.—in the country. 
Senator  DORGAN.  And  if  they’re  engaged  in  the  subprime  area— 
and  I  understand  they  were—you’re  saying  that  a  large,  estab-
lished  company  is  presenting  mortgage  information  to  consumers 
and  is  not  describing  the  escrow  requirements?  And  I  think  you 
also  testified  they  are  not  actually  ascertaining  or  proving  the  in-
come of the potential borrower. Is that correct? 

Mr.  CALHOUN.  In  the  subprime  market,  almost  half  of  those 
loans  were  so-called  ‘‘no-doc’’  stated-income  loans.  And  doubly  de-
ceptive  is  that  the  borrowers  typically  did  not  realize  that  they 
would  pay  a  full  interest  point  extra  for  having  it  a  ‘‘no-doc’’  loan, 
that they could save a full 1 percent on their loan just by bringing 
in their W–2 statement. 

Senator DORGAN. ‘‘No-doc’’ means no documentation? 
Mr.  CALHOUN.  I’m  sorry,  yes,  no  documentation  of  your  income, 
no verification of your income. You just state what your income is, 
and that’s used to qualify you for the loan. 

Senator  DORGAN.  So,  one  would,  as  a  consumer,  appear  before— 
or  make  known  your  interest  to  the  largest  mortgage  company  in 
our  country  and  say  to  them,  ‘‘I’d  like  to  get  a  loan.  Here’s  my  in-
come,’’  with  no  verification  of  the  income,  and,  for  no  verification, 
you pay a higher rate. And, when they tell you what this mortgage 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00101 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

98 

is  going  to  cost,  they’re  free  to  tell  you  what  it  will  cost  without 
your  monthly  payment,  which  would  include  escrows  and  other 
matters. It seems to me, that, on its face, is deceptive. 

Mr. CALHOUN. And it becomes even more so, because these loans 
were  typically  sold—the  majority  of  the  subprime  loans  are  origi-
nated  by  a  mortgage  broker  initiating  the  contact  with  the  bor-
rower, rather than the borrower, for example, calling Countrywide. 
Countrywide  does  a  lot  of  direct  solicitation,  themselves.  And  so, 
the  broker  is  coming  in,  saying,  ‘‘You  can  borrow  X  dollars.  Here’s 
what  the  payment  will  be,’’  not  telling  you  that  it  doesn’t  include 
your taxes and insurance, the payment’s going to go way up—— 

Senator DORGAN. Right. 
Mr.  CALHOUN.—and  that  you  could  save  $1,000  or  more  a  year 

just by bringing in your W–2 statement. 

Senator  DORGAN.  It’s  just  almost  unbelievable  that  this  bubble 
could be created by people who felt that somehow this would work 
out  in  the  end.  You  indicated  that  35  to  50  percent  increases  in 
payments  would  ensue,  notwithstanding  the  escrow  issues.  But,  in 
several  years—2,  3,  4  years—you’re  going  to  see  your  payments 
jacked up 35, 50 percent, because your interest rate is going to sub-
stantially increase. Your written testimony doesn’t describe it quite 
as clearly. It’s not at variance with what you’ve just said. But what 
you said, I think, is clear as a roadmap to what are clearly, to me, 
deceptive practices by some very large companies. 

Others  of  you  have  talked  about  the  telecommunications  areas, 
about net neutrality, about other related issues—the oil and gas in-
dustry.  Dr.  Cooper,  you  have  previously  testified  before  this  com-
mittee  on  related  issues.  Your  testimony  is  very  helpful  to  remind 
us that there’s a need to have some passion in pursuing truth here 
with respect to big interests. Big is not always bad, and small isn’t 
always beautiful, but it is the case that, the clogging of the arteries 
of this marketplace is a serious problem for consumers, and we see 
that  clogging  of  the  arteries  through  mergers  in  virtually  every 
area,  but  none  really  any  more  aggressively  than  in  the  oil  indus-
try,  although  perhaps  telecommunications  is  a  close  second.  Both 
industries  are  substantially  concentrated.  And  I  appreciate  very 
much  your  testimony  on  these  matters.  As  we  think  through  how 
we  structure  and  write  a  reauthorization  bill  trying  to  provide  ad-
ditional  authority  to  the  FTC,  but  also  trying  to  stimulate  and  en-
courage additional activity I will certainly consider your testimony, 
as well. 

Dr. COOPER. Frankly, Mr. Chairman, the other parts of this body 
and this Committee have actually done the—taken the most impor-
tant steps to start to deal with this problem. As you’ve pointed out, 
the—it’s fascinating, the big mergers are gone. The double name— 
and you heard about a few small local mergers that the agency ac-
tually  tried  to  stop.  Of  course,  in  a  certain  sense,  the  horse  is  out 
of  the  barn.  The  only  way  that  we  will  restore  some  sanity  to  this 
market  is  by  delivering  to  the  President  an  energy  bill  that  con-
tains  what  this  body  passed,  a  dramatic  increase  in  the  supply  of 
non-oil  alternatives,  a  dramatic  reduction  in  the  demand  for  gaso-
line. That’s the only way we’re ever going to seize back this market 
from the domestic oil companies. And also, in the long run it’s fas-
cinating,  from  OPEC,  the—the  Chairwoman  pointed  out  that 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00102 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

99 

OPEC  sets  the  price  of  oil.  That  may  be  the  case,  but  they  get  an 
awful lot of help, these days, from the domestic oil companies. 

And  let  me  briefly  explain  why,  because  it  really  does  reinforce 
a point. Three years ago, OPEC was defending $40 a barrel. When 
they  met,  as  they  just  did  recently,  they  were  talking  about  $40  a 
barrel. In the intervening 3 years—and you quoted from the article 
in The Wall Street Journal that made the point—in the intervening 
3  years,  domestic  U.S.  refiners  increased  their  margins  dramati-
cally,  showing  that  there  was  more  rent  to  be  had.  As  an  econo-
mist,  you  know  that  term.  There  was  more  money  to  be  taken  out 
of consumers’ pocketbooks. And OPEC is a rent-seeking cartel. And 
so, when OPEC sees the price of gasoline lose touch with the price 
of  crude  oil,  they  know  that  the  American  consumer  can  be  made 
to  pay  more,  and  they  want  a  larger  share  of  that  rent.  And  The 
Wall  Street  Journal  article  explicitly  said  that.  This  is  competition 
between American refiners and OPEC crude oil producers over the 
rent that they want to extract from American consumers. 

And  so,  there’s  a  very  real  sense  in  which  what  happens  in  the 
domestic  U.S.  oil  market  influences,  dramatically,  the  price  of 
crude  oil.  The  Chairwoman  can  no  longer  say,  ‘‘OPEC  sets  the 
price,’’  because  what  we  do  here—we  consume  one-quarter  of  the 
gasoline  in  the  world—what  we  do  in  this  market,  what  domestic 
refiners  do,  actually  sends  a  strong  signal  to  OPEC  about  where 
the price of oil can go. 

Senator DORGAN. Dr. Cooper, thank you very much. 
Because  we  started  nearly  an  hour  late,  I  have  an  inability  to 
ask as many questions of this panel as I had wished to ask. I have 
to be somewhere at 12 o’clock. I hope you will understand. 

I,  again,  regret  the  inconvenience  to  all  of  you,  but  I  do  want  to 
tell  you  that,  as  we  put  together  a  reauthorization  bill,  your  testi-
mony,  your  comments,  your  thoughts  about  how  we  do  that,  about 
the  Federal  Trade  Commission,  about  what  is  happening  in  our 
economy,  and  the  role  of  its  regulatory  authority  are  going  to  be 
very helpful to us. 

So, I appreciate your being here today. And this hearing will now 

adjourn. 

[Whereupon, at 11:55 a.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00103 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00104 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

I  would  like  to  thank  Chairman  Majoras  and  all  the  witnesses  for  being  here 
today.  This  is  the  Committee’s  second  opportunity  this  year  to  hear  from  the  FTC 
Chairman concerning the Commission’s current activities. 

I appreciate the Chairman’s willingness to testify today, and know that the entire 
Committee  is  grateful  for  the  Commission’s  hard  work  on  the  recent  ‘‘Broadband 
Connectivity Competition Policy Report’’ and the ‘‘2006 Spring and Summer Nation-
wide Gasoline Price Increase Report.’’ 

In  addition  to  the  written  testimony  provided  to  the  Committee,  I  trust  that  all 
the  witnesses  will  provide  their  vision  for  the  FTC  and  how  best  the  Commission 
can protect consumers. 

Practical recommendations on how best the Committee can assist the FTC in ful-
filling its mandates will benefit the members of this Committee when the FTC reau-
thorization legislation is taken up. 

By working in a bipartisan fashion the Committee will have the best opportunity 
to reauthorize the FTC since its authorization expired in 1998. Once again, I thank 
the witnesses for being here. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

HON. DEBORAH PLATT MAJORAS 

Question 1. The Commission has recently updated its identity theft website to in-
clude information about state ‘‘security freeze’’ laws, which give consumers the right 
to freeze access to their credit files to prevent new account fraud. Thirty-nine states 
have  now  passed  such  laws.  The  state  laws  usually  require  consumers  to  pay  a 
small fee to freeze, temporarily lift, or remove the freeze. In addition to state freeze 
rights,  under  Federal  law,  consumers  have  the  right  to  opt-out  from  pre-approved 
credit  card  offers;  to  place,  at  no  cost,  a  temporary  fraud  alert  on  their  credit  files; 
and  to  receive  a  free  credit  report  annually  from  each  of  the  three  credit  bureaus. 
The Committee is aware of new web-based businesses providing identity theft pre-
vention  services  that  offer  to  provide  consumers  with  the  above  services  (freeze, 
fraud  alert,  opt-out,  and  annual  credit  reports)  as  part  of  a  bundle  of  prevention 
services,  without  disclosing  that  consumers  may  on  their  own  access  these  services 
at lower or no cost. 

Is the Commission examining whether such services and promotions comply with 
Section  5  of  the  Federal  Trade  Commission  Act?  Has  the  Commission  evaluated 
whether state laws allow the placement of a security freeze through intermediaries? 
Has  the  Commission  evaluated  whether  these  intermediaries  can  properly  assure 
the identity of their clients seeking to place a freeze? What information should these 
businesses  disclose  In  order  to  ensure  that  consumers  are  not  led  to  believe  they 
can  only  receive  services,  such  as  a  security  freeze,  by  using  such  businesses’  serv-
ices? 

Answer.  As  consumer  concerns  about  identity  theft  have  proliferated,  a  number 
of products and services intended to help consumers avoid being victimized have be-
come  available.  Some  of  these  prevention  products  and  services  are  mandated  by 
state or Federal law. For example, under the Fair and Accurate Credit Transactions 
Act of 2003 (FACT Act),1 which amended the Fair Credit Reporting Act, consumers 
have a number of new rights, including the right to place a fraud alert on their cred-
it  files,  thus  signaling  creditors  and  other  potential  users  of  the  report  to  exercise 
caution  in  verifying  the  identity  of  an  applicant.  Consumer  also  have  the  right  to 
a free annual credit report from each of the nationwide consumer reporting agencies 
(CRAs).  Other  prevention  products  and  services  are  not  mandated  by  law,  but  are 
sold  commercially  by  CRAs  and  other  businesses.  For  example,  the  nationwide 

1 Pub. L. 108–159, 117 Stat. 1952 (December 4, 2003). 

(101) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00105 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

102 

Inc.,  a 

creator  of 

CRAs  and  others  sell  credit  monitoring  services,  which  alert  consumers  to  changes 
in their credit reports that might indicate the presence of identity theft. 

subsidiary  of  Experian  and 

The  Commission  is  aware  of  the  potential  for  consumer  confusion  about  which  of 
these  products  are  available  by  law  and  which  are  commercial  products,  and  about 
the  cost  of  the  products.  The  Commission  actively  monitors  the  practices  of  busi-
nesses selling these products to ensure that they are not deceptive or unfair. In Au-
gust  2005,  the  agency  filed  a  complaint  in  Federal  district  court  against 
Consumerinfo.com, 
the 
‘‘freecreditreports’’ promotion.2 The complaint alleged that Consumerinfo deceptively 
marketed ‘‘free credit reports’’ without disclosing that its reports were not associated 
with  the  FACT  Act  free  annual  report  program.  The  complaint  also  alleged  that 
Consumerinfo deceived consumers by not adequately disclosing that consumers who 
ordered the ‘‘free report’’ were automatically enrolled in a credit monitoring service, 
and  that  those  who  failed  to  cancel  the  service  within  30  days  would  be  charged 
an  annually  renewing  membership 
fee  of  $79.95.  To  settle  the  charges, 
Consumerinfo  agreed  to  a  court  order  requiring  them  to  make  clear  and  prominent 
disclosures (i) that their free reports are not affiliated with the FACT Act program, 
and  (ii)  of  all  of  the  material  terms  and  conditions  of  the  offer.  In  addition, 
Consumerinfo  agreed  to  offer  refunds  to  deceived  consumers,  and  to  pay  an  addi-
tional $950,000 as disgorgement of ill-gotten gains. 

In  February  2007,  the  Commission  alleged  that  Consumerinfo  had  violated  the 
terms of the court order by not making sufficient disclosures about the terms of the 
offer, and the company agreed to pay an additional $300,000.3 The Commission also 
sent  warning  letters  to  over  130  Internet  firms  that  purported  to  be  offering  ‘‘free’’ 
credit reports, many of which used common misspellings or variants of the approved 
free  annual  credit  report  website,  annualcreditreport.com.  In  addition,  to  help  con-
sumers  avoid  deceptive  ‘‘free  report’’  promotions,  the  Commission  has  published  a 
number of educational materials that are available in print and on the FTC website. 
For  example,  the  Commission  has  disseminated  two  consumer  alerts  warning  con-
sumers about ‘‘imposter’’ free report websites.4 

With  respect  to  ‘‘credit’’  or  ‘‘security’’  freezes,  as  you  note  39  states  have  enacted 
laws giving some or all consumers the right to freeze their credit file to prevent ac-
cess  by  third-parties.  In  addition,  the  three  nationwide  CRAs  recently  announced 
plans to offer credit freezes to consumers nationwide. The laws and programs differ 
in many respects, including who is eligible (all consumers or only identity theft vic-
tims),  the  means  by  which  consumers  can  place  a  freeze,  and  the  fees  charged  for 
placing, temporarily lifting, and removing a freeze. 

As you know, President Bush issued an Executive Order on May 10, 2006, estab-
lishing  an  identity  theft  task  force.5 Comprised  of  17  Federal  agencies,  the  mission 
of the task force was to develop a strategic plan to marshal the resources of the Fed-
eral  Government  in  a  comprehensive  effort  to  combat  identity  theft.  On  April  11  of 
this year, the Task Force issued its strategic plan, with 31 recommendations on ac-
tions  that  should  be  taken  to  prevent  identity  theft,  ameliorate  its  impact  on  vic-
tims,  and  prosecute  the  criminals.6 I  am  pleased  to  note  that  most  of  these  rec-
ommendations  have  already  been  implemented  or  are  well  along  in  the  process  of 
being implemented. 

Among  the  recommendations  of  the  Task  Force  was  that  the  FTC,  with  support 
from other member agencies, conduct an assessment of the impact and effectiveness 
of  state  credit  freeze  laws  and  report  the  results  in  the  first  quarter  of  2008.7 The 
Commission staff has made substantial progress in carrying out the assessment and 
is on track to report its results in early 2008. 

In  response  to  your  question  about  the  propriety  of  intermediaries  offering  to 
place  security  freezes  on  behalf  of  consumers,  the  Commission  is  not  aware  of  any 
state  law  that  would  prohibit  such  practices,  so  long  as  they  are  offered  in  a  non-
deceptive  manner.  The  Commission  will  continue  to  monitor  the  marketplace  for 
these  products  and  services,  and  is  prepared  to  investigate  and  act  against  busi-
nesses  that  make  false  or  misleading  claims.  In  addition,  the  Commission  has  and 
will  continue  to  educate  consumers  on  their  FACT  Act  and  credit  freeze  rights  so 

2 FTC v. Consumerinfo.com, Inc., No. SACV050–801 AHS (MLGx) (C.D. Cal. August 15, 2005). 
3 FTC v. Consumerinfo.com, Inc., No. SACV050–801 AHS (MLGx) (C.D. Cal. January 8, 2007). 
4 See  http://wvvw.ftc.gov/bcp/edu/pubs/consumer/alerts/alt156.shtm;  http://www.ftc.gov/ 

bcp/conline/pubs/alerts/fakealrt.shtm. 

5 Executive Order 13402 (May 10, 2006). 
6 The President’s Identity Theft Task Force, Combating Identity Theft: A Strategic Plan, avail-

able at www.idtheft.gov. 

7 Id. at 52. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00106 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

that  they  can  make  informed  decisions  about  whether  to  seek  the  help  of  an  inter-
mediary in exercising those rights. 

103 

Question  2.  According  to  recent  press  reports,  unscrupulous  olive  oil  producers 
have  been  branding  oils  as  ‘‘extra  virgin  olive  oil,’’  the  highest  and  most  expensive 
grade, even if it is of lesser quality or not even olive oil. In February 2006, Federal 
marshals seized about sixty-one thousand liters of what was supposedly extra-virgin 
olive oil and twenty-six thousand liters of a lower-grade olive oil from a New Jersey 
warehouse. Some of that oil turned out to be mostly soybean oil even though it was 
labeled olive oil. Consumers are willing to pay a significant premium for ‘‘extra vir-
gin’’  olive  oil  for  perceived  health  and  taste  benefits.  Bad  actors  should  not  be  able 
to  take  advantage  of  this  by  fraudulently  marketing  soybean  oil  or  lesser  grades  of 
olive  oil  as  ‘‘extra  virgin  olive  oil’’  in  order  to  overcharge  consumers.  What  steps  is 
the  Commission  taking  to  examine  whether  manufacturers  and  retailers  are  vio-
lating  Section  5  of  the  Federal  Trade  Commission  Act  when  they  market  oil  as 
‘‘extra virgin olive oil’’ when it is not? Does the Commission intend to take enforce-
ment action if it determines that manufacturers and retailers are acting in violation 
of Section 5? 

Answer.  Issues  of  adulterated  or  misbranded  food  products  are  primarily  within 
the  jurisdiction  of  the  Food  and  Drug  Administration  (FDA),  rather  than  the  Fed-
eral  Trade  Commission.8 Manufacturing  and  labeling  of  olive  oil  must  comply  with 
FDA’s general provisions on misbranding and adulteration. Under the Federal Food, 
Drug,  and  Cosmetic  Act,  olive  oil  is  adulterated  if  another  oil  is  substituted  for  the 
olive  oil  in  whole  or  in  part.9 In  addition,  the  FDA  has  issued  specific  regulations 
governing the common or usual name permitted for olive oil and other vegetable oils 
and requiring that mixtures of oils must be labeled to show all oils present in order 
of  predominance.10 To  enforce  these  standards,  FDA  has  the  authority  to  conduct 
field  investigations  of  manufacturing  facilities.  When  FDA  identifies  olive  oil  prod-
ucts  that  are  adulterated  or  mislabeled,  the  agency  can  pursue  a  seizure  action  or 
product recall. 

The FDA has taken repeated action to recall or seize adulterated olive oil products 
over  the  past  several  years.  The  Federal  seizure  in  New  Jersey  in  February  2006, 
to  which  you  refer,  was  the  outcome  of  an  FDA  investigation.  In  addition,  in  1996, 
FDA  obtained  a  consent  decree  for  the  destruction  of  misbranded  olive  oil  that  had 
been  adulterated  with  canola  oil.11 The  agency  also  took  seizure  action  in  1997 
against Krinos Foods for using sunflower oil in place of olive oil, and in 2000 against 
Cheney Brothers Inc. for using sunflower and soybean oil in place of olive oil.12 FDA 
staff  has  advised  us  that  the  agency  continues  to  follow  up  as  resources  permit  on 
specific  instances  in  which  it  has  received  information  that  ‘‘olive  oil’’  products  are 
adulterated with other vegetable oils. 

We  recognize  that  the  passing  off  of  other  vegetable  oils  as  olive  oil  raises  issues 
of  economic  harm  to  consumers  and  competition.  It  may  also  present  potential 
health  implications.  We  believe,  however,  that  the  FDA  has  the  investigatory  tools 
and  enforcement  powers  best  suited  to  address  this  problem.  As  in  all  matters  in-
volving our overlapping authority, the two agencies will coordinate closely to ensure 
effective enforcement. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. BYRON L. DORGAN TO 

HON. DEBORAH PLATT MAJORAS 

Question  1.  As  we  look  to  reauthorization  legislation,  can  you  tell  me  what  your 
priority would be to include in the legislation? What would be the priorities of your 
fellow Commissioners? 

Answer.  As  noted  in  the  Commission’s  September  12  testimony,  the  Commission 
continues  to  support  the  repeal  of  the  telecommunications  common  carrier  exemp-
tion to address the consumer protection challenges posed by technology convergence. 

8 The  FTC  shares  jurisdiction  with  the  FDA  over  the  marketing  of  food  products  pursuant  to 
a  regulatory  scheme  established  by  Congress  through  complementary  statutes.  Under  a  long-
standing  liaison  agreement  governing  the  division  of  responsibilities  between  the  two  agencies, 
the FTC has primary responsibility for claims in advertising and the FDA has primary responsi-
bility for claims on product labeling. Working Agreement Between FTC and Food and Drug Ad-
ministration, 4 Trade Reg. Rep. (CCH) ¶ 9,850.01 (1971). 

9 Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, Sec. 402(b)(2). 21 U.S.C. § 342(b)(2). 
10 21 C.F.R. § 101.4(b)(14). 
11 See Greco-Roman, Inc., Civil Action No. 96–1834 CIV-Davis (S.D. Fla. 1996). 
12 See  FDA  Enforcement  Report  for  October  12,  2005,  available  at  http://www.fda.gov/bbs/ 

topics/enforce/2005/ENF000921.html. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00107 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

104 

Currently,  the  FTC  Act  exempts  common  carriers  subject  to  the  Communications 
Act from its prohibitions on unfair or deceptive acts or practices and unfair methods 
of  competition.  This  exemption  dates  from  a  period  when  telecommunications  were 
provided  by  government-authorized,  highly  regulated  monopolies.  The  exemption  is 
now outdated. Congress and the Federal Communications Commission (‘‘FCC’’) have 
dismantled  much  of  the  economic  regulatory  apparatus  formerly  applicable  to  the 
industry, and in the current world, firms are expected to compete in providing tele-
communications  services.  Technological  advances  have  blurred  the  traditional 
boundaries  between  telecommunications,  entertainment,  and  information.  As  the 
telecommunications  and  Internet  industries  continue  to  converge,  the  common  car-
rier exemption can frustrate the FTC’s ability to stop deceptive and unfair acts and 
practices  and  unfair  methods  of  competition  with  respect  to  interconnected  commu-
nications, information, entertainment, and payment services. 

Additional  legislative  priorities  include:  prohibiting  brand  name  drug  companies 
from  paying  generic  companies  not  to  compete  at  the  expense  of  consumers,  while 
allowing  exceptions  for  those  agreements  that  do  not  harm  competition;  ensuring 
that  the  Commission  has  authority  to  impose  civil  penalties  in  cases  in  which  the 
Commission’s  traditional  equitable  remedies  are  inadequate,  such  as  spyware  and 
data security cases; and reauthorizing the National Do Not Call Registry and, if nec-
essary,  allowing  for  the  permanent  registration  of  phone  numbers  on  the  Registry. 
Commissioner  Harbour  states  that  her  legislative  priorities  include:  repeal  of  the 
common  carrier  exemption,  in  recognition  of  the  convergence  dynamic  of  today’s 
high-tech economy, so the Commission can make even better use of its unique com-
bination  of  competition  and  consumer  protection  expertise  for  the  benefit  of  Amer-
ican  consumers;  legislation  that  would  repeal  the  Leegin  decision,  to  the  extent  it 
has created per se legality for vertical minimum price fixing agreements, and clarify 
the application of the rule of reason to distribution restraints in the wake of Leegin; 
legislation to ensure that consumers reap the full benefits of competition by generic 
drugs, 
including  generic  pharmaceuticals  as  well  as  follow-on  biologics  or 
biosimilars;  and  legislation  granting  authority  over  cigarette  testing  to  one  of  the 
Federal Government’s science-based public health agencies, and prohibiting the use 
of claims based on the inaccurate Cambridge Filter Method (also known as the ‘‘FTC 
Method’’) for testing tar and nicotine. 

Commissioner  Leibowitz  states  his  legislative  priorities  include  consideration  of 
the  following:  increasing  FTC  resources  by  ten  to  fifteen  percent  annually  for  the 
next 5 years, including adding fifty or more full-time equivalent employees (‘‘FTEs’’) 
each year; 1 enhancing civil penalty authority, including authorizing the FTC to rep-
resent itself in civil penalty cases and authorizing the agency to seek civil penalties 
for  certain  violations  of  Section  5  of  the  FTC  Act  (where  the  FTC’s  equitable  rem-
edies  are  often  inadequate  to  deter  malefactors  engaged  in  fraud);  authorizing  the 
FTC  to  promulgate  rules  under  the  Administrative  Procedure  Act  to  prohibit 
nonbank  subprime  mortgage  brokers  and  financial  service  providers  from  engaging 
in  unfair  or  deceptive  acts  or  practices  (the  FTC  Act’s  current  ‘‘Magnuson  Moss’’ 
rulemaking  procedures  are  much  more  cumbersome  and  time-consuming  than  APA 
procedures); repealing the FTC Act’s exemption for telecommunications common car-
riers; authorizing the FTC to initiate civil actions under the FTC Act against ‘‘aiders 
and  abettors’’  of  consumer  fraud  (the  FTC  may  prosecute  those  who  knowingly  as-
sist  and  facilitate  Telemarketing  Sales  Rule  violations,  such  as  electronic  payment 
processors  and  lead  list  brokers,  yet  in  some  instances  it  can  be  more  difficult  to 
pursue  enforcement  action  against  similar  aiders  and  abettors  outside  the  tele-
marketing context); amending the FTC Act to limit appeals of Commission adminis-
trative orders to jurisdictions where respondents reside or have their principal place 
of  business,  or  to  the  U.S.  Court  of  Appeals  for  the  D.C.  Circuit  (to  prevent  the 
rampant ‘‘forum shopping’’ that all too often occurs when a party appeals a Commis-
sion  decision);  and  modifying  the  requirement  for  reports  on  concentration  in  the 
ethanol markets from annually to every 5 years (all studies so far have shown that 
there is no market concentration). In addition, outside of the reauthorization, Com-
missioner  Leibowitz’s  highest  legislative  priorities  include:  prohibiting  brand  name 
drug companies from paying their generic competitors to delay entering the market 
(such anti-competitive agreements cost both consumers and the Federal Government 
billions of dollars annually); and reauthorizing the Do Not Call Implementation Act, 

1 Today, the FTC has only 1,074 FTEs, far fewer than 25 years ago. Yet in the last few years 
alone, Congress has passed a variety of important new laws that the FTC is charged with imple-
menting  and  enforcing,  e.g.,  the  CAN–SPAM  Act,  the  Fair  and  Accurate  Credit  Transactions 
Act,  the  Children’s  Online  Privacy  Protection  Act,  the  Gramm-Leach-Bliley  Act,  and  the  U.S. 
SAFE WEB Act. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00108 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

105 

including  providing  for  permanent  registration  of  telephone  numbers  on  the  Na-
tional Do Not Call Registry. 

Commissioner Kovacic states that his legislative priorities include legislation pro-
hibiting  reverse  payments  from  brand  name  drug  companies  to  generic  companies 
and  legislation  to  repeal  the  common  carrier  exemptions,  particularly  the  tele-
communications exemption. 

Commissioner  Rosch  states  that  he  considers  the  following  his  legislative  prior-
ities: elimination of the requirement that consumers re-register for the Do Not Call 
Registry; enhanced civil penalty authority that would allow the Commission to pur-
sue civil penalties under more circumstances and without providing a referral to the 
Department  of  Justice;  elimination  of  the  common  carrier  exemption;  and  prohibi-
tion of anticompetitive pharmaceutical patent settlements in which a brand drug ef-
fectively pays a generic drug to stay out of a market. 

Question 2. You say in your testimony that you ‘‘would like to work with the Com-
mittee  to  help  ensure  that  [your]  reauthorization  includes  appropriate  increases  in 
resources  to  meet  these  growing  challenges.’’  In  your  testimony  you  do  not  state  a 
specific number of employees that would be necessary for the FTC to be fully effec-
tive,  and  at  the  hearing  you  stated  that  it’s  difficult  to  bring  in  a  large  number  of 
new staff. Could you not grow on an incremental basis over a number of years? 

Answer.  In  my  testimony,  I  highlighted  the  difficulties  that  a  small  agency  like 
the FTC faces when it seeks to absorb a large number of new employees at one time, 
in addition to replacing FTE lost due to normal attrition and retirement. There are, 
of  course,  significant  costs  associated  with  such  hiring,  including  the  expenses  re-
lated to recruitment and interviewing, training, facilities, furnishings, desktops, and 
equipment.  With  the  addition  of  programmatic  FTE  comes  the  necessary  increase 
in  human  resources,  technology,  facilities  and  records  management  staff  to  support 
those  new  hires.  Nonetheless,  I  believe  the  FTC  can,  and  should,  grow  incremen-
tally,  and  I  anticipate  that  the  agency  will  need  an  additional  approximately  100 
FTE over the next five fiscal years to meet workload demands. 

The  FTC  continues  to  face  a  demanding  merger  review  workload  as  the  volume 
of  merger  activity  has  increased  significantly  since  FY  2004.  Based  on  current 
trends,  the  FTC  expects  the  high  volume  of  merger  work  to  continue  to  FY  2009 
and  beyond.  The  FTC  needs  to  ensure  that  it  has  sufficient  staff  and  resources  to 
meet an increasing number of merger investigations. Identifying and stopping anti-
competitive  conduct  also  is  a  priority,  and  the  FTC  will  continue  to  pursue  aggres-
sively  nonmerger  matters,  particularly  in  the  health  care,  pharmaceutical,  energy, 
technology, and real estate sectors. The FTC also is committed to promoting conver-
gence  in  competition  policy  so  that  foreign  enforcement  practices  do  not  unfairly 
burden U.S. businesses and consumers participating in foreign markets. In sum, the 
FTC wants to make sure that it has the authority, personnel, systems support, and 
resources  needed  to  ensure  that  it  can  vigorously  protect  American  consumers  and 
promote a robust and vibrant marketplace free of anticompetitive mergers and anti-
competitive business practices. It also must have the necessary resources to educate 
consumers  and  businesses  about  the  importance  of  competition  and  to  conduct  re-
search  and  studies  on  complex  legal  and  economic  issues  used  in  developing  anti-
trust policy. 

On  the  consumer  protection  side,  over  the  course  of  the  past  few  years,  Congress 
has enacted a number of new laws that charge the FTC, at least in part, with their 
implementation and enforcement, including the CAN–SPAM Act, the Fair and Accu-
rate  Credit  Transactions  Act,  the  Children’s  Online  Privacy  Protection  Act,  the 
Gramm-Leach-Bliley  Act,  and  the  U.S.  SAFE  WEB  Act.  The  FTC  needs  sufficient 
staff to meet these added obligations, as well as its continuing strategic goal to pre-
vent  fraud,  deception,  and  unfair  business  practices  in  the  marketplace.  The  FTC 
is  committed  to  protecting  consumers  from  unfair  and  deceptive  practices  in  the  fi-
nancial  services  sector  (mortgage  lending  and  debt  collection),  the  burgeoning  area 
of  ‘‘green’’  marketing,  and  with  respect  to  the  marketing  and  advertising  of  food  to 
children. The agency will work hard to fight spam and spyware, and to understand 
and  anticipate  other  high  tech  tools  fraudsters  have  yet  to  exploit.  The  FTC  wants 
to  ensure  that  consumers  are  fully  protected  in  the  areas  of  privacy  and  identity 
theft  and  with  respect  to  deceptive  and  unfair  practices  in  mobile  marketing.  The 
agency  intends  to  exploit  the  tools  it  has  been  afforded  under  the  U.S.  SAFE  WEB 
Act  to  work  with  its  foreign  partners  in  combating  cross-border  fraud  and  to  im-
prove compliance with FTC orders. Finally, history has proven the value of a robust 
consumer  education  program  to  support  each  of  our  consumer  protection  enforce-
ment  initiatives.  Accordingly,  the  FTC  expects  to  expand  dramatically  efforts  to 
keep U.S. consumers abreast of the many challenges posed by unscrupulous market-
ers in the marketplace. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00109 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

106 

Each of these programmatic areas and the many agency-wide initiatives described 
more  fully  in  my  testimony  before  the  Committee,  of  course,  require  support  in  the 
areas  of  information  technology,  human  resources,  financial  management,  facilities 
expansion, equal employment opportunities, and records management. 

I  believe  the  FTC  can  meet  these  new  and  ongoing  challenges  with  incremental 
staff  growth  and  an  overall  staff  increase  over  the  next  five  fiscal  years  of  approxi-
mately 100 FTE. The FTC will also need significant investment in information tech-
nology  to:  (1)  support  a  more  fully  developed  disaster  recovery  plan;  (2)  modernize 
large  segments  of  FTC  network  infrastructure;  (3)  provide  for  increased  computer 
storage capacity for e-filing and e-discovery; (4) upgrade litigation support tools and 
contract  for  forensic  acquisition  support;  and  (5)  modernize  FTC  business  systems 
components to improve financial management. With any increase in FTE, of course, 
comes  a  concomitant  increase  in  cost  for  space/rent,  furnishings,  desktops,  and 
equipment. 

Question  3a.  I  have  seen  reports  about  Comcast  cutting  off  the  service  of  some 
of its customers who it alleges have used too much bandwidth, despite the fact that 
they  advertise  unlimited  service.  This  sounds  like  a  case  of  deceptive  advertising 
(and a poor business practice). Is this something the FTC will be investigating? 

Answer.  Without  commenting  on  the  practices  of  a  particular  company,  I  can  as-
sure you that if an Internet service provider misrepresents, or fails to disclose, ma-
terial  aspects  of  its  services  in  advertising  or  marketing  to  consumers,  it  would  be 
liable  for  violations  of  Section  5  of  the  Federal  Trade  Commission  Act,  which  pro-
hibits unfair and deceptive acts and practices. 

For  over  a  decade  now,  the  FTC  has  enforced  the  consumer  protection  and  anti-
trust  laws  in  numerous  matters  involving  Internet  access.  In  particular,  the  FTC 
has  investigated  and  brought  enforcement  actions  against  ISPs  for  allegedly  decep-
tive  marketing,  advertising,  and  billing  of  Internet  access  services.  The  FTC  will 
continue to work to protect consumers in the important area of Internet access. 

Question  3b.  If  this  were  a  phone  company  classified  as  a  common  carrier,  and 
not  Comcast,  could  the  FTC  have  trouble  taking  action  due  to  the  common  carrier 
exemption? 

Answer. That is entirely possible. On the one hand, there should not be any juris-
dictional  obstacle  to  enforcement  of  the  FTC  Act  against  a  telephone  company  that 
is  offering  broadband  Internet  access,  because  an  entity  is  a  common  carrier  only 
with  respect  to  services  that  it  provides  on  a  common  carrier  basis.  Because 
broadband  Internet  access  provided  by  a  wireline,  facilities-based  entity,  such  as  a 
telephone company (as in your example in part (b) above), is not provided on a com-
mon  carrier  basis,  such  access  is  subject  to  the  FTC’s  general  competition  and  con-
sumer  protection  authority.  On  the  other  hand,  in  practice,  as  a  result  of  the  com-
mon  carrier  exemption,  the  issue  of  jurisdiction  is  often  raised  and  litigated—even 
when  FTC  jurisdiction  appears  to  be  clear.2 In  such  cases,  the  FTC  is  forced  to  ex-
pend substantial time and resources litigating a jurisdictional question, rather than 
enforcing the FTC Act, potentially at the expense of consumers. 

Question  4.  Do  you  believe  the  FTC  should  investigate  whether  the  broadband 
providers’ advertised speeds are the actual speeds or if consumers are getting over-
charged and deceived? 

Answer. As noted above, for more than a decade, the FTC has monitored the prac-
tices  of  Internet  service  providers  and  brought  cases  where  we  believe  ISPs  have 
engaged  in  deceptive  marketing,  advertising,  and  billing  practices.  As  increasing 
numbers of U.S. consumers have chosen to subscribe to broadband services, the FTC 
has  been  closely  monitoring  the  claims  made  by  broadband  providers  in  marketing 
their  services  to  consumers.  With  respect  to  the  issue  of  speed  claims,  last  spring 
we issued a staff report on Broadband Connectivity Competition Policy, which noted 
that ‘‘speed is one of the primary qualitative features on which broadband providers 
are  competing.’’ 3 Therefore,  it  is  important  that  any  claims  about  speed  made  by 
Internet service providers be truthful and accurate. The FTC will investigate wheth-
er  broadband  providers  are  making  claims  about  speed  that  violate  FTC  consumer 
protection laws. 

Question  5a.  Verizon  has  been  cutting  their  copper  wire  after  they  switch  their 
customers to fiber. This ensures that another competing company cannot offer serv-
ice over this old wire. Would the FTC investigate this anti-competitive practice? 

2 See,  e.g.,  Federal  Trade  Commission  Staff,  Broadband  Connectivity  Competition  Policy  40– 
41  (June  2007)  [hereinafter  Broadband  Report],  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/reports/ 
broadband/v070000report.pdf  (discussing  enforcement  difficulties  posed  by  the  common  carrier 
exemption). 

3 Id. at 131. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00110 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

dling this? 

107 

Answer. Again, without commenting on the practices of a particular company, the 
FTC  will  continue  to  enforce  the  antitrust  and  consumer  protection  laws  in  the 
Internet access area. Whether Verizon’s alleged practices are anti-competitive under 
the  Federal  antitrust  laws  is  a  question  that  I  cannot  answer  in  the  abstract.  As 
a  general  matter,  the  antitrust  laws  do  not  require  a  company  to  provide  access  to 
its  proprietary  facilities  to  its  competitors.4 In  any  case,  the  FTC  will  continue  to 
enforce  the  antitrust  laws  in  the  Internet  access  area—as  it  does  in  other  areas 
within  its  jurisdiction—by  carefully  analyzing  the  competitive  effects  of  particular 
conduct and business arrangements within properly defined relevant markets. 

Question  5b.  Would  the  common  carrier  exemption  prevent  the  FTC  from  han-

Answer.  As  indicated  in  my  response  to  number  three  above,  the  FTC  has  juris-
diction over the provision of broadband Internet access. However, the FTC may en-
counter  enforcement  difficulties  in  this  situation  due  to  the  fact  that,  as  a  result  of 
the common carrier exemption, the FTC would have jurisdiction to address potential 
consumer  ha=  resulting  from  this  practice  in  the  provision  of  broadband  Internet 
access  but  not  in  the  provision  of  common  carrier  voice  service,  both  of  which  may 
be transmitted over the same copper wire. 

Question  6.  You  argue,  along  the  talking  points  of  the  incumbent  broadband  pro-
viders,  that  nondiscrimination  rules  are  not  necessary  because  the  broadband  mar-
ket is so competitive. Does the FTC currently have sufficient tools to even accurately 
determine whether Americans have access to broadband? 

Answer.  In  the  report,  Broadband  Connectivity  Competition  Policy,  FTC  staff  ob-
served that, on a national scale, the broadband market appears to be moving in the 
direction of more, not less, competition, as evidenced by fast growth in consumer de-
mand  for  broadband,  increasing  access  speeds,  declining  prices  (particularly  speed- 
or  quality-adjusted  prices),  and  new  entrants  poised  to  challenge  the  incumbent 
cable and telephone companies.5 The report, however, did not conclude that any par-
ticular  local  broadband  market  regardless  of  how  such  market  may  be  defined—is 
competitive.6 In  any  case,  the  report  acknowledged  the  existence  of  substantial 
agreement on the part of both proponents and opponents of network neutrality regu-
lation  that  increased  competition  in  the  broadband  area  would  benefit  consumers. 
Based in part on this and other factors suggesting that the broadband marketplace 
remains  a  dynamic,  unsettled  environment,  the  report  counseled  caution  in  evalu-
ating proposals to enact regulation at this time. 

The  FTC  has  not  engaged  in  a  broad  inquiry  into  the  state  of  broadband  infra-
structure  deployment  throughout  the  United  States.  However,  in  implementing  its 
statutory  mandate,  the  Federal  Communications  Commission  periodically  assesses 
and reports on the state of such deployment. I understand that you are cosponsoring 
legislation  that  would,  among  other  things,  require  the  FCC  to  revise  its  methods 
for assessing broadband deployment.7 

Regarding  the  application  of  the  antitrust  and  consumer  protection  laws  to  spe-
cific  conduct  and  business  arrangements,  the  FTC  currently  has  sufficient  tools  to 
investigate and determine whether violations of such laws may be occurring. In fact, 
the  FTC  will  work  to  ensure  competition  and  protect  consumers  in  the  broadband 
Internet access marketplace. 

Question  7.  I  understand  the  Consumer  Product  Safety  Commission  is  over-
whelmed  right  now  with  unsafe  products  and  recalls.  Can  you  tell  me  the  history 
of  how  the  Consumer  Product  Safety  Commission  grew  out  of  the  Federal  Trade 
Commission?  And  are  there  areas  where  the  FTC  has  Jurisdiction  and  could  step 
in  to  help  to  ensure  consumers  are  not  being  deceived  or  that  products  are  accu-
rately labeled? 

Answer.  Following  a  report  by  the  National  Commission  on  Product  Safety,  in 
1972, Congress created the CPSC with the specific mission of protecting consumers 
against unreasonable risk of injury from hazardous products.8 In so doing, Congress 

(2004). 

4 See, e.g., Verizon Communications Inc. v. Law Offices of Curtis v. Trinko, LLP, 540 U.S. 398 

5 See Broadband Report, supra note 757, at 155–56. 
6 Id. at 156 (‘‘This Report and the findings herein do not reflect a case-by-case analysis of the 
state of competition in each of the localities that may represent relevant markets under the anti-
trust laws.’’). 

7 Broadband Data Improvement Act, S. 1492, 110th Cong. (2007). 
8 Consumer  Product  Safety  Act,  Pub.  L.  92–573  (1972),  H.R.  Conf.  Rpt.  No.  92–1593  (1972), 
reprinted  in  1972  U.S.C.C.A.N.  4596;  see  also  www.cpsc.gov/about/faq.html  (visited  Oct.  18, 
2007); Testimony of Hon. Nancy A. Nord, Acting Chairman, U.S. Consumer Product Safety Com-
mission, before the Senate Subcommittee on Consumer Affairs, Insurance, and Automotive Safe-
Continued 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00111 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

108 

transferred  authority  from  a  number  of  existing  Federal  agencies,  including  the 
then-Department  of  Health,  Education  and  Welfare,  the  Department  of  Commerce, 
the  Environmental  Protection  Agency  (‘‘EPA’’),  as  well  as  the  FTC,  to  the  CPSC.9 
From  the  FTC  specifically,  the  CPSC  received  only  the  Commission’s  authority  re-
lating to flammable fabrics and refrigerator safety.10 

Congress  directed  the  CPSC  to  protect  the  public  against  physical  injury  and 
harm.  The  CPSC’s  tools  are  directly  focused  on  ensuring  that  products  introduced 
into  the  stream  of  commerce  and  used  by  consumers  are  not  unreasonably  haz-
ardous.  These  tools  include  issuance  and  enforcement  of  mandatory  safety  stand-
ards,  product  bans  where  adequate  safety  standards  cannot  be  developed,  and  re-
calls  of  products  already  in  the  marketplace  or  purchased.  Its  jurisdiction  applies 
specifically and strictly to consumer product safety.11 

Although the FTC also works to protect consumers, it plays a different role than. 
the CPSC. The FTC is primarily a law enforcement agency whose statutory author-
ity allows us to take action against ‘‘unfair or deceptive acts or practices in or affect-
ing  commerce.’’  15  U.S.C.  § 45(a)  (‘‘Section  5’’).  A  representation,  omission,  or  prac-
tice  is  deceptive  if  (1)  it  is  likely  to  mislead  consumers  acting  reasonably  under  the 
circumstances;  and  (2)  it  is  material—that  is,  likely  to  affect  consumers’  conduct  or 
decisions  with  respect  to  the  product  at  issue.12 An  act  or  practice  is  unfair  if  the 
injury  to  consumers  it  causes  or  is  likely  to  cause  (1)  is  substantial;  (2)  is  not  out-
weighed  by  countervailing  benefits  to  consumers  or  to  competition;  and  (3)  is  not 
reasonably avoidable by consumers themselves.13 

Accordingly,  the  FTC  has  taken  action  against  deceptive  advertising  and  label-
ing 14 of  products,  including  deceptive  claims  that  a  product  is  safe.15 In  addition, 
in  particular  factual  circumstances,  the  Commission  has  challenged  the  failure  to 
disclose safety risks as an unfair practice.16 The Commission’s actions can result in 
consumers’ receiving accurate and important information. However, the CPSC is the 
agency  tasked  with  addressing  products  that  pose  unacceptable  safety  risks  and 
keeping them out of the hands of consumers. 

Question  8.  The  FTC  identified  ads  with  claims  for  very  low  monthly  payment 
amounts  or  interest  rates,  without  adequate  disclosure  of  other  important  loan 
terms.  And  the  FTC  is  now  advising  more  than  200  advertisers  and  media  outlets 
that  some  mortgage  ads  are  potentially  deceptive  or  in  violation  of  the  Truth  in 
Lending  Act.  Your  letters  are  a  good  step,  but  I  wonder  what  more  the  FTC  could 
have done or could do in the future. 

4622. 

ty, Oct. 4, 2007 (available at http://commerce.senate.gov/public/index.cfm?FuseAction=Hearings 
.Testimony&HearinglID=1902&WitnesslID=4134). 

9 Consumer Product Safety Act, Pub. L. 92–573, § 30, reprinted in 1972 U.S.C.C.A.N. at 4621– 

10 Id. at § 30(c), (d), 1972 U.S.C.C.A.N. at 4621. 
11 See www.cpsc.gov/about/faq.html (visited Oct. 18, 2007). 
12 Stouffer Foods Corp., 118 F.T.C. 746, 798 (1994); Kraft, Inc., 114 F.T.C. 40, 120 (1991), aff’d 
and enforced, 970 F.2d 311 (7th Cir. 1992), cert. denied, 113 S. Ct. 1254 (1993); Cliffdale Assocs., 
103 F.T.C. 110, 164–65 (1984); see generally Federal Trade Commission Policy Statement on De-
ception, appended to Cliffdale Assocs., 103 F.T.C. at 174–83. 

13 15 U.S.C. § 45(n); see also generally Federal Trade Commission Policy Statement on Unfair-

ness, appended to International Harvester Co., 104 F.T.C. 949, 1070–76 (1984). 

14 With respect to certain products, the FTC shares jurisdiction over labeling with other agen-
cies.  For  example,  for  more  than  30  years  the  FTC  and  FDA  have  operated  under  a  Memo-
randum  of  Understanding  that  gives  primary  responsibility  over  the  advertising  of  food,  over- 
the-counter  drugs,  medical  devices,  and  cosmetics,  to  the  FTC,  and  primary  responsibility  over 
labeling of these products to FDA. 

15 See,  e.g.,  FTC  v.  National  Urological  Group,  Inc.,  Civ.  No.  1:04–CV–3294  (N.D.  Ga.  Nov. 
10, 2004) (challenging safety claims for dietary supplements containing ephedra and yohimbine, 
which  in  fact  create  safety  risks  by  increasing  blood  pressure);  FTC  v.  Christopher  Enterprises, 
Inc.,  Civ.  No.  2:01  CV–0505ST  (D.  Utah  Nov.  29,  2001)  (challenging  safety  claims  for  products 
containing comfrey, when in fact internal use or application to external wounds can cause seri-
ous  liver  damage;  consent  order  required  warning  to  consumers);  Panda  Herbal  Intl,  Inc.,  C– 
4018  (F.T.C.  2001)  (consent  order)  (challenging  marketing  claim  that  dietary  supplement  could 
be used safely to treat diseases such as HIV/AIDS, when in fact St. John’s Wort ingredient has 
potentially dangerous interaction with drugs used to treat HIV/AIDS; settlement required warn-
ing  on  product);  FTC  v.  Figgie,  Inc.,  994  F.2d  595  (9th  Cir.  1993)  (challenging  representations 
that  heat  detectors  provided  sufficient  warning  in  residential  fires  to  allow  occupants  to  escape 
safely, and responded more quickly than smoke detectors to hot, flaming fires). 

16 E.g., Consumer Direct, Inc., 113 F.T.C. 923 (1990) (consent order) (challenging failure to dis-
close that ‘‘Gut Buster’’ product, a spring-tension exercise device, could break and cause serious 
injury  to  user;  requiring  marketer  to  notify  purchasers  regarding  serious  safety  risk);  Inter-
national Harvester Co., 104 F.T.C. 949, 1056 (1984) (challenging failure to disclose risk that fuel 
caps on tractors could result in geyser of hot fuel and severe injury or death to tractor operator). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00112 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

109 

Answer.  The  Commission  takes  deceptive  mortgage  advertising  very  seriously, 
and  has  undertaken  several  initiatives  to  address  it.  Of  course,  the  FTC  can  and 
will do more to address deceptive mortgage advertising. We continue to monitor the 
marketplace and will take enforcement action as appropriate. 

The  FTC  has  developed  a  multi-pronged  approach  to  address  mortgage  deceptive 
advertising  concerns.  First,  as  you  note,  the  Commission  recently  advised  over  200 
advertisers  and  media  outlets  that  some  mortgage  ads  with  claims  for  very  low 
monthly  payment  amounts  or  interest  rates,  without  adequate  disclosure  of  other 
important loan terms, are potentially deceptive or in violation of the Truth in Lend-
ing  Act.  Letters  to  advertisers  are  advising  them  to  review  their  ads,  and  to  read 
business and consumer education materials on the FTC’s website to learn about rel-
evant laws and requirements. Letters to media outlets are advising them about the 
potentially  deceptive  advertising,  with  guidance  on  screening  ads  for  questionable 
claims. 

Second, the Commission has brought and will continue to bring appropriate cases 
against  mortgage  advertisers  who  violate  Section  5  of  the  FTC  Act  or  the  Truth  in 
Lending  Act.  In  the  last  decade,  the  agency  has  brought  21  actions  alleging  decep-
tive  or  unfair  practices  against  companies  in  the  mortgage  lending  industry,  focus-
ing in particular on the subprime market. Several of these landmark cases have re-
sulted  in  large  monetary  judgments,  collectively  returning  more  than  $320  million 
to  consumers.  We  are  continuing  our  law  enforcement  activity,  with  several  non- 
public investigations involving mortgage advertisers who may have violated the FTC 
Act or the Truth in Lending Act. 

Third,  to  help  consumers  recognize  deceptive  mortgage  ads,  the  Commission  has 
published a Consumer Alert, ‘‘Deceptive Mortgage Ads: What They Say; What They 
Leave Out.’’ The brochure alerts consumers about mortgage ads that offer low rates 
or  payments  without  disclosing  the  true  terms  of  the  deal  as  the  law  requires.  In 
addition, this June, the Commission issued a brochure for consumers facing the pos-
sibility  of  losing  their  home  because  they  cannot  make  their  mortgage  payments, 
and warning them about foreclosure scams. These new publications, as well as sev-
eral previously released materials are available online at www.ftc.gov.17 

Question  8a.  Mr.  Calhoun  testified  of  no  disclosure  of  escrow  requirements  and 
no  disclosure  of  the  penalty  for  not  showing  a  proof  of  income.  How  can  the  FTC 
help in this area? 

Answer.  The  Commission  believes  that  it  is  critical  for  consumers  to  understand 
the  terms  of  their  loans  and  the  implications  of  these  terms.  Subprime  borrowers 
can make better-informed decisions if they are made aware that their mortgage pay-
ments  will  not  include  an  amount  to  be  placed  in  escrow  for  taxes  and  insurance 
and  that  therefore  they  will  have  to  pay  these  amounts  themselves.  Subprime  bor-
rowers  similarly  can  make  better-informed  decisions  if  they  understand  that  their 
mortgage  payments  are  higher  than  they  otherwise  would  have  been  because  they 
have not been required to document their income. 

The FTC uses two primary means to help subprime borrowers who do not receive 
this  information.  First,  in  some  factual  circumstances,  a  lender’s  failure  to  disclose 
information related to escrows and no-documentation loans may be an unfair or de-
ceptive  act  or  practice  in  violation  of  Section  5  of  the  FTC  Act,18 and  the  FTC  can 
commence a law enforcement action to challenge those acts and practices. For exam-
ple, the FTC has brought enforcement actions against brokers and lenders who rep-
resented  to  consumers  that  their  monthly  payment  included  amounts  for  a  tax  and 
insurance  escrow,  when  it  did  not.19 More  generally,  the  Commission  has  been  ag-
gressive  in  challenging  unfair  or  deceptive  acts  and  practices  in  mortgage  lending, 

17 See,  e.g.,  Mortgage  Servicing:  Making  Sure  Your  Payments  Count,  available  at  http:// 
www.ftc.gov/bcp/edu/pubs/consumer/homes/rea10.shtm.  Home  Equity  Loans:  Borrowers  Be-
ware!, available at http://www.ftc.gov/bcp/edu/pubs/consumer/homes/rea11.shtm. 

18 An  act  or  practice  is  deceptive  if  (1)  there  is  a  representation  or  omission  of  information 
that is likely to mislead consumers acting reasonably under the circumstances; and (2) that rep-
resentation is material to consumers. See generally Federal Trade Commission Policy Statement 
on  Deception,  appended  to  Cliffdale  Assocs.,  103  F.T.C.  110,  174–83  (1984).  An  act  or  practice 
is  unfair  if  (1)  it  causes,  or  is  likely  to  cause,  substantial  injury  to  consumers;  (2)  the  injury 
is  not  reasonably  avoidable  by  consumers;  and  (3)  the  injury  to  consumers  is  not  outweighed 
by countervailing benefits to consumers or to competition. 15 U.S.C. § 45(n). 

19 FTC  v.  Mortgages  Para  Hispanos.Com  Corp.,  No.  06–00019  (E.D.  Tex.  2006);  FTC  v.  Dia-
mond, No. 02–5078 (N.D. Ill. 2002); United States v. Mercantile Mortgage Co., No. 02–5079 (N.D. 
Ill. 2002); FTC v. Associates First Capital Corp., No. 01–00606 (N.D. Ga. 2001). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00113 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

110 

focusing  in  particular  on  the  subprime  market.20 Second,  the  FTC  engages  in  sub-
stantial  consumer  education  efforts  to  assist  subprime  borrowers  in  understanding 
the  terms  of  their  loans  and  the  implications  of  these  terms  so  that  they  can  make 
better-informed decisions. 

The  Commission  also  notes  that  the  Federal  Reserve  Board  (FRB)  is  considering 
escrow  and  no-documentation  loans  issues  in  its  ongoing  rulemaking  under  the 
Home  Ownership  and  Equity  Protection  Act.21 The  FRB  has  said  that  it  intends  to 
take action by the end of the year. The FTC will monitor developments in this area, 
and  will  consider  what  changes,  if  any,  should  be  made  to  its  strategy  to  help 
subprime borrowers make better-informed choices in this context. 

Question  8b.  If  you  had  the  authority  to  create  rules  of  disclosure  in  this  area, 

what could you do? 

Answer. Federal agencies other than the Commission currently have the authority 
to  promulgate  rules  specifying  mortgage  disclosure  requirements.  These  rules  are 
for  the  entire  industry  and  are  enforceable  by  all  relevant  agencies.  The  FRB  has 
responsibility  for  disclosure  of  certain  loan  costs  under  the  Truth  in  Lending  Act.22 
The Department of Housing and Urban Development (HUD) also has responsibility 
for  disclosure  of  settlement  costs  under  the  Real  Estate  Settlement  Procedures 
Act.23 I  believe  that  the  public  interest  would  be  best  served  if  the  FRB  and  HUD 
continued in their role of promulgating and implementing mortgage disclosure rules, 
including  any  reforms  that  are  needed,  rather  than  having  the  FTC  impose  addi-
tional mortgage disclosure requirements. 

It  has  been  recognized  for  many  years  that  federally-required  mortgage  disclo-
sures need to be improved. In 1996, Congress directed the FRB and HUD to simplify 
and  improve  mortgage  disclosures  and  create  a  single  mortgage  disclosure  form.24 
The  FRB  and  HUD  provided  Congress  with  formal  recommendations  for  mortgage 
disclosure  reform  in  1998.25 Since  that  time,  various  parties  have  advanced  other 
proposals  for  improving  mortgage  disclosures,  including  substantial  efforts  to  de-
velop a single mortgage disclosure form. 

Nevertheless,  the  Commission  has  a  role  to  play  in  mortgage  disclosure  reform. 
Building  on  prior  work,  the  FTC  staff  has  used  its  expertise  in  consumer  research 
methodology  to  test  mortgage  disclosures  to  determine  which  convey  to  consumers 
the  information  they  need  to  make  better-informed  decisions.  In  particular,  the 
Commission’s  Bureau  of  Economics  (‘‘BE’’)  recently  conducted  a  study  of  mortgage 
lending  disclosures  that  examines  how  consumers  search  for  mortgages,  how  well 
consumers understand current mortgage cost disclosures and the terms of their own 
recently obtained loans, and whether better disclosures could improve consumer un-
derstanding  of  mortgage  costs,  consumer  shopping  for  mortgage  loans,  and  con-
sumers’  ability  to  avoid  deceptive  lending  practices.  The  BE  research  included  thir-
ty-six in-depth interviews with recent mortgage customers, and quantitative testing 
with over 800 mortgage customers to explore their understanding of mortgage costs 
and terms disclosed in both current forms and a prototype disclosure form developed 
for the study. 

The BE study found that: (1) the current federally required disclosures fail to con-
vey  key  mortgage  costs  to  many  consumers;  (2)  the  prototype  disclosures  developed 
by the FTC staff significantly improved consumer recognition of mortgage costs; (3) 
both prime and subprime borrowers failed to understand key loan terms when view-
ing  the  current  disclosures,  and  both  benefited  from  improved  disclosures;  and  (4) 
improved disclosures provided the greatest benefit for more complex loans, for which 
both  prime  and  subprime  borrowers  had  the  most  difficulty  understanding  loan 
terms.  The  study  also  suggests  that,  in  actual  market  transactions,  subprime  bor-
rowers may face even greater difficulties understanding their loan terms than found 
in the study, and may benefit the most from improved disclosures. The study results 
are consistent with the FTC’s view that consumer testing often is critical in the de-
velopment and evaluation of consumer disclosures. 

Comprehensive  mortgage  disclosure  reform  is  needed.  The  best  role  for  the  FTC 
in enhancing the mortgage disclosures consumers receive is not to issue more mort-

20 The Commission’s June 13, 2007 testimony before the House Committee on Financial Serv-
ices described in detail the agency’s activities in the financial services sector. The Commission’s 
statement is available at www.ftc.gov/os/2007/06/070613statement.pdf. 

21 Home Equity Lending Market; Notice of Hearings, 72 Fed. Reg. 30380 (May 31, 2007). 
22 15 U.S.C. § 1604. 
23 12 U.S.C. §§ 2603–04. 
24 Economic  Growth  and  Regulatory  Paperwork  Reduction  Act  of  1996  (Pub.  L.  104–208,  110 

Stat. 3009), Section 2101. 

25 Joint Report to the Congress Concerning Reform to the Truth in Lending Act and the Real 

Estate Settlement Procedures Act (July 1998). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00114 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

111 

gage disclosure rules but to assist the Federal agencies who have issued such rules 
in  revising  and  developing  better  disclosures.  In  particular,  the  FTC  can  assist  in 
providing  its  expertise  to  determine  whether  proposed  disclosures  under  develop-
ment  would  be  effective.  The  Commission  would  be  pleased  to  work  with  the  FRB 
and HUD in their efforts to improve mortgage disclosures. 

Question 8c. Do you agree with Mr. Calhoun that Section 5 of the FTC Act should 
be expanded related to mortgage lending? He believes this would enhance the capac-
ity for appropriate Federal regulatory response. What expansion would you seek? 

Answer.  Mr.  Calhoun  testified  that  Section  5  of  the  FTC  Act  should  be  expanded 
so  that  the  FTC  had  jurisdiction  over  banks.  While  the  Commission  has  an  impor-
tant  role  in  ensuring  compliance  with  the  FTC  Act  for  financial  services  companies 
that are not banks, it does not have experience in applying Section 5 to banks them-
selves.  The  Federal  banking  regulators,  which  closely  supervise  the  banks,  thrifts 
and credit unions under their respective jurisdictions, have broad expertise with re-
spect  to  those  depository  institutions.  I  believe  the  public  interest  is  best  served  if 
the  Federal  banking  agencies  continue  to  have  jurisdiction  over  those  institutions 
under Section 5. 

Question  9.  In  May,  this  committee  passed  important  price  gouging  legislation. 
One  of  those  tools  would  give  the  President  the  authority  to  declare  a  national  en-
ergy  emergency  and  makes  it  illegal  for  any  supplier  to  sell,  or  offer  to  sell,  crude 
oil,  gasoline,  or  petroleum  distillates  at  an  excessive  price  for  use  in  the  emergency 
declared  area.  I  understand  that  the  FTC  opposes  that  additional  authority.  Why? 
Answer. Federal antitrust law is designed to prevent the abuse of private market 
power  that  may  empower  sellers  to  charge  prices  other  than  those  that  they  would 
charge  in  a  competitive  market.  This  is  based  on  the  long-standing  premise  that 
competition—and  market  prices—provide  the  best  choices  in  quantity,  quality,  and 
prices  of  goods  and  services  for  consumers.  Thus,  law  makers  should  hesitate  to 
make it illegal for sellers to charge a price that results from the interplay of market 
conditions—even if that price may seem high. 

During times of unusual product shortage—such as occurred in many parts of the 
country  after  Hurricanes  Katrina  and  Rita,  and  undoubtedly  will  occur  in  a  period 
of  any  significant  emergency—market  prices  will  rise  as  demand  temporarily  out-
strips  supply.  These  rising  prices  help  clear  the  market—that  is,  equalize  supply 
and  demand—without  the  need  to  resort  to  long  lines  or  other  inefficient  methods 
of product allocation. Indeed, high or rising prices provide the incentive for suppliers 
to  take  the  financial  risk  to  bring  extra  product  into  the  affected  market—as  the 
petroleum  companies  did  by  shipping  additional  supplies  of  gasoline  from  Europe 
and other foreign locations into the United States after the 2005 hurricanes—while 
encouraging  consumers  to  conserve  gasoline  by  forgoing  or  postponing  unnecessary 
automobile  trips  while  product  is  short.  Any  price  gouging  law  runs  the  risk  of 
dulling both of those incentives and exacerbating and prolonging the emergency con-
ditions. 

I would anticipate especially serious consequences from any price gouging legisla-
tion  that  failed  to  take  account  of  factors  addressing  costs  and  market  conditions. 
Such  legislation  would  severely  restrict  price  flexibility  in  times  of  market  disrup-
tion  stemming  from  a  natural  disaster.  This  could  extend  the  period  of  supply/de-
mand  imbalance  beyond  what  it  would  have  been  if  businesses  were  able  to  price 
according  to  market  conditions.  In  addition,  some  price  increases  by  firms  in  the 
face of temporary product shortages are reasonable or even necessary for the firms; 
even  some  advocates  of  price  gouging  legislation  have  recognized  that  a  wholesaler 
or  retailer  needs  to  recover  its  increased  costs  and  must  be  able  to  respond  to  un-
usual market conditions. Any legislation that prohibits ‘‘excessive’’ prices without al-
lowing  for  increased  costs  (including  reasonably  anticipated  replacement  costs)  or 
temporary  market  dislocations  may  have  especially  harmful  effects  in  emergency 
conditions. 

Another  problem  raised  by  price  gouging  legislation  is  how  to  define  the  offense 
clearly  so  that  wholesalers  and  retailers  can  comply  with  the  law—especially  when 
such  firms  face  potential  criminal  penalties  for  violating  the  prohibition  against 
gouging.  Because  price  flexibility  is  crucial  for  the  efficient  functioning  of  the  econ-
omy (perhaps even more so during emergency disaster periods), defining an offense 
of price gouging has proved particularly challenging. Price gouging legislation would 
entail  the  difficult  policy  decision  of  how  to  draw  a  line  between  legal  and  illegal 
conduct—particularly  conduct  subject  to  criminal  sanctions—in  an  area  where  any 
line  is  difficult  to  discern  and  where  it  is  important  not  to  discourage  conduct  that 
ultimately  is  benign  or  procompetitive,  and  in  particular  where  such  conduct  may 
help to alleviate shortage conditions. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00115 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

112 

Although  it  is  impossible  to  predict  exactly  how  affected  businesses  may  react, 
price  gouging  legislation  that  does  not  define  the  violation  clearly  or  does  not  ac-
count  for  increased  costs  or  market  conditions  may  impel  firms—especially  small 
businesses  lacking  sophisticated  legal  counsel,  such  as  many  gasoline  retailers—to 
shut down temporarily or stay out of the affected market rather than risk violating 
the  price  gouging  statute,  especially  if  the  offense  is  punishable  as  a  serious  crime 
and offenders are subject to imprisonment and large fines. That result would benefit 
no one. 

Question  10.  I  have  noted  in  Mr.  Cooper’s  testimony  an  interesting  line  of  argu-
ment  from  this  Administration  and  from  industry.  Prices  go  up  because  of  a  list  of 
seemingly  reasonable  unnatural  events.  This  includes  fires  floods,  hurricanes,  and 
other  events.  Other  surprises  include  a  larger  than  expected  driving  season,  in-
creased  consumer  demand,  refinery  outages,  the  increased  price  of  ethanol,  and 
more. 

a. If industry continues to consolidate to capture a larger and larger share of the 
market  and  then  we  experience  consistent  ‘‘surprises’’  that  impact  prices,  is  there 
not something about this situation that is more systemic that the FTC needs to in-
vestigate and act on? 

b.  What  is  it  about  the  nature  of  this  oil  and  gas  industry  that  we  simply  accept 

these price fluctuations due to ‘‘surprises’’ as business-as-usual? 

Answer. In addition to reviewing all major petroleum industry mergers, Commis-
sion staff has looked at both merger and nonmerger issues at all levels of the petro-
leum  industry  and  published  their  findings  in  a  series  of  reports  that  help  explain 
the workings of the industry.26 The empirical work contained in these reports forms 
a picture of an industry that has restructured substantially in recent years, as well 
as an FTC program of vigorous antitrust enforcement that has maintained competi-
tion as that process unfolded. 

Our  economists’  work  demonstrates  that,  despite  some  increases  over  time,  con-
centration for most levels of the U.S. petroleum industry has remained low to mod-
erate, and there is compelling evidence that the industry has become more efficient 
in  recent  years,  to  the  ultimate  benefit  of  consumers.  For  example,  economies  of 
scale  have  become  increasingly  significant  in  shaping  the  petroleum  industry.  The 
United  States  has  fewer  refineries  than  it  had  20  years  ago,  but  the  average  size 
and  efficiency  of  refineries  have  increased,  along  with  the  total  output  of  refined 
products.  Overall  crude  oil  distillation  capacity  in  the  U.S.  petroleum.  industry  in-
creased  from  15.3  million  barrels  per  day  in  1996  to  17.1  million  barrels  per  day 
in  2005—equivalent  to  the  addition  of  approximately  15  average-sized  refineries. 
Moreover,  today  the  petroleum  industry  is  less  vertically  integrated  than  in  past 
years.  Several  significant  refiners  have  no  crude  oil  production,  and  integrated  pe-
troleum  companies  today  tend  to  depend  less  on  their  own  crude  oil  production, 
while a number of independent retailers purchase refined products on the open mar-
ket.  Finally,  some  significant  independent  refiners  have  built  market  share  by  ac-
quiring  refineries  that  were  divested  from  integrated  majors  pursuant  to  FTC  en-
forcement orders. 

Despite these efficiency gains, there are two fundamental reasons why unpredict-
able  market  disruptions—such  as  fires,  floods  and  hurricanes  may  cause  large 
swings in the prices of refined petroleum products. First, consumer demand for gas-
oline and other petroleum products is highly inelastic. That means that, on average, 
consumers  do  not  reduce  demand  much  when  prices  for  these  goods  rise,  particu-
larly in the short run, because many consumers lack adequate short-run substitutes 
for gasoline to power their cars. This facet of consumer demand can lead to sharply 
higher  prices  during  periods  of  market  disruption.  Illegal  conduct  does  not  have  to 
be present for this phenomenon to occur. Moreover, in the case of refined petroleum 
products, variability in the prices of key inputs—crude oil since the 1970s, and eth-
anol more recently—has contributed significantly to fluctuations in the prices of gas-
oline and other refined products. Refiners, however, have no significant control over 
crude oil and ethanol markets. 

Second, the supply of refined products also is inelastic in the short run. Therefore, 
over  a  short  period  of  time,  it  is  costly  or  difficult  to  increase  output  significantly 

26 In 2004, the FTC’s Bureau of Economics published the third in a series of reports on merg-
ers  in  the  petroleum  industry.  In  2005,  the  Commission  issued  a  report  on  the  factors  that  de-
termine  the  prices  of  gasoline.  In  May  2006,  the  Commission  delivered  its  report  to  Congress 
on its investigation of possible gasoline price manipulation and the pricing of gasoline following 
Hurricane  Katrina.  And  in  August  2007,  the  Commission  delivered  to  the  President  a  report 
on  the  causes  of  gasoline  price  increases  during  the  spring  and  summer  of  2006.  In  addition, 
the  Commission’s  economists  have  conducted  several  petroleum  industry  merger  retrospectives 
and have engaged in individual research on pricing and other competition issues in the industry. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00116 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

113 

in response to higher prices. Redundant facilities and systems are expensive to build 
and  maintain,  and  modem  business  practice  is  to  keep  inventories  low  in  order  to 
enhance  efficiency  (thereby  keeping  prices  lower  because  maintaining  inventory  is 
expensive).  These  factors  sometimes  impose  limitations  on  the  responsiveness  of 
supply  all  along  the  distribution  chain  immediately  following  market  disruptions. 
Thus,  when  an  unexpected  contingency  occurs—such  as  a  pipeline  break,  a  disrup-
tion in the supply of crude oil from a foreign country, or an extreme weather event— 
it  may  take  some  time  for  the  distribution  system  to  adjust  and  supply  product  in 
alternative  ways  so  as  to  bring  prices  down.  Similarly,  when  demand  is  stronger 
than  anticipated,  it  takes  time  for  refiners  to  readjust  their  output  slates  and  pro-
duction schedules in response to higher prices, for additional shipments to flow from 
one  part  of  the  country  to  another,  or  for  imports  to  arrive  from  abroad.  For  exam-
ple,  it  takes  several  weeks  for  pipeline  shipments  from  Gulf  Coast  refineries  to 
reach the Midwest. One way to eliminate this problem might be to require building 
additional  capacity,  or  to  require  higher  inventory  levels  that  would  be  available 
during  disruptions  even  if  they  sat  idle  during  normal  times.  But  these  would  be 
expensive  strategies,  particularly  because,  even  if  there  are  many  unexpected  con-
tingencies every year, they do not occur in a smooth and predictable pattern; rather, 
they  tend  to  affect  different  areas,  have  differing  effects,  and  last  different  lengths 
of time. To be sufficient to eliminate price spikes stemming from all of these contin-
gencies, additional capacity or inventory levels would need to be adequate to handle 
all possible events at all locations and times. Thus, in return for a damping of price 
spikes  during  emergencies,  consumers  would  experience  higher  prices  over  the 
longer term stemming from the need to cover the costs of these redundancies. 

Of course, the fact that supply and demand conditions in the oil and gas industry 
can give rise to significant price fluctuations in response to a natural disaster, other 
potential  disruptions,  or  input  cost  changes  does  not  necessarily  mean  that  pricing 
in  this  industry  uniformly  results  from  competitive  forces.  Nevertheless,  previous 
FTC studies of specific periods of relatively high gasoline prices, or of possible price 
manipulation more generally, did not uncover evidence of conduct that might be ac-
tionable under the antitrust laws or of inappropriate conduct that might have arisen 
from industry consolidation. Although the results of those past studies do not guar-
antee that future examinations of pricing in the industry would reach the same con-
clusions,  there  is  no  question  that  a  careful  investigation  will  always  be  a  pre-
requisite to properly ascertaining the causes of unusual price movements. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE TO 

HON. DEBORAH PLATT MAJORAS 

Question  1.  The  National  Do  Not  Call  Registry  has  been  incredibly  successful. 
However, this success hasn’t really migrated over to other areas under the FTC ju-
risdiction—primarily  with  identity  theft  and  SPAM  e-mails.  Approximately  15  mil-
lion  Americans  were  victimized  by  some  sort  of  identity-theft  related  fraud  during 
a  twelve  month  period  ending  in  mid-2006.  And  an  estimated  12.4  billion  spam  e- 
mails are sent a day, which clog our inboxes and waste our time due to reading and 
deleting them. 

Why  this  disparity—why  has  the  DNC  registry  been  so  successful  in  curtailing 
unwanted  telemarketing  calls  but  yet  other  laws  in  place  and  the  enforcement  of 
those laws have not produced similar results with identity theft and SPAM e-mails? 
Is it primarily the Commission’s limited ability to seek civil penalties as you men-

tion in your testimony or are there additional factors that exist? 

What additional resources are necessary to curtail the growing trends of these ac-
tivities—the number of identity theft victims has increased 50 percent over a 3 year 
period  and  SPAM  e-mails  are  expected  to  increase  over  60  percent  from  2006  to 
2007? 

Answer. The National Do Not Call Registry has significantly reduced the number 
of  unwanted  telemarketing  calls  received  by  consumers.  Its  success  hinges  on  high 
compliance rates and effective enforcement against those who illegally place calls to 
registered  telephone  numbers.  Unfortunately,  spam  and  identity  theft  present  far 
more vexing problems for which there is no simple solution. 
Spam 

Unlike  in  telemarketing,  where  the  Commission  can  more  readily  identify  the 
telemarketer  or  seller  responsible  for  a  telephone  call,  spammers  use  a  variety  of 
techniques to hide their identities, including spoofing (the falsification of an e-mail’s 
header  information),  open  relays  (unsecured  mail  servers  through  which  spammers 
can  have  their  messages  forwarded),  open  proxies  (misconfigured  servers  that  per-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00117 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

114 

mit  unauthorized  users  to  send  mail  as  if  it  is  originating  from  the  misconfigured 
server),  and  zombie  drones  (computers  infected  with  malware  that  causes  the  com-
puters  to  become  part  of  a  botnet  through  which  spam  can  be  sent).  Each  of  these 
spamming  techniques  makes  it  difficult,  if  not  impossible,  to  identify  spammers 
through e-mail headers and significantly impedes law enforcement. 

To combat the threat of spam, the Commission has been a leading advocate of do-
main-level  authentication  technologies  that  would  help  ISPs  and  law  enforcement 
identify  the  domain  from  which  an  e-mail  was  sent.  While  not  a  panacea,  these 
technologies  could  vastly  improve  the  effectiveness  of  other  anti-spam  technologies 
(such  as  reputation  and  accreditation  services)  and  hold  significant  promise  in  re-
ducing the effectiveness of phishing campaigns. The Commission is encouraged that 
these technologies are beginning to be widely deployed. 

In  addition,  spam  can  be  sent  from  anywhere  in  the  world  to  anywhere  in  the 
world.  This  international  nature  of  spam  often  presents  challenges  for  law  enforce-
ment.  Congress  enacted  the  U.S.  SAFE  WEB  Act  last  year  to  give  the  FTC  addi-
tional tools to combat cross-border fraud, including spam, spyware, and other online 
threats.  Among  other  things,  the  U.S.  SAFE  WEB  Act  makes  it  easier  for  the  FTC 
to cooperate and exchange information with foreign counterparts in combating spam 
and  other  cross-border  consumer  problems.  The  Commission  is  actively  using  the 
tools provided by the U.S. SAFE WEB Act in its fight against spam. 

The  Commission  is  also  doing  its  part  to  combat  spam  through  law  enforcement 
and  consumer  education,  as  outlined  in  its  September  12  testimony.  CAN–SPAM 
added  civil  penalties  to  the  Commission’s  arsenal  in  spam  enforcement  actions.  15 
U.S.C.  § 7706(a).  This  authority  has  proven  especially  useful  in  spam  cases  where 
the Commission’s traditional equitable remedies would have provided inadequate re-
lief.  For  instance,  in  seven  cases  alleging  violations  of  CAN–SPAM  and  the  Adult 
Labeling  Rule,  16  C.F.R.  § 316.4,  the  Commission  obtained  more  than  $1.1  million 
in  civil  penalties.  Civil  penalty  authority  enabled  the  Commission  to  obtain  signifi-
cant  monetary  judgments  without  having  to  demonstrate  and  attempt  to  monetize 
the intrusion suffered by consumers who received pornographic e-mail. 
Identity Theft 

Unlike  telemarketers  who  are  often  legitimate  marketers  trying  to  comply  with 
the  law,  identity  thieves  are  criminals  who  deliberately  flout  it.  Further,  identity 
theft  is  a  far  more  complex  problem  than  receiving  telemarketing  calls.  Indeed,  be-
cause  identity  theft  can  be  committed  in  a  variety  of  different  methods,  can  be  tre-
mendously  lucrative,  and  can  go  undetected  for  significant  periods,  its  eradication 
requires  nothing  short  of  major  changes  in  how  we  tackle  this  devastating  crime. 
Although  the  Commission  itself  does  not  have  criminal  prosecutorial  authority,  I 
served as co-chair of the President’s Identity Theft Task Force,1 which released sev-
eral  recommendations  this  spring  to  improve  criminal  prosecution  of  identity  theft. 
FTC staff is involved in the implementation of some of these recommendations. For 
example,  one  of  the  Plan’s  major  recommendations  is  to  increase  coordination 
among law enforcement agencies to facilitate identity theft investigations and pros-
ecutions.  The  Commission  will  continue  to  support  that  goal  through  its  Identity 
Theft  Data  Clearinghouse,  the  Federal  Government’s  central  repository  of  identity 
theft  victims’  complaints.  The  Commission  is  also  participating  in  several  training 
sessions  for  law  enforcement  such  as  regional  identity  theft  training  seminars  for 
local  police  and  investigators  on  victim  assistance  and  identity  theft  investigations 
and  the  development  and  expansion  of  training  for  Federal  prosecutors  on  how  to 
develop  an  effective  identity  theft  prosecution.  For  example,  just  last  month,  the 
FTC  worked  with  DOJ,  the  Secret  Service,  the  U.S.  Postal  Inspection  Service,  and 
the  American  Association  of  Motor  Vehicle  Administrators  to  provide  training  for 
local  law  enforcement  in  the  Chicago  area;  in  December,  we  will  conduct  similar 
training  in  North  and  South  Carolina.  In  addition,  the  Identity  Theft  Task  Force 
forwarded  legislative  recommendations  to  Congress  that  seek  to  close  existing  loop-
holes for the prosecution of some types of identity theft. 

In  addition  to  criminal  prosecution,  the  Identity  Theft  Task  Force’s  recommenda-
tions focused on identity theft prevention through improved data security and victim 
recovery.  The  FTC  is  also  leading  efforts  to  develop  a  comprehensive  record  on  the 
use of Social Security numbers in the private sector, with the goal of developing rec-
ommendations  on  how  we  can  limit  the  availability  of  this  valuable  information  to 
criminals, while at the same time preserving the many beneficial purposes for which 
SSNs  are  collected,  used,  and  shared.  The  Commission  solicited  and  received  more 
than  300  public  comments  on  this  issue  and  will  hold  a  workshop  on  SSN  usage 

1 Established by Executive Order in May, 2006. Exec. Order No. 13,402, 71FR27945 (May 10, 

2006). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00118 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

115 

on  December  10  and  11.  In  addition,  this  past  spring,  the  Commission  hosted  a 
workshop  on  authentication,  bringing  together  academics,  business  groups,  con-
sumer  advocates,  and  others  to  explore  new  developments  in  the  rapidly  changing 
field  of  identity  management.  FTC  staff  is  working  on  a  report  that  will  describe 
what we learned at this workshop, such as information about technological and pol-
icy requirements for developing better authentication processes, which will assist all 
policymakers addressing this pernicious crime. 

With respect to victim assistance, the Commission has already implemented many 
of  the  Task  Force  recommendations,  including  publishing  a  ‘‘Victims’  Statement  of 
Rights,’’ and launching a standard police report http://www.idtheft.gov. for identity 
theft  victims.  The  FTC  and  DOJ  are  coordinating  with  the  American  Bar  Associa-
tion  to  support  more  victim  assistance  through  pro  bono  programs  and  are  devel-
oping a training curriculum for victim assistance counselors in the court system. 

Your question asks about civil penalties. Currently, the Commission does not have 
authority to seek civil penalties in data security cases unless a special statute, such 
as  the  Fair  Credit  Reporting  Act,  has  been  violated.  The  Commission  recommends 
that Congress pass legislation to provide the Commission with civil penalty author-
ity  in  data  security  cases.  We  believe  the  threat  of  civil  penalties  will  serve  as  an 
important incentive for companies to maintain data security, thus deterring identity 
theft. 

In terms of resources, the Commission has requested 10 additional FTE for FY08 

to work on data security and identity theft issues. 

Question  2.  Last  year,  the  FTC  published  the  ‘‘Business  Opportunity  Rule’’  as  a 
Notice  of  Proposed  Rulemaking.  It  is  my  understanding  that  the  Commission  will 
report  later  this  year  on  the  NPRM’s  status  and  likely  make  recommendations  re-
garding  next  steps.  The  proposed  rule  would  eliminate  some  existing  requirements 
as  well  as  many  of  the  current  disclosures.  However,  it  would  then  propose  new 
waiting  periods  and  disclosure  requirements  for  sales  of  ‘‘business  opportunities.’’ 
Some concerns have been voiced regarding these new rules. Primarily, that the new 
waiting period might delay legitimate business efforts and apply a cumbersome ad-
ministrative process to business’s recruiting efforts. Also additional privacy concerns 
have  been  raised  regarding  the  new  disclosure  requirements.  Can  you  elaborate  on 
the current status of the regulation and how the FTC plans to address the concerns 
that have been voiced? 

Answer.  Currently,  FTC  staff  is  carefully  considering  the  many  thoughtful  com-
ments received in response to the NPRM for the business opportunity rule—includ-
ing  several  from  Members  of  Congress—on  all  the  issues  implicated  by  this  rule-
making proposal. 

Among the issues under careful consideration is whether the proposal goes too far 
in  its  attempt  to  curb  abuses  inflicted  on  the  public  by  pyramid  schemes  that  pur-
port  to  be  business  opportunities,  and  whether  this  proposal,  if  adopted,  would  re-
sult  in  unintended  and  unnecessary  compliance  burdens  on  legitimate  multilevel 
marketing  companies.  The  concerns  about  the  proposed  waiting  period  and  privacy 
concerns  implicated  by  the  disclosure  of  prior  purchasers  have  been  articulated 
clearly and in detail in the comments the Commission received. 

While  it  would  be  premature  to  comment  on  the  Commission’s  views  on  these 
issues,  the  Commission’s  aim  has  been  to  craft  a  business  opportunity  rule  that  is 
narrowly tailored to address the abusive practices of business opportunity promoters 
that  result  in  substantial  consumer  injury.  The  goal  is  to  reduce  unnecessary  com-
pliance costs by having a narrowly-focused rule that requires only the most essential 
material  disclosures  and  that  prohibits  the  unfair  or  deceptive  practices  identified 
over the course of the FTC’s many years of law enforcement against bogus business 
opportunity sellers. 

The  Commission  staff  is  giving  careful  consideration  to  the  concerns  articulated 
by  legitimate  MLM  companies  and  Members  of  Congress  as  it  formulates  rec-
ommendations  to  the  Commission  on  the  next  steps  in  this  rulemaking  proceeding. 
Rulemaking under authority of the FTC’s special rulemaking statute, 15 U.S.C. 57a, 
provides numerous opportunities for public comment and oral participation with re-
spect  to  any  rulemaking  proposals.  Further,  without  prejudging  this  matter  in  any 
way, it should be noted that the final rule adopted at the end of an FTC rulemaking 
proceeding  is  often  considerably  refined,  as  compared  to  the  initial  proposal  put 
forth at the start of the proceeding. 

Question  3.  There  is  growing  concern  about  a  form  of  identity  theft,  phishing— 
where  a  fraudulent  e-mail  is  sent  in  order  to  deceive  the  recipient  into  giving  per-
sonal or financial account information. 

Consumer  Reports  found  in  2006  that  approximately  2.4  million  Americans  have 
been  victims  of  phishing  attacks  and  the  total  losses  associated  with  phishing  is 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00119 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

116 

consumer 

(located 

more  than  $600  million,  just  in  2006  alone.  A  report  from  ICONIX  indicates  that 
approximately 59 million phishing e-mails are sent a day and the number one coun-
try were most of the phishing e-mails/websites originate is the U.S. 

There was even a recent account of one phishing attack that fraudulently utilized 
the  name  of  the  FTC,  which  is  a  tad  ironic  since  the  Commission  is  responsible  for 
prosecuting  e-mail  fraud.  What  can  the  government  do  to  curtail  this  e-mail  and 
website  based  fraud?  Could  current  law  be  changed  to  better  address  this  issue  in 
providing  more  explicit  tools  for  law  enforcement  to  prosecute  the  bad  actors  that 
are behind these phishing schemes? 

Answer.  Phishing  spam—e-mail  that  attempts  to  trick  recipients  into  providing 
personally identifiable information to scam artists posing as legitimate businesses— 
has increased significantly in recent years. To combat phishing, the Commission has 
maintained  an  aggressive  anti-spam  and  anti-phishing  program  by  hosting  public 
workshops  to  gain  new  insights  from  experts,  disseminating  consumer  education, 
spurring  the  development  of  industry-driven  technology,  and  pursuing  law  enforce-
ment actions. 

This summer the Commission hosted a workshop, ‘‘Spam Summit: The Next Gen-
eration  of  Threats  and  Solutions,’’  to  examine  how  spam  has  evolved  and  what 
stakeholders  can  do  to  address  it.  Workshop  participants  described  how  spam  is 
being  used  increasingly  as  a  vehicle  for  more  pernicious  conduct,  such  as  phishing 
and  the  delivery  of  viruses  and  spyware.  This  spam  goes  beyond  mere  annoyance 
to  consumers—it  can  result  in  significant  harm  by  shutting  down  consumers’  com-
puters, enabling keystroke loggers to steal identities, and undermining the stability 
of the Internet. The Spam Summit illustrated that criminal law enforcement, indus-
try-driven  technologies,  public/private  partnerships,  and  international  cooperation 
are paramount for managing the spam problem. 

The FTC also fights phishing by maintaining a vigorous consumer education pro-
gram.  The  Commission’s 
at 
www.onguardonline.gov)  aim  to  inform  consumers  of  the  dangers  of  phishing  and 
urge  them  not  to  reply  to  an  e-mail  or  pop-up  message  that  asks  for  personal  or 
financial information, use anti-virus and anti-spyware programs and a firewall, and 
forward  suspected  phishing  messages  to  the  FTC  at  spam@uce.gov.  The  FTC’s  con-
sumer  alert,  ‘‘How  Not  to  Get  Hooked  by  a  Phishing  Scam’’  has  been  visited  over 
1.1  million  times  since  2003,  and  the  OnGuard  Online  article  on  phishing  has  re-
ceived over 600,000 unique visits in the last 2 years. 

education  materials 

The  Commission  is  redoubling  its  efforts  to  stop  illegal  spam  and  phishing 
schemes.  First,  in  the  upcoming  months,  we  plan  to  convene  a  half-day  anti- 
phishing roundtable with the goals of identifying opportunities for outreach and se-
curing commitments from key stakeholders in the anti-phishing community, includ-
ing  consumer  and  industry  groups.  Second,  we  plan  to  produce  a  video  with  impor-
tant information about phishing. Third, we are working with the anti-phishing com-
munity  to  mobilize  members  of  the  financial  sector  and  revitalize  consumer  edu-
cation  outreach  efforts,  including  promotion  of  the  OnGuard  Online  materials. 
Working with the financial sector will be critical, given that financial services is the 
industry sector most targeted by phishers.2 

Finally,  we  continue  to  encourage  the  industry’s  adoption  of  domain-level  e-mail 
authentication  as  a  significant  anti-spam  and  anti-phishing  tool.  Domain-level  au-
thentication  would  ensure  that  a  message  that  purports  to  be  from  an  e-mail  ad-
dress  at  a  domain  actually  came  from  an  address  at  that  domain.  In  other  words, 
if a phishing message purported to be from a financial institution’s domain, but ac-
tually  came  from  an  IP  address  not  associated  with  the  financial  institution,  the 
message  would  not  be  properly  authenticated.  As  a  result,  the  message  would  not 
reach  the  consumer’s  in-box.  At  our  Spam  Summit  this  summer,  we  learned  that 
industry  has  made  great  strides  with  e-mail  authentication—50  percent  of  legiti-
mate  e-mail  is  now  authenticated.3 A  recent  study  indicates  that  Internet  Service 
Providers are now applying negative scoring to unauthenticated messages.4 We look 
forward  to  working  with  industry  as  they  continue  to  advance  in  their  e-mail  au-
thentication efforts. 

The  Commission  has  not  recommended  any  modifications  to  current  law  to  cover 
phishing e-mails. The FTC already has the necessary legal authority to pursue civil 
actions  against  phishers.  On  the  underlying  behavior  in  phishing  scams  is  often 
criminal and covered by criminal statutes. 

2 According  to  the  Anti-phishing  Working  Group,  the  financial  services  sector  was  the  most 

targeted industry sector at 95.2 percent of all attacks in the month of June. 

3 See http://www.ftc.gov/bcp/workshops/spamsummit/draftltranscriptlday2.pdf. At 85. 
4 See http://www.dmnews.com/cms/dm-news/e-mail-marketing/42251.html. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00120 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

117 

Question  4.  With  respect  to  consumer  education  about  identity  theft  and  how  to 
avoid  becoming  a  victim,  the  FTC  has  distributed  close  to  3  million  brochures  and 
tens  of  thousands  of  educational  kits  as  well  as  created  the  OnGuard  Online 
website,  which  has  received  some  3.5  million  visits  to  date.  Have  you  been  able  to 
gauge the success of your outreach and educational efforts? Are you performing sur-
veys  on  consumer  knowledge  about  identity  theft  and  ways  to  protect  themselves? 
Answer. Education and outreach are core elements of the FTC’s campaign against 
identity theft. The FTC’s product distribution figures are one measure of the success 
of the FTC’s educational campaigns. As you allude to in your question, the FTC has 
distributed  more  than  2.6  million  Deter,  Detect,  Defend  brochures  since  2006,  re-
corded  more  than  3.2  million  visits  to  the  program’s  website,  and  disseminated 
55,000  kits.  The  Commission,  which  directs  its  education  efforts  to  businesses  as 
well, introduced a new data security guide in March 2007 to help businesses secure 
customers’  sensitive  personal  information.  The  Commission  has  distributed  more 
than 120,000 copies of the guide. In fact, it’s initial printing (22,000 copies) was ex-
hausted  in  5  days.  The  guide  also  has  been  accessed  25,000  times  online  since  its 
release. 

The  FTC  develops  its  advice  for  consumers  based  on  its  enforcement  experience, 
information  it  collects  during  FTC  conferences  and  workshops,  and  consultation 
with  industry  representatives,  consumer  advocates  and  academics.  The  FTC  occa-
sionally conducts original research, such as its fraud survey, which informs its mes-
sages for consumers. 

Another measure of the success of FTC efforts is how many consumers it reaches. 
The  Commission  receives  about  15,000  to  20,000  contacts  each  week  from  con-
sumers  seeking  information  on  how  to  recover  from  identity  theft  or  how  to  avoid 
becoming  a  victim.  We  provide  these  consumers  with  important  educational  infor-
mation. 

A third way to gauge the Commission’s outreach efforts is to consider the willing-
ness  of  the  private,  public,  and  non-profit  sectors  to  use  the  campaign  materials 
without  changes.  Hundreds  of  industry,  consumer  advocacy,  law  enforcement,  and 
community  groups  distribute  the  Commission’s  identity  theft  materials.  Several 
prominent  national  groups,  including  the  National  Association  of  Realtors  and  the 
Direct  Marketing  Association,  have  co-branded  and  reproduced  copies  of  the  mate-
rials to distribute among their members. 

We  have  also  conducted  surveys  on  identity  theft  generally.  In  September  2003, 
the FTC released a survey which described the extent of identity theft in the United 
States  and  detailed  the  Commission’s  ID  Theft  program  from  its  inception  in  1998. 
See  http://www.ftc.gov/opa/2003/09/idtheft.shtm.  The  FTC  expects  the  results  of 
a follow-up survey to be released later this year. 

Question  5.  In  a  recent  survey,  80  percent  of  Internet  users  voiced  concern  about 
being  victims  of  online  identity  theft.  But  yet,  most  identity  theft  actually  takes 
place  offline  through  the  stealing  of  paper  bills,  account  statements,  credit  cards, 
etc.  and  only  about  9  percent  of  identity  theft  crimes  occur  online.  In  fact,  many 
recommend  that  utilizing  online  banking  and  bill  paying  services  would  reduce  the 
threat  of  identity  theft  given  the  encryption  and  authentication  technologies  used, 
as well as the lack of any paper billing or statements to steal. 

How  can  we  effectively  make  sure  people  protect  themselves  online  but  at  the 
same time assuage their concerns and reluctance about conducting business with or 
purchasing  products  online  from  legitimate  businesses?  Or  is  this  concern  of  online 
identity theft not a major hindrance to the growth potential of e-commerce? 

Answer.  Identity  thieves  use  various  techniques  to  steal  consumer  data  in  order 
to  commit  identity  theft.5 With  respect  to  the  online  environment,  certainly,  con-
sumer concerns about online identity theft can be a potential obstacle to the growth 
of e-commerce. Our message to consumers has been that computers and the Internet 
offer  tremendous  benefits  in  terms  of  choice,  convenience,  and  competition.  They 
should  continue  to  take  advantage  of  these  benefits,  while  exercising  caution  to  se-
cure  their  information  and  their  money.  Our  consumer  education  contains  action- 
oriented  advice  in  plain  language.  Our  goal  is  to  educate  consumers  about  sound 
computer security practices, and we believe that this goal is best accomplished with 
a positive message that empowers consumers, rather than one that scares them. In-

5 Some have suggested that consumers have a greater risk of identity theft in the paper envi-
ronment. In most surveys, including those conducted by the FTC and Javelin Research, roughly 
half  of  all  victims  do  not  know  precisely  how  their  data  was  captured  by  the  thief.  (See 
www.ftc.gov/bcp/edu/microsites/idtheft/downloads/synovatelreport.pdf;  www.javelinstrategy 
.com/products/99DEBA/27/delivery.pdf.)  Among  those  who  do  know  how  their  data  was  ob-
tained,  most  of  them  can  point  to  a  specific  incident  where  their  purse,  wallet,  or  postal  mail 
was taken. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00121 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

118 

deed, all of the materials we discuss in our September 12 testimony, adopt this ap-
proach—from  our  nationwide  Deter,  Detect,  Defend  campaign  to  our  materials  on 
OnguardOnline. 

In addition, our business outreach efforts recognize that identity theft undermines 
consumer  trust  in  the  marketplace.  Part  of  our  outreach  message  to  industry  has 
been  that  safeguarding  consumers’  information  from  identity  theft  is  simply  good 
business.  If  businesses  do  not  protect  such  information,  they  will  lose  consumer 
trust. We continue to promote this message in encouraging businesses to implement 
sound data security procedures. 

Question 6. The 2006 FTC study on the price of gasoline and price gouging in the 
aftermath  of  Hurricane  Katrina  concluded  that  market  forces  were  exclusively  the 
drivers  in  price  increases.  Since  that  time  the  U.S.  Senate’s  Permanent  Sub-
committee on Investigations as well as report from the Attorney Generals of Illinois, 
Iowa,  Missouri  and  Wisconsin  have  concluded  that  derivatives  trading  activity 
placed  upward  pressure  on  energy  prices.  Do  you  believe  that  the  two  separate  re-
ports, the Permanent Subcommittee on Investigations and the State Attorneys Gen-
erals were accurate? 

Answer.  I  understand  that  this  question  refers  to  the  June  27,  2006,  report  by 
the  staff  of  the  Senate  Homeland  Security  Permanent  Subcommittee  on  Investiga-
tions entitled ‘‘The Role of Market Speculation in Rising Oil and Gas Prices: A Need 
to  Put  the  Cop  Back  on  the  Beat,’’  and  to  the  report  entitled  ‘‘The  Role  of  Supply, 
Demand  and  Financial  Commodity  Markets  in  the  Natural  Gas  Price  Spiral,’’  pre-
pared  in  March  2006  by  Dr.  Mark  N.  Cooper  for  the  Midwest  Attorneys  General 
Natural Gas Working Group. Although FTC staff reviewed those reports when they 
were  issued,  I  am  not  in  a  position  to  opine  on  their  accuracy.  Both  reports  appear 
to  address  issues  largely  outside  of  the  FTC’s  primary  areas  of  expertise,  and  any 
questions  regarding  the  accuracy  of  those  reports  should  be  addressed  to  their  au-
thors or to the CFTC and FERC, which have the relevant expertise. 

Question 6a. Does the FTC work in conjunction with CFTC to ensure that the fu-

tures markets are not manipulated? 

Answer. The FTC does not work regularly in conjunction with the CFTC on ques-
tions  of  futures  market  manipulation.  The  two  agencies  have  significantly  different 
missions: the FTC is an antitrust and consumer protection law enforcement agency, 
while the CFTC is a sectoral regulatory agency with a different statutory mandate. 
To  the  extent  that  issues  within  the  purview  of  the  CFTC  also  indicate  that  there 
may be a violation of the laws that the FTC enforces, we would, of course, seek rel-
evant  information  from  the  CFTC  and,  as  appropriate,  would  provide  the  CFTC 
with  information  relevant  to  that  agency’s  mission.  With  regard  to  manipulation  of 
the futures market, however, the FTC generally lacks regulatory or law enforcement 
authority  with  particular  reference  to  futures  trading.  If  it  appears  that  arguably 
anticompetitive  conduct  may  affect,  or  may  be  affected  by,  futures  trading—for  ex-
ample,  an  anticompetitive  merger  that  impedes  the  proper  functioning  of  futures 
markets—the  FTC  itself  would  conduct  any  appropriate  investigation  pursuant  to 
the antitrust laws that it enforces. I note, for instance, that our 2006 report to Con-
gress on our investigation of possible gasoline price manipulation included a chapter 
that  considered  manipulation  of  futures  prices  through  the  use  of  physical  assets 
and  also  considered  possible  manipulation  of  bulk  spot  futures  prices  through  the 
inappropriate reporting of transactions to price reporting services. 

Question 6b. Does the FTC need additional authority to ensure that these markets 

are being fairly conducted? 

Answer.  Congress  entrusted  the  CFTC  with  the  authority  to  police  manipulative 
and  other  unlawful  conduct  in  commodity  futures  markets.  I  note  that  the  CFTC 
has brought enforcement actions recently involving alleged manipulation in markets 
for  propane,  and  the  Department  of  Justice  obtained  a  guilty  plea  from  an  official 
of BP for manipulation of propane futures. I do not believe that the FTC, which does 
not  have  substantial  familiarity  with  futures  markets,  should  duplicate  or  intrude 
on the CFTC’s mandate. 

Question 6c. Will the role of speculation be considered in future reports? 
Answer. The FTC’s May 2006 report to Congress on our ‘‘Investigation of Gasoline 
Price  Manipulation  and  Post-Katrina  Gasoline  Price  Increases’’  considered  whether 
control  of  certain  physical  assets,  such  as  product  storage  facilities,  might  be  used 
to  manipulate  gasoline  futures  prices  by  creating  ‘‘squeezes’’  in  the  related  com-
modity  markets.  Such  squeezes  could  force  short  sellers  to  offset  their  futures  con-
tracts  at  inflated  prices.  In  fact,  this  concern  was  one  reason  why  the  FTC  chal-
lenged BP’s acquisition of ARCO in 2000 and obtained relief to address the specific 
concern  about  the  transaction’s  possible  adverse  effects  in  crude  oil  futures.  Al-
though  future  FTC  reports  may  revisit  this  type  of  futures  market  manipulation— 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00122 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

119 

particularly  insofar  as  mergers  might  enhance  the  potential  for  such  behavior—we 
are  unlikely  to  address  purely  speculative  behavior  in  futures  markets.  Rather,  we 
would  defer  on  that  topic  to  agencies  such  as  the  CFTC,  which  has  more  expertise 
and  a  direct  enforcement  interest  in  that  area.  Similarly,  as  the  FTC’s  case  involv-
ing the BP/ARCO merger illustrates, the FTC would take prompt and strong action 
if any attempt to manipulate futures markets constituted an antitrust violation (in-
cluding a referral to the Department of Justice if we uncovered evidence of criminal 
conduct).  Absent  evidence  of  an  antitrust  violation,  however.  I  would  expect  the 
CFTC—the agency with primary jurisdiction in this field—to continue as the appro-
priate  regulator  of  commodities  futures  markets.  I  also  would  expect  the  Federal 
Energy  Regulatory  Commission  (‘‘FERC’’)  to  continue  to  play  an  important  role  in 
markets  for  natural  gas.  For  example,  in  ‘‘High  Natural  Gas  Prices:  The  Basics,’’ 
issued  in  2006,  FERC  outlined  what  it  is  doing  to  prevent  manipulation  in  natural 
gas  markets,  including  implementation  of  a  Memorandum  of  Understanding  be-
tween  FERC  and  the  CFTC  to  facilitate  the  detection  of  such  manipulation.  See 
http://www.ferc.gov/legal/staffreports/high-gas-prices.pdf. 

Question 7. There has been substantial debate over the proper definition of ‘‘price 
gouging.’’  In  your  written  testimony  last  year,  Ms.  Majoras  stated  that  ‘‘although 
widely  understood  to  refer  to  significant  price  increases  (typically  during  periods  of 
unusual  market  conditions),  the  term  ‘‘price  gouging’’  similarly  lacks  an  accepted 
definition.  It  is  not  a  well-defined  term  of  art  in  economics,  nor  does  any  Federal 
statute identify price gouging as a legal violation.’’ The Senate passed an energy bill 
that  included  a  price  gouging  law.  Specifically,  the  language  of  the  bill  makes  it  a 
Federal crime to sell energy products at ‘‘unconscionable levels.’’ The bill also stipu-
lates  in  section  604  that  it  is  unlawful  for  any  person,  directly  or  indirectly,  to  use 
or  employ  any  manipulative  or  deceptive  device,  in  contravention  of  such  rules  and 
regulations  as  the  FTC  may  prescribe  as  necessary  for  the  public  interest.  How 
would the FTC define ‘‘unconscionable levels’’ if given authority by Congress? 

Answer.  ‘‘Unconscionable  levels’’  has  no  established  legal  or  economic  meaning. 
The  FTC  would  be  guided  first  by  the  provisions  of  the  enacted  statute,  and  I  note 
that legislation under consideration in both Houses sets forth a number of elements 
and factors to be considered. 

Section  602(4)’s  definition  of  ‘‘unconscionably  excessive  price,’’  for  example,  re-
quires reference to increased wholesale and operational costs, the prices charged by 
other  firms  in  the  same  geographic  market,  and  the  impact  of  local,  regional,  na-
tional,  and  international  market  conditions.  These  are  important  considerations.  I 
expect that, if the FTC were charged with defining ‘‘unconscionably excessive’’ pric-
ing in the absence of other guidance, we also would take account of not only actual 
increases in replacement costs, but also the supplier’s reasonable anticipation of ris-
ing  costs  as  an  emergency  persists,  as  well  as  the  risks  that  a  supplier  might  take 
on in order to bring additional supply to the affected region. 

Moreover,  in  determining  whether  price  gouging  has  in  fact  occurred  and  should 
be  prosecuted,  the  Commission  likely  would  consider,  among  other  factors,  the  ele-
ments  currently  set  forth  in  Section  603(b),  including  whether  the  price  at  issue 
would reasonably exist in a competitive and freely functioning market, and whether 
the  supplier  actually  increased  the  amount  of  gasoline  supplied  to  the  area  during 
the emergency period. 

Question 7a. Under section 604 what regulations or rules do you envision the FTC 

ratifying with this additional authority? 

Answer.  The  Commission  would  consider  carefully  how  best  to  implement  what-
ever  legislation  is  enacted.  Although  it  may  be  premature  to  suggest  any  specific 
plan  or  conclusions  at  this  point,  I  anticipate  that  the  agency  would  begin  imple-
menting  Section  604,  if  enacted,  by  identifying  practices  that  might  be  viewed  as 
market manipulation and examining the likely effects of a prohibition of such prac-
tices on prices, markets, and consumers. I anticipate that the FTC’s approach would 
be informed in part by its examination of various possible forms of manipulation ad-
dressed in the above-referenced report that we submitted to Congress in May 2006. 
That  report  discussed,  for  example,  practices  related  to  gasoline  production,  trans-
portation, inventory, spot pricing, and futures markets. Given the key roles that the 
CFTC  and  FERC  play  with  respect  to  potential  market  manipulation,  I  would  an-
ticipate  working  closely  with  those  agencies  during  this  process.  If  the  Commission 
identified  any  practices  that  manipulate,  rather  than  respond  to,  markets  to  con-
sumers’  detriment,  and  if  such  practices  were  not  already  illegal,  those  practices 
presumably would be the focus of any regulation. 

Question  7b.  Do  you  believe  that  a  Federal  price  gouging  law  should  be  enacted? 
Answer.  For  the  reasons  discussed  in  my  testimony  last  year,  I  remain 
unpersuaded  that  such  legislation  would  produce  a  net  benefit  for  consumers.  Be-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00123 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

120 

cause  prices  play  such  a  critical  role  in  a  market-based  economy,  attempts  to  cap 
or  control  prices  can  lead  to  the  misallocation  of  resources  to  the  detriment  of  con-
sumers. In a period of shortage—particularly with a product, like gasoline, that can 
be sold in many markets around the world—higher prices create incentives for sup-
pliers  to  send  more  product  into  the  market,  while  also  creating  incentives  for  con-
sumers  to  use  less  of  the  product.  I  f  price  signals  are  not  present  or  are  distorted 
by legislative or regulatory command, markets may not function efficiently and con-
sumers may be worse off. 

If  Congress  proceeds  with  price  gouging,  then  I  believe  it  should  consider  several 
factors  in  order  to  enact  a  statute  that  will  be  most  likely  to  attack  unwarranted 
price  increases  while  having  the  smallest  adverse  impact  on  rational  price  incen-
tives.  Any  price  gouging  statute  should  define  the  offense  clearly.  A  primary  goal 
of a statute should be for businesses—as well as law enforcers and courts—to know 
what is prohibited. An ambiguous standard would only confuse consumers and busi-
nesses and would make enforcement difficult and arbitrary. 

The challenge in crafting a price gouging statute is to be able to distinguish goug-
ers  from  those  who  are  reacting  in  an  economically  rational  manner  to  the  tem-
porary  shortages  resulting  from  the  emergency.  It  seems  beyond  dispute—and  ac-
knowledged by those on all sides of the debate about price gouging legislation—that 
standards  governing  price  gouging  should  incorporate  important  mitigating  factors, 
such  as  an  allowance  for  increased  costs  (including  anticipated  costs)  that  busi-
nesses  face  in  the  marketplace.  Enterprises  that  do  not  recover  their  costs  cannot 
long  remain  in  business,  and  exiting  businesses  would  only  exacerbate  the  supply 
problem. Furthermore, cost increases should not be limited to historic costs, because 
such  a  limitation  could  make  it  uneconomic  for  retailers  to  purchase  new  product 
at the higher wholesale prices. There also should be consideration of local, national, 
and  international  market  conditions  that  may  be  a  factor  in  the  tight  supply  situa-
tion. International conditions that increase the price of crude oil naturally will have 
a downstream effect on retail gasoline prices. Local businesses should not be penal-
ized for factors beyond their control. 

Question 8. There was a recent article in The Washington Post about Comcast and 
how  the  company  disconnected  broadband  service  to  some  its  heaviest  users.  The 
company  cited  that  these  high  usage  customers  were  draining  network  capacity 
therefore slowing down the network and degrading Quality of Service of others cus-
tomers.  Yet  it  seems  as  if  Comcast  didn’t  utilize  the  best  process  or  disclosure  of 
its policy regarding this matter, given that some customers were unclear as to what 
the  specific  download  limits  were  and  the  company  continues  to  decline  to  reveal 
these limits. While this seems to be limited to just Comcast, does this type of busi-
ness practice concern the Commission given the lack of appropriate disclosure as to 
what the bandwidth and download limits are for customers? 

Answer.  Without  commenting  on  the  practices  of  a  particular  company,  I  can  as-
sure you that if an Internet service provider misrepresents, or fails to disclose, ma-
terial  aspects  of  its  services  in  advertising  or  marketing  to  consumers,  it  may  be 
liable  for  violations  of  Section  5  of  the  Federal  Trade  Commission  Act,  which  pro-
hibits unfair and deceptive acts and practices. 

For  over  a  decade  now,  the  FTC  has  enforced  the  consumer  protection  and  anti-
trust laws in countless matters involving Internet access. In particular, the FTC has 
investigated  and  brought  enforcement  actions  against  ISPs  for  allegedly  deceptive 
marketing, advertising, and billing of Internet access services. The FTC has devoted 
and  will  continue  to  devote  significant  resources  to  the  important  area  of  Internet 
access. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. BYRON L. DORGAN TO 

MICHAEL D. CALHOUN 

sources? 

Question  1.  Did  FTC  drop  the  ball  on  deceptive  advertising  due  to  lack  of  re-

Answer. Congress has recognized that the FTC has insufficient resources to com-
bat abusive and deceptive practices.1 While we would prefer that the FTC do more, 
the  simple  fact  is  that  the  FTC  is  hard-pressed  to  address  all  of  the  widespread 
abuses  in  the  mortgage  market  with  its  limited  resources  and  current  constraints 
of the FTC Act. Moreover, it must be remembered that it is also responsible for en-
forcement oversight of all other financial practices by all non-depositories: fair credit 

1 FTC had ‘‘insufficient resources to combat the abusive and deceptive telemarketing practices 
by  itself’’  and  the  FTC  ‘‘will  continue  to  need  the  states’  resource  assistance  in  combating  tele-
marketing fraud.’’ H.R. Rep. No. 103–20, at 3 (1993). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00124 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

121 

reporting,  debt  collection  practices,  ‘‘credit  card  cramming’’  to  name  a  few.  And  of 
course,  its  charge  is  not  just  in  the  financial  practices  sector  in  any  event.  Tele-
marketing  fraud,  health  and  food  advertising—it  is  expected  to  do  much  with  rel-
atively little. Congress could help the FTC do more on mortgage abuses by providing 
the agency with increased funding to carry out the task. 

To its credit, the FTC has been active in challenging lenders who are engaged in 
abusive lending practices with the limited resources it has. These efforts include fil-
ing complaints and consent orders for alleged violations of the Home Ownership and 
Equity Protection Act (‘‘HOEPA’’), the Truth in Lending Act (‘‘TILA’’) and its imple-
menting  regulation,  Regulation  Z,  and  the  FTC  Act.2 The  Commission  has  also 
worked with states to increase and coordinate enforcement efforts. Additionally, the 
FTC has implemented consumer education efforts to help consumers avoid potential 
abuses. 

The FTC should expand its efforts to eliminate deceptive advertising in the mort-
gage market, in part by compelling mortgage brokers not only to cease deceptive ad-
vertising,  but  also  to  engage  in  corrective  advertising:  (1)  to  dispel  the  residual  ef-
fects  of  deceptive  advertisements;  (2)  to  help  restore  competition  to  the  state  that 
prevailed  before  unfair  practices  and  deceptions  influenced  the  market;  and  (3)  to 
deprive  lenders  from  falsely  obtained  gains  to  which  advertising  may  have  contrib-
uted. 

Additionally, the FTC Act should be expanded and funding should be provided so 

that the FTC has the legal authority and the resources to do more. 

However,  as  we  discuss  in  connection  with  disclosures,  below,  deceptive  adver-
tising  is  only  a  part  of  the  problem.  Advertising  that  does  not  include  deceptive 
statements do not protect consumers from deceptive statements at closing, nor from 
practices  that  are  unfair,  though  not  technically  accompanied  by  deception.  As  we 
discuss  below,  certain  acts  should  be  specified  to  be  unfair  and  deceptive—period. 
That  makes  a  ‘‘bright  line’’  that  lenders  have  long  claimed  to  want,  reduces  uncer-
tainty, and makes compliance and enforcement much simpler. 

Question  2.  The  FTC  identified  ads  with  claims  for  very  low  monthly  payment 
amounts  or  interest  rates,  without  adequate  disclosure  of  other  important  loan 
terms.  And  the  FTC  is  now  advising  more  than  200  advertisers  and  media  outlets 
that  some  mortgage  ads  are  potentially  deceptive  or  in  violation  of  the  Truth  in 
Lending Act. These letters are a good step, but I wonder what more the FTC could 
have done or could do in the future. 

a.  You  testified  of  no  disclosure  of  escrow  requirements  and  no  disclosure  of  the 

penalty for not showing a proof of income. How can the FTC help in this area? 

b. What are other disclosure problems the FTC should address? 
c.  If  the  FTC  had  the  authority  to  create  rules  of  disclosure  in  this  area,  what 

could they do? 

Answer.  CRL  supports  the  FTC’s  efforts  to  require  lenders  to  be  more  accurate 
in  advertising  mortgage  loan  products.  In  too  many  cases  involving  abusive  loans, 
mortgage  lenders  initially  used  an  illusory  and  deceptive  monthly  mortgage  pay-
ment  to  lure  in  borrowers  and  convince  them  to  accept  loans  with  terms  that  were 
actually  much  more  costly.  However,  increased  disclosure  will  not  be  sufficient  to 
address  abusive  lending  practices.  The  FTC  has  extensive  experience  in  addressing 
unfair and deceptive practices and we would recommend enhancing the FTC’s power 
to  address  deceptive  practices  like  the  failure  to  escrow  for  taxes  and  insurance  or 
the  failure  to  document  income  directly,  in  addition  to  what  it  is  already  doing  to 
address advertising and disclosure concerns. 

A common fallacy is that borrowers consciously choose and accept the loan terms 
they  get  because  they  read  and  sign  an  array  of  disclosure  documents  during  the 
loan closing. In fact, most terms on a standard mortgage contract are buried in pre- 
printed  loan  documents,  and  are  dictated  by  the  lender,  not  negotiated  by  con-
sumers. Further, the documents outlining critical loan terms are typically only three 
to five documents out of dozens in a standard loan closing. 

3 See  FTC  v.  Capital  City  Mortgage  Corporation  (D.D.C.)  (announced  1998);  FTC  v.  Cooper 
(C.D.Cal.);,  FTC  v.  Capitol  Mortgage  Corp.  (D.Utah),  FTC  v.  CLS  Financial  Services,  Inc. 
(W.D.Wash.),  FTC  v.  Granite  Mortgage,  LLC  (E.D.Ky.),  FTC  v.  Interstate  Resource  Corp. 
(S.D.N.Y.),  FTC  v.  LAP  Financial  Serv.,  Inc.  (W.D.Ky.),  and  FTC  v.  Wasatch  Credit  Corp. 
(D.Utah) (Announced on July 29, 1999, these cases were part of ‘‘Operation Home Inequity,’’ an 
FTC  enforcement  and  consumer  education  campaign  seeking  to  curb  abusive  practices  in 
subprime  mortgage  lending);  United  States  v.  Delta  Funding  Corporation  and  Delta  Financial 
Corporation  (E.D.N.Y.)  (Settlement  by  national  subprime  lender  for  asset-based  lending,  an-
nounced on March 30, 2000), FTC v. Nu West, Inc., et al., (W.D.Wash.) (2000), FTC v. First Alli-
ance  Mortgage  Co.,  et  al  (C.D.Cal.)  (2000),  FirstPlus  Financial  Group,  Inc.  Docket  No.  C–3984 
(deceptive  advertising  consent  agreement,  2000);  FTC  v.  Citigroup  Inc.,  et  al.,  (N.D.Ga.)  (mis-
leading and deceptive statements and claims case, 2001). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00125 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

122 

As former MBA President Robert M. Couch has explained, ‘‘Consumers rarely use 
these  forms  and  disclosures  to  compare  prices  or  identify  the  terms  of  the  trans-
action because, quite simply, they cannot understand what they read nor what they 
sign. In addition, the mandated forms lack reliable cost figures, a fact that impedes 
prospective borrowers from ascertaining true total cost.’’ 3 

Other  issues  that  hinder  disclosures  from  being  effective  include  the  complexity 
of  many  mortgage  products  and  the  difficulty  of  comprehending  many  disclosure 
forms that are allegedly in ‘‘plain English.’’ For example, according to the commonly 
used  Flesch  Readability  Score,  the  Truth  in  Lending  form  disclosures  are  com-
parable  to  reading  The  Wall  Street  Journal  or  Harvard  Business  Review.  In  short, 
improved  disclosures  are  not  likely  to  help  borrowers,  and  in  some  cases  they  may 
make the situation worse. 

Another  factor  is  simply  that  people  tend  to  trust  professionals  with  whom  they 
deal  (and,  of  course,  they  should  be  able  to  do  that).  When  there  is  an  express  or 
implied  conflict  between  what  is  ‘‘disclosed’’  in  a  mass  of  papers  and  what  the  pro-
fessional tells the consumer, it is the oral information that most consumers rely on. 
Disclosure has not proven to be an effective way to prevent this deceptive practice— 
many  subprime  loans  do  include  a  warning  that  escrows  are  not  included  in  the 
monthly payment, but brokers have been effective at focusing borrower attention on 
the  loan  and  away  from  additional  costs  that  will  arise  later.  While  it  is  already 
a deceptive practice to mislead or deceive people with oral statements, or contradict 
written  statements,  that  becomes  a  much  more  difficult  case  to  prove.  Typically, 
only  after  many  consumers  have  been  harmed—enough  to  establish  evidence  of  a 
pattern and practice—can an enforcement action be brought. 

Rather  than  disclosure,  simple  and  easily  enforced  prohibitions  are  the  preferred 
alternative. As you note in your question, two common subprime practices that con-
tributed to the current high rate of subprime foreclosures were the failure to escrow 
property  taxes  and  hazard  insurance  and  the  failure  to  properly  document  income 
in  underwriting  the  borrower’s  ability  to  repay  a  subprime  loan.  Both  of  these  de-
ceptive  practices  should  be  prohibited  for  subprime  and  nontraditional  mortgages. 
Failure to escrow: Less than a quarter of subprime loans include escrows for taxes 
and  insurance.4 This  deceptive  practice  gives  the  borrower  the  impression  that  the 
monthly  payment  is  affordable  when,  in  fact,  there  are  significant  additional  costs 
that  are  not  included  in  the  loan  payments.  When  lenders  include  escrow  funds  as 
part  of  the  borrower’s  monthly  house  payment,  they  ensure  that  these  funds  are 
available when due, and they also make the true cost of the loan more transparent. 
Responsible  lenders  have  always  understood  that  establishing  an  escrow  account  is 
even  more  important  for  lower-income  borrowers  or  those  with  high  debt  burdens 
and  less  disposable  income.  Yet,  in  stark  contrast  to  the  prime  mortgage  market, 
most  subprime  lenders  make  loans  based  on  low  monthly  payments  that  do  not  es-
crow for taxes or insurance.5 

When  homeowners  are  faced  with  large  tax  and  insurance  bills  they  cannot  pay, 
the  original  lender  or  a  subprime  competitor  can  benefit  by  enticing  the  borrowers 
to  refinance  the  loan  and  pay  additional  fees  for  their  new  loan.  In  contrast,  it  is 
common practice in the prime market to escrow taxes and insurance and to consider 
those costs when looking at debt-to-income and the borrower’s ability to repay.6 

Low/no  documentation:  Inadequate  documentation  also  compromises  a  lender’s 
ability to assess the true affordability of a loan. Fitch Ratings, the international rat-
ings  firm,  recently  noted  ‘‘loans  underwritten  using  less  than  full  documentation 

3 Robert  Couch  testimony  before  the  U.S.  House  of  Representatives  Financial  Services  Sub-
committee (November 2003), cited in ‘‘Financial Education: No Substitute for Predatory Lending 
Reform,’’ Issue Paper No. 7, Center for Responsible Lending (September 13, 2004). 

4 See,  e.g.,  ‘‘B&C  Escrow  Rate  Called  Low,’’  Mortgage  Servicing  News  Bulletin  (February  23, 
2005), ‘‘Servicers of subprime mortgage loans face a perplexing conundrum: only about a quarter 
of  the  loans  include  escrow  accounts  to  ensure  payment  of  insurance  premiums  and  property 
taxes,  yet  subprime  borrowers  are  the  least  likely  to  save  money  to  make  such  payments  . . . 
Nigel  Brazier,  senior  vice  president  for  business  development  and  strategic  initiatives  at  Select 
Portfolio  Servicing,  said  only  about  25  percent  of  the  loans  in  his  company’s  subprime  portfolio 
have escrow accounts. He said that is typical for the subprime industry.’’ 

5 See,  e.g.,  ‘‘Attractive  Underwriting  Niches,’’  Chase  Home  Finance  Subprime  Lending  mar-
keting 
flier,  at  http://www.chaseb2b.com/content/portal/pdf/subprimeflyers/Subprimel 
AUN.pdf (available 9/18/2006) stating, ‘‘Taxes and Insurance Escrows are NOT required at any 
LTV,  and  there’s  NO  rate  add!’’,  (suggesting  that  failing  to  escrow  taxes  is  an  ‘‘underwriting 
highlight’’ that is beneficial to the borrower). ‘Low balling’ payments by omitting tax and insur-
ance  costs  were  also  alleged  in  states’  actions  against  Ameriquest.  See,  e.g.,  State  of  Iowa,  ex 
rel  Miller  v.  Ameriquest  Mortgage  Co.  et  al,  Eq.  No.  EQCE–53090  Petition,  at  ¶ 16(B)  (March 
21, 2006). 

6 In  fact,  Fannie  Mae  and  Freddie  Mac,  the  major  mortgage  investors,  require  lenders  to  es-

crow taxes and insurance. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00126 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

123 

standards  comprise  more  than  50  percent  of  the  subprime  sector.  . . .’’  ‘‘Low  doc’’ 
and ‘‘no doc’’ loans originally were intended for use with the limited category of bor-
rowers  who  are  self-employed  or  whose  incomes  are  otherwise  legitimately  not  re-
ported  on  a  W–2  tax  form,  but  lenders  and  brokers  have  increasingly  used  these 
loans  to  inflate  borrower  incomes  and  put  the  borrower  into  an  unaffordable  loan. 
The  unwarranted,  unnecessary,  and  widespread  use  of  stated  income,  and  lo-  or 
no-doc  loans  facilitated  the  epidemic  of  unsustainable  lending.  Lenders  may  evalu-
ate  the  risk  of  a  loan  before  approving  it,  but  without  adequate  documentation  of 
income,  a  lender’s  approval  of  a  loan  is  meaningless.  Even  as  the  problem  became 
undeniable, too many loans continued to be made on this basis into 2007. Based on 
one  CRL  review  of  10  mortgage-backed  securities,  we  found  that,  on  average,  more 
than  one-third—37  percent—of  these  recently  securitized  subprime  loans  were  ap-
proved based on stated income or reduced documentation standards for verifying the 
borrower’s  income.7 The  vast  majority  of  borrowers  have  readily  documentable  W– 
2  income;  by  putting  them  in  low-doc  loans,  lenders  are  either  charging  them  up 
to 1 percent higher interest for no reason, or inventing non-existent income in order 
to make them a loan that is doomed to fail. 

As  Comptroller  of  the  Currency,  John  Dugan,  has  stated,  ‘‘Sound  underwriting— 
and, for that matter—simple common sense—suggest that a mortgage lender would 
almost  always  want  to  verify  the  income  of  a  riskier  subprime  borrower  to  make 
sure  that  he  or  she  has  the  means  to  make  the  required  monthly  payment.  Most 
subprime borrowers are salaried employees for whom verifying income by producing 
copies of W–2 forms is just not that difficult.’’ 

We  see  no  justification  for  lenders  failing  to  use  readily  available  data  on  a  bor-
rower’s  income,  and  do  not  believe  that  it  would  be  sufficient  for  lenders  to  simply 
disclose  to  borrowers  that  other  options  are  available.  The  financial  incentives  for 
lenders  to  offer  and  encourage  borrowers  to  accept  no-  or  low-doc  loans  are  simply 
too  great  to  see  disclosure  as  a  significant  counter.  After  filing  for  bankruptcy,  the 
CEO  of  one  mortgage  lender  explained  it  this  way  to  The  New  York  Times,  ‘‘The 
market  is  paying  me  to  do  a  no-income-verification  loan  more  than  it  is  paying  me 
to do the full documentation loans,’’ he said. ‘‘What would you do?’’ 

Question  3.  How  should  Section  5  of  the  FTC  Act  be  expanded  to  mortgage  lend-

ing? 

Answer.  Give  the  FTC  enforcement  authority  for  all  matters  arising  under  the 

FTC Act, and give consumers the power to protect themselves. 

The FTC Act should be expanded in several ways. First, Congress should provide 
the Federal Trade Commission concurrent and independent rulemaking and enforce-
ment  authority  over  national  banks  and  thrifts  for  all  matters  covered  by  the  FTC 
Act.  This  would  empower  the  FTC  to  bring  enforcement  actions  against  national 
banks  and  thrifts  for  unfair  and  deceptive  practices.  The  FTC  has  nearly  70  years 
of extensive experience protecting consumers from unfair and deceptive practices by 
non-bank  entities.  But  the  FTC  Act  denies  the  FTC  the  essential  authority  to  pro-
tect consumers from regulated financial institutions. 

All  four  of  the  primary  banking  regulatory  agencies  have  an  inherent  conflict-of- 
interest  that  has  resulted  in  limited  enforcement  of  those  institutions  within  their 
regulatory authority. All four receive significant funding from industry sources, and 
no appropriated funds from Congress. The FTC Act already authorizes three Federal 
financial regulators (the OTS, the FRB and NCUA) to issue regulations prohibiting 
unfair or deceptive acts or practices. Perhaps due to the conflict-of-interest, the reg-
ulators  have  failed  to  issue  such  regulations  and  to  exercise  their  authority  under 
the  FTC  Act,  except  in  the  one  instance  where  the  law  mandated  it.8 Indeed,  the 
OCC  did  not  even  acknowledge  the  authority  to  bring  enforcement  actions  against 
their  regulated  banks  committing  unfair  and  deceptive  acts  and  practices  until 
2000.  After  waiting  25  years  to  bring  any  enforcement  action,  that  agency  has  still 

7 See,  e.g.,  Testimony  of  Michael  D.  Calhoun,  Before  the  U.S.  Senate  Committee  on  Banking, 
Housing and Urban Affairs; Subc. on Transportation, Housing and Urban Affairs, Ending Mort-
gage  Abuse:  Safeguarding  Homebuyers,  Appx.  1,  (June  26,  2007),  available  at  http:// 
www.responsiblelending.org/pdfs/senate-testimony-m-calhoun-june-26-2007.pdf. 

8 Under 15 U.S.C. 57a(f), when the FTC issues a rule on a topic that relates to financial insti-
tutions,  each  of  the  agencies  authorized  to  promulgate  UDAP  rules  under  that  section  must 
issue follow-up rules applying the FTC rule to its institutions, unless the agency finds that such 
acts  or  practices  are  not  unfair  or  deceptive,  or  the  Board  of  Governors  of  the  Federal  Reserve 
System finds that implementation of similar regulations with respect to banks, savings and loan 
institutions  or  Federal  credit  unions  would  seriously  conflict  with  essential  monetary  and  pay-
ments systems policies of such Board, and publishes any such finding, and the reasons therefor, 
in  the  Federal  Register.  This  authority  has  been  exercised  only  once  only—in  1985,  when  the 
Federal Reserve Board adopted a version of the FTC’s Credit Practices Rule and made it appli-
cable to banks and thrifts. See 12 CFR § 227. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00127 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

124 

done  little  with  it.9 In  view  of  the  obvious  conflict  of  interest  in  supervising  the 
same  institutions  that  fund  their  budgets,  they  should  not  be  vested  with  sole  en-
forcement power with respect to consumer protection matters. 

Unlike  the  banking  agencies,  the  FTC  lacks  the  inherent  conflict  of  interest  that 
paralyzes the banking regulatory agencies. The FTC has no responsibility to protect 
the  profitability  of  financial  institutions.  Its  sole  mandate  is  to  protect  consumers 
from  the  unlawful  and  deceptive  practices  prohibited  by  the  FTC  Act.  As  such,  it 
is appropriate for the FTC to be vested with full authority under the FTC Act over 
all entities that engage in unfair and deceptive practices. The FTC should be given 
concurrent  and  independent  enforcement  authority  with  regard  to  all  matters  aris-
ing  under  the  FTC  Act,  in  the  same  way  that  state  attorneys  general  have  inde-
pendent authority to enforce applicable state laws against state banks. 

Concurrent  rule-making  authority,  however,  would  also  require  a  change  to  the 
FTC’s  own  UDAP  rule-making  authority.  Since  1975  Congressional  amendments, 
the FTC’s own UDAP-rule-making process has been made much more cumbersome, 
time-consuming,  and  resource-intensive  than  the  standard  ‘‘notice-and-comment’’ 
rule-making  procedures  that  the  bank  regulatory  agencies  could  use.  Concurrent 
rulemaking  would  require  that  the  procedures  be  harmonized,  and  permitting  the 
FTC  to  use  the  notice-and-comment  process  permitted  the  banking  agencies  is  the 
most sound.10 

Giving authority to the FTC will be an imperfect solution: the FTC’s record in re-
cent  years  with  respect  to  non-bank  entities  is  less  than  perfect.  As  such,  we  rec-
ommend  a  third  change  to  the  FTC  Act.  Consumers,  who  currently  have  no  right 
to enforce the Federal FTC Act, should be provided a private remedy under Section 
5  of  the  Act.  Currently,  the  Act  permits  only  public  enforcement.  While  state  and 
Federal agencies must protect consumers, it is imperative that consumers not be de-
nied  the  ability  to  protect  themselves  with  a  private  right  of  action.  Although  con-
sumers  in  many  states  can  invoke  their  state  unfair  and  deceptive  acts  and  prac-
tices  law,  many  state  laws  have  significant  gaps,  such  as  exclusions  for  ‘‘regulated 
entities.’’  Additionally,  Federal  banking  regulators’  overly  aggressive  assertion  of 
preemption  may  hamstring  consumers’  ability  to  resort  to  their  state  UDAP  laws. 
Because  the  FTC  cannot  pursue  an  action  on  behalf  of  any  individual  consumer, 
consumers should be allowed to protect themselves. 

Æ 

9 Williams, Julie L. and Michael S. Bylsma, On the Same Page: Federal Banking Agency En-
forcement  of  the  FTC  Act  to  Address  Unfair  and  Deceptive  Practices  by  Banks,  58  Bus.  Law. 
1243 (2003). According to one 2004 Congressional report, state banking agencies and state attor-
ney generals’ offices employ nearly 700 full time examiners and attorneys to monitor compliance 
with  consumer  laws,  more  than  seventeen  times  the  number  of  OCC  personnel  allocated  to  in-
vestigate  consumer  complaints.  See  Comm.  on  Fin.  Servs.,  108th  Cong.,  Views  and  Estimates 
on  Matters  to  Be  Set  Forth  in  the  Concurrent  Res.  on  the  Budget  for  Fiscal  Year  2005,  at  16 
(Comm.  Print  2004),  available  at  http://financialservices.house.gov/media/pdf/FY2005Views 
lFinal.pdf, cited in Wilmarth, supra note 10, at 316 & n.359. In the area of abusive mortgage 
lending practices alone, State bank supervisory agencies initiated 20,332 investigations in 2003 
in  response  to  consumer  complaints,  which  resulted  in  4,035  enforcement  actions.  By  contrast, 
the  OCC’s  record  of  consumer  protection  enforcement  is  an  embarrassment.  The  agency  lists 
only  eight  actions  in  a  section  on  its  website  captioned  ‘‘[a]ctions  the  OCC  has  taken  against 
banks  engaged  in  abusive  practices.’’  See  OCC,  Consumer  Protection  News:  Unfair  and  Decep-
tive Practices, http://www.occ.treas.gov/Consumer/Unfair.htm (last visited Aug. 28, 2006). The 
OCC  stayed  its  hand  for  more  than  a  quarter  century  before  bringing  its  first  action  in  2000 
to address unfair and deceptive practices under Section 5 of the Federal Trade Commission Act. 
Even then, the action came only after a decade in which the target bank ‘‘had been well known 
in the . . . industry as the poster child of abusive consumer practices’’ and after ‘‘[a] California 
state  prosecutor  . . .  embarrassed  the  OCC  into  taking  action.’’  See  Duncan  A.  MacDonald 
(former General Counsel, Citigroup Inc.’s Europe and North American card business), Letter to 
the  Editor,  Comptroller  Has  Duty  to  Clean  Up  Card  Pricing  Mess,  Am.  Banker,  Nov.  21,  2003, 
at  17;  See  also  Frontline:  Secret  History  of  the  Credit  Card  (PBS  television  broadcast  Nov.  23, 
2004)  (transcript  available  at  http://www.pbs.org/wgbh/pages/frontline/shows/credit/etc/ 
script.html). 

10 Because the FTC has a much broader portfolio for enforcement—it has enforcement author-
ity over the vast majority of actors in commerce doing business with consumers except for those 
expressly  carved  out,  like  financial  institutions—and  because  it  is  primarily  funded  by  appro-
priations,  new  responsibilities  must  be  accompanied  by  additional  resources  if  the  agency  is  to 
be able to do its job properly. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:52 Sep 21, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00128 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\75970.TXT JACKIE

